CHAPTER I.
Before
sunrise on the following morning, many
a feathered band of allies from distant tribes was
pouring into Tezcuco; for this was the day on
which the Captain-General had appointed to review
his whole force, assign the several divisions to the
command of his favourite officers, and expound the
system of warfare, by which he expected to reduce
the doomed Tenochtitlan. The multitudes that
were collected by midday would be beyond our
belief, did we not know that the royal valley, and
every neighbouring nook of Anahuac capable of
cultivation, were covered by a population almost
as dense as that which makes an ant-heap of the
`Celestial Empire,' at this day.
While they were thus congregating together,
marshalled under their native chiefs, emulously
expressing
their attachment to the Spaniard, and their
enthusiasm in his cause, by the horrible clamour of
drums and conches, Cortes was receiving, in the
great Hall of Audience, the compliments and
reverence
of those cavaliers, distinguished soldiers, and
valiant infidel princes, whom he had invited to the
feast, with which he marked the close of his mighty
preparations and the beginning of his not less
arduous
campaign.
A table crossed the room immediately in front of
the platform, on which the noblest and most
honoured
guests had already taken their stations.
Two others, running from pillar to pillar, extended
the whole length of the apartment, leaving in the
intermediate space, as well as betwixt them and the
walls, sufficient room for the passage of revellers
and attendants, of which latter there were many
present, bustling to and fro, in the persons of
Indian
boys and girls, all branded with the scarry
badge of servitude. The walls, pillars, and ceiling,
were ornamented with green branches of trees and
viny festoons, among which breathed and glittered
a multitude of the gayest and most odoriferous
flowers; and besides these, there were deposited
and suspended, in many places, Indian banners and
standards, as well as spears, bucklers, and
battle-axes
,
the trophies of many a field of victory. The
tables were covered with brilliant cotton-cloths, and
loaded not only with all the dainties of Mexico, but
with some of the luxuries of Europe, among which
were conspicuous divers flagons of wine, on which
many a veteran gazed with looks of anxious and
affectionate expectation.
The peculiarity of the scene, animated as it was
by a densely moving throng of guests in their most
gallant attire, was greatly heightened by a
circumstance
,
for which but few were able to account.
Although
full noon-day, the light of heaven was
carefully
excluded, and the apartment illuminated only
by torches and lamps. This, though it gave
picturesqueness
to every object in view, was, to say
the least, remarkable; and those who were most
interested to watch the workings of the
commander's
mind, beheld in it a subject for many
disturbing
reflections. But, to such persons, there was
another phenomenon still more unsatisfactory, in
the spectacle of a line of veteran soldiers, original
followers of Cortes, extending round the whole
apartment, who stood against the walls, each with
a spear in his hand and a
machete
,a heavy,
straight sword,on his thigh, surveying the
revellers
more with the air of sentinels than companions
in festivity.
While the inferior guests stood or lounged about,
speculating on these curious particulars, and
expecting
the signal to begin the feast, which seemed
to be delayed by the absence of some important
guest, Cortes occupied himself conversing with
Alvarado
,
De Olid, Guzman, De Ircio, and other
hidalgos
,
who stood with him on the platform,
occasionally
extending his notice to the young king of
Tezcuco, his brother Suchel, the Tlascalan chief
Chichimecatl, and other noble barbarians, who made
part of the distinguished group. Many curious,
and not a few anxious, eyes were turned upon them
from different parts of the hall; and it was soon
observed, and remarked with whispers, that
Sandoval
,
the valiant and beloved, and Xicotencal, the
gloomy, were absent from the party.
By and by, however, conjectures were put to
rest by the sudden appearance of the cavalier in
question, who entered with his garments in some
disorder, his countenance heated and troubled, and
his whole appearance that of a man just released
from some exciting and laborious duty.
As soon as Cortes perceived him approaching, he
commanded room to be made for him on the
platform
,
welcomed him with a smiling face and a
cordial
grasp of hand, and then signed to the guests to
take their places at the tables.
In the bustle of festivity that followed the
command
,
the revellers forgot to wonder at the
torch-light
around them and the presence of the armed
guards. If a few still bent their eyes uneasily on
the commander-in-chief, striving to catch the low
accents with which he conversed with his
immediate
friends, and particularly with Sandoval, their
efforts were unnoticed by the others; and, in a
short time, the hum of whispers waxed into
murmurs
of joyous hilarity, so that the conversation
on the platform could only be guessed at by the
expressive visages and gestures of the cavaliers.
By and by, the feast became still more
unrestrained
and noisy. Wine was poured and drunk,
jests were uttered, songs almost sung, and care
banished from all but a few, who still turned their
looks to the platform, exchanged glances
occasionally
with each other, and at every bustle attending
the entrance of any one at the great door, cast their
eyes in that direction with much meaning anxiety.
Still, however, the feast went on, and enjoyment
was becoming revelry, when the voice of Cortes
was suddenly heard. The murmurs of all were
instantly hushed, and all turning their eyes to the
platform, they beheld the Captain-General standing
erect, and eyeing them with extreme gravity of
countenance, holding, at the same time, in his hand,
a golden bowl of wine.
My brothers and fellow-soldiers, he said, as
soon as all were composed, it becomes us, as
true and loyal Castilians, to remember our duty
to the king our master, whom God preserve for a
thousand years! We are here afar from his sight,
but not beyond the reach of his authority, nor the
constraint of our true allegiance. Let it not be
thought that the cavaliers of Madrid will drink his
health with more zeal and humility at the
palace-door
,
than we, his true subjects, in the deserts of
Mexico. A bowl, then, to his majesty our master,
Don Carlos of Spain, Austria, and this New
World!
As he spoke, he knelt upon one knee, and all
present, even the barbaric king at his side, doing
2*
the same thing, allegiance was pledged in the cup,
which is undoubtedly the best way to make it
agreeable.
From this exhibition of humility, all rose up,
shouting lusty
vivas
.
It gratifies me, said Cortes, when this
customary
ebullition of loyalty was over, to perceive
that I have about me men so truly faithful to
my very noble and loyal master. For in this, I
perceive I shall be no more afflicted with the
painful
necessity of exerting those powers with which
his majesty has so bountifully endowed me, even
to the shedding of blood and the taking of life.
A sudden damper fell upon the spirits of many
present, and all who were not apprized of the secret
of Villafana's fate, looked upon Cortes with
surprise
.
Know, my truly faithful and loyal friends, he
went on, speaking with an appearance of solemn
indignation, that we have had among us a
TRAITOR,a Christian man and a Spaniard, yet
a traitor to the king our master! Yet, in the band
of the holy apostles, there was one Judas; and it
does not become us to believe that we, sinful
creatures
as we are, and much more numerous, should
be without
our
Iscariot, who would have sold our
lives for silver, and sunk into perdition the interest
of his majesty in this opulent kingdom. It
rejoices
me to know that we have had but
one
. The
pain with which I have been filled to discover there
were other knaves for his accomplices, is assuaged
by the knowledge that they were not Castilians,
but infidel Indians; to whom perfidy is so natural,
that it is wholly superfluous to lament its
occurrence
.
Know therefore, my friends, and grieve not
to know it, for the evil is past, that Xicotencal,
General-in-chief of the Tlascalan forces, besides
secretly treating with our foes, his own enemies,
the men of Tenochtitlan, did, last night, traitorously
abandon our standard, and set out, to throw
himself
,
as I doubt not, into the arms of the Mexicans.
A villain! a very vile traitor! death to the dog
of an unbeliever! were the expressions with
which the revellers protested their indignation.
Think not, said the Captain-General, in
continuation
,
that the villain who doth seriously
pursue
a scheme of disloyalty, shall escape a just
retribution
.
The toils and sufferings which we have
endured in this land, in his majesty's service, are
such that I can readily excuse the murmurs with
which some have occasionally indulged a peevish
discontent. I will never account it much against a
brave soldier that he has sometimes grumbled a
little; but he who meditates, or practises, a treason,
shall die. I have said, that among us all there was
but
one
villain. Perhaps there were two; but of
that we will inquire hereafter. He of whom I
speak, was one to whom I had forgiven much
semblance
of discontent, and whom I had raised into
no little favour. Yet did he conceive a foul
conspiracy
,
having for its object no less a thing than
the destruction of this enterprise against a rich
pagan kingdom, and the murder of all those who
would not become the enemies of Spain. The man
of whom I speak you know. It was
Villafana! muttered many, with eager, yet
fearful voices; while those who had hitherto
betrayed
anxiety at the ominous lights and guards, turned
pale in secret.
It was indeed the Alguazil, Villafana, said
Cortes, sternly; and you shall know his villany.
First, the Mexican ambassadors, last night committed
to his charge, he permitted to escape, that they
might be no hinderance to the ambushed infidels,
then lying on the lake, ready to burn my
brigantines
.
Secondly, being the captain of the prison,
he permitted the same to be approached and sacked
by other infidels, whereby a prisoner, convicted of
a heavy crime and condemned to die, was snatched
out of our hands, and given into those of the
enemy
,
whom he will doubtless aid and abet in all the
sanguinary resistance which they are inclined to
make. Thirdly, by his persuasions, Xicotencal
was induced to throw off his allegiance, at the very
moment when the fleet and the prison were beset,
and desert from the post. And fourthly, the
consummation
of the whole villany was to be effected
at this very hour, and on this very floor, in the blood
of myself, my officers, and as I may say of
yourselves
also; since none were to be spared who
were not his sworn colleagues; and, certainly,
there are none here so base and criminal?
The answer to this address mingled a thousand
protestations of loyalty with as many fierce calls
for punishment on the traitor. In the midst of the
tumult, Cortes gave a sign to two Indian slaves,
who stood behind the platform; and the heavy
curtain being rapidly pulled aside, the lustre of the
noontide sun streamed through the pellucid wall,
until lamp and torch seemed to smoulder into
darkness, under the diviner ray; and the revellers
looking up, beheld the ghastly spectacle of
Villafana's
body, hanging motionless and stiff in the
midst of the light.
At this unexpected sight, the guests, inflamed as
they were with wine, anger, and enthusiasm, were
struck with horror; and if traitors were among
them, as none but Cortes and themselves could
say, it was not possible to detect them by their
countenances, all being equally pale and affrighted.
Thus perish all who plot treason against the
king and the king's officers! cried the
Captain-General
,
with a loud voice. The rebel
Xicotencal
swings upon an oak-tree, on the wayside as
you go to Chalco; the mutineer Lerma hath fled
to the pagans, to become a renegade and perhaps
apostate; and Villafana, the traitor, hangs as you
see, upon the window of our banqueting-room, to
teach all who may have meditated a like villany,
the fate that shall most certainly await them.
Hide the carrion! he exclaimed to the slaves, and
in an instant the frightful spectacle was excluded,
along with the cheerful light of day. The return
to that of the torches was like a lapse into
darkness
,
and for a few moments, it was scarce
possible
for the guests to distinguish the features of those
nearest to them. In the gloom, however, the voice
of the Captain-General was heard, concluding his
oration:
Let no one of this true and loyal company be
in fear, he said, with his accustomed craft. The
paper, on which the villain had recorded the names
of such madmen as would have joined him in his
crime, he was artful enough to destroy. But let
the disaffected tremble. There has been one dog
among us, and there may others prove so,
hereafter
.
But I am now awake; and the treason that
may be planted, shall be discovered, and nipped
before
it come to the budding.God save his majesty!
Another bowl to his greatness! And let all fall to
feasting again; for, by and by, the signal gun will
be fired for the review, and this is the last feast ye
must think of sharing together, till ye can spread it
again in the halls of Montezuma.
Whatever relief might have been carried by these
words to the bosoms of the guilty, the spectacle of
their murdered associate had sunk too deeply in
their spirits, to allow any festive exertions. The
innocent were equally shocked, and gloom and
uneasiness
oppressed the hearts of all.
It was felt therefore as a relief, when the signal
for breaking up the feast was given by the sound of
a gun from the temple-top; and all rushed out, to
forget in the bustle of parade, the sickening event
which had marred their enjoyment.
On this day, the whole army of Cortes, of which
the thousand Christians made scarcely the
three-hundredth
part, was marched out upon the
meadows
of Tezcuco, and there, with ceremonies of
great state and ostentation, was reviewed, divided,
and each division appointed to its respective
duties.
The first division was assigned to the command
of Sandoval, and was ordered to march southward
to the city of Iztapalapan, which commanded the
principal causeway, or approach to Mexico. The
second was given to the ferocious De Olid, whose
destination was to Cojohuacan, a city southwest of
Mexico, the dike from which led to that betwixt the
metropolis and Iztapalapan. The third was
appointed
to the Capitan del Salto, or Alvarado, who
was to take possession of Tacuba, which
commanded
the shortest of the causeways. The two
last divisions were ordered to proceed in company,
around the northern borders of the lake, destroying
the towns on the route, and separating at Tacuba.
The fleet Cortes reserved in his own hands,
intending
,
besides commanding the whole lake, so
to act with it, as to give assistance to each division,
as it might be needed. The royal city of Tezcuco
was to be entrusted to the government of the young
king Ixtlilxochitl, the cavalier Don Francisco de
Guzman remaining, though somewhat reluctantly,
to guide and control his actions, under the
appearance
of adding to his state and security.
These preliminaries arranged, the remainder of
the day was devoted to festivities. The great
work of conquest was to begin on the morrow.
CHAPTER II.
The
extraordinary and exciting events which
took place in the prison, that night which Juan
Lerma esteemed the last he should spend upon
earth, had reduced to exhaustion a body already
enfeebled by inaction, and a mind almost consumed
by care. Hence, when, having struggled for a
time with the restlessness and delirium which, in
such cases, usher in sleep with a thousand
phantasms
apparitions
both of sight and sound,he at
last fell asleep, his slumbers were profound and
dreamless. The loud alarums, which drove the
executioners of Villafana from the Hall of Audience,
made no impression on his ear; and even the yells,
that accompanied the attack on his dreary abode,
were equally unheard. The guards were routed,
the doors were forced, and he was lifted to his feet
by unknown hands, almost before he had opened
his eyes; and even voices, that, at another time,
would have attracted his attention, and words that
would have inspired him with the joy of deliverance,
were all lost upon him. Nay, such was the stupor
which oppressed his mind, that he was dragged
from the dungeon, and hurried rapidly along
through a host of infidels to the water-side, before
he was convinced that all was not really a dream.
Then, indeed, the bustle, the din of shrieks and
Indian drums, mingled with the sounds of trumpets
and fire-arms, the howl of winds and the plash of
waves, though they recalled him to his wits, yet
left him confounded, and, for a while, incapable of
understanding and appreciating his situation. In
this condition, he was deposited in a canoe of some
magnitude, which instantly putting off from the
shore, under the impulse of thirty paddles, he soon
found himself darting over the lake at a speed
which promised soon to remove from his eyes, and
perhaps for ever, the scene of his late humiliation
and suffering.
The darkness of the night was almost palpable,
and, save the few torches that could be seen
hurrying
through the alarmed city, no other light
illuminated
the scene, until the moment when the four
brigantines, fired by the assailants, burst up in a
ruddy blaze. At this sight, a shout of triumph burst
from his capturers, and altering the course of the
canoe, it seemed as if they were about to rush into
the thick of the conflict.
As they approached the burning ships, Juan was
able in the increasing glare, to examine the figures
of his companions, and beheld the dark visages and
half-naked bodies of thirty or more barbarians,
each, besides his paddle, having a weighty
battle-axe
dangling from his wrist, and a broad buckler
of some unknown material hung over his back.
Two men sat by him, one on each side, and he
soon discovered that these, whom he had thought
mere guards for his safe-keeping, were no other
than the Ottomi Techeechee and the young prince
of Mexico, the latter now freed from his disguise.
Guatimozin, said he, no longer doubting the
purpose for which he had been snatched from the
prison, and resolved at once to express his
disapprobation
,
dost thou think to make me a renegade
to my countrymen? I swear to thee
Peace, and fear not, replied the royal chief.
Thou shalt have very sweet vengeance.
I ask it not, I seek it not; and surely I will not
accept it, when it makes me the traitor I have been
so falsely called. Am I thy prisoner?
My friend, replied Guatimozin, quickly,
starting
up, seizing a paddle from the hands of the
nearest rower, and himself urging the canoe
towards
the nearest vessel, which was, by this time,
so close at hand, that Juan could clearly perceive
the figures, and almost the faces, of the Spaniards
on board, contending, and, as it seemed, not
unsuccessfully
,
both with the flames and the assailants.
A great herd of Mexicans was seen fighting hand
to hand with the Christians; but it was manifest,
from the cheery cries, with which the latter
responded
to the yells of the former, and from the frequent
plunges in the water, as of men leaping or cast
overboard, that, in this brigantine at least, the
battle
went not with the pagans. This Guatimozin
remarked
as clearly as Juan, and as he struck the
water
more impetuously with his paddle, he shouted
aloud, Be strong, men of Mexico, be strong!
All this passed in the space of an instant. A
loud cry, the rush of other canoes against the ship,
and the frantic exertions of the combatants already
on board to maintain their places, made it apparent
that the voice of the prince was not unknown or
unregarded. Still, the Spaniards fought well and
fiercely, and their cries of God and St. James!
Honour and Spain! kindled its natural enthusiasm
in the breast of the young islander. Forgetting his
late wrongs and oppressions, and the mournful
truth, that, at this moment, the Christians were
more his enemies than the Mexicans, he determined,
if possible, to make his escape. Watching his
opportunity
,
and perceiving that many ropes,
sundered
by the flames, were hanging over the sides of the
vessel in the water, he chose a moment, when the
canoe was within but ten or twelve fathoms of her,
VOL. II. 3
and but few of those savages who had leaped
overboard
were swimming near, he rose to his feet, and
shouting aloud, Help for an escaping captive! and
good courage to all! he plunged boldly into the lake.
To one, who, like Juan, had rolled in his
childhood
among the breakers on the northern coast of
Cuba, and to whom it was as easy a diversion to
dive for conches in such depths as would have tried
the wind of a pearl-diver, as to gather limpets and
periwinkles from the beach, it was no great exploit
to leap among the puny billows of Tezcuco, and
swim to an anchored vessel, even when the path
was obstructed by enemies, themselves not
unfamiliar
with the water. His escape was so sudden
and unexpected, and the prince, Techeechee, and
the rowers, were so occupied with the scene of
combat into which they were hurrying, that it is
possible it would not have been noticed, had it not
been for his exclamation. Then, perceiving him in
the water, all were seized with confusion and fury,
some striking at him with their paddles, some
leaping
over in pursuit, and all so confounded and
divided
in action, that the canoe was on the very
point of being overset. In this period of confusion,
they soon lost sight of him; for it was not possible
to distinguish him among the mass of infidels that
were swimming about in all directions.
The cry of Juan was perhaps not heard by his
fellow-Christians in the brigantine; but there was
one friend aboard, and that a brute one, whose ears
were far quicker to detect his call, and whose heart
was much prompter to obey. This was the dog
Befo, who, having been taken from the prison on
the day of the trial, and afterwards been refused
admission, he so annoyed the guards by his whining
and howling, and indeed all in the palace, likewise,
that they were glad to send him aboard a vessel, to
have him out of the way, until after the time of
execution
,
when, it was apprehended, from his
remarkable
affection for the prisoner, he might give
additional trouble. His services were turned to
good account by the sailors, during the attack; for,
being instantly loosed, he sprang upon barbarian
after barbarian, tumbling them into the water, or
among the Spaniards, who despatched them. His
appearance, fiercer than that of the largest beasts
of prey in Mexico, and his savage bark, not less
frightful than the yell of the jaguar or the puma,
were perhaps still more effectual than his fangs;
for at the sight and sound, the Mexicans, climbing
over the bulwarks, recoiled, and with screams of
dismay, jumped into the water, and swam again
to the nearest canoes.
In the midst of the conflict, Befo heard the cry of
his master, and loosing a barbarian whom he had
caught by the throat, he sprang to the side of the
vessel, thrust his paws and nose over the gunwale,
and looked eagerly into the lake, whining all the
time, and barking, as if to attract Juan's notice.
He then ran to the after-deck, where were several
sailors busily engaged in knotting a rope that
seemed
to pass to the shore, or to another brigantine
nearer to the lake-side; and flinging himself over the
railing here as before, he looked out and whined
loudly again. As he peered thus into the darkness,
a faint groan, as of one strangling in the water,
came to his ears; and the next moment, he sprang,
with a wild howl, into the flood.
That groan came from Juan Lerma, who, that
instant, was struck a violent blow, he knew not by
whom or with what, which, for a time, deprived
him of all sensation, and left him drowning in the
lake.
CHAPTER III.
When
Juan recovered his senses, he found
himself
lying in the bottom of a little canoe, urged by a
single boatman, and already far from the conflict.
The blow, inflicted by some blunt weapon, perhaps a
club or paddle, had stunned him, yet had not
wounded
;
and he became soon aware that he was not
seriously injured. As he raised himself a little on
his arm, his companion, pausing an instant from his
toil, exclaimed, in the well remembered tones of the
Ottomi,
Izquauhtzin knows his friend: there are none
to do him harm.
Techeechee! cried the youth: What is this?
where are we going? Have they killed Guatimozin,
the king? If thou art the friend thou hast so often
proved, row me to the shore. Methinks we are in
the middle of the lake!
Guatimozin is the Great Eagle's friend, said
Techeechee, again plying his paddle; he says the
Great Eagle is his brother; and because of his fear
of the armed people, he says, `Let the Great Eagle
sail alone with Techeechee, the old man, who has
no weapons, and loves the Great Eagle very
much.'
I am then again a prisoner? said Juan, sadly.
Perhaps it is better,certainly I cannot control
my destiny, and very surely I perceive that
Guatimozin
is friendly to me. But how is this,
Techeechee
?
I sprang from the prince's boat,I was
knocked on the headHow comes it that I am in
this canoe?
The king picked his brother from the water,
replied the Indian; saying, `Why should my
brother drown, when he has escaped Malintzin, him
who eats blood?' `Therefore,' said the king, `take
him to my house, for did he not carry me to his?
Put upon him the robe of a king's son, with the red
crown of a Teuctli, as one who is great among the
nobels and fighting men; and the people shall call
him the king's brother.'
To this revealment of a fortune so magnificent,
Juan answered only by a deep sigh, muttering
within the recesses of his breast, `The noble's
gown or the victim's shirt,but I will live and die
both a Christian and Spaniard.'
Then, contenting himself with this resolve, for he
no longer perceived any hope of escape, unless by
killing the old man, and perhaps began to be aware
how useless would be freedom, he cast his eyes
about him, and endeavoured to learn his situation.
The sounds of battle came but faintly to his ears,
and the burning ships, which were still visible,
seemed to be left far behind. Yet in the estimate
he was thus enabled to make of his distance from
the fleet, there was no little deception; for the
flames were expiring, and the wind, blowing from
the west, conspired with the plashing of the water
to deaden the sounds of combat. In every other
quarter, all was silence and gloom. An
impenetrable
darkness lay upon the lake. The sky was
concealed
by a dense canopy of clouds, and he began
to wonder at the precision and understanding with
which Techeechee impelled the canoe towards a
point indicated by no beacon on earth or in heaven,
until he perceived, immediately over the prow, what
seemed a little star, as red as blood, glimmering on
the very edge of the horizon. But this, he became
3*
soon convinced, was no heavenly luminary. Faint
as it was, it shone steadily, and, once seen, there
was no difficulty in preserving it always in the eye.
He even began to be sensible, after a little time, that
it increased in magnitude as he approached it; and,
by and by, he was at no loss to believe it was a
beacon-light, kindled upon some eminence in the
pagan city, to guide the fleet of canoes on its
return
from the battle.
While he was arriving at this just conclusion,
the sounds of contention dying further away in the
background, he was struck by a wailing note
behind
,
like the cry of some animal, swimming in the
lake. He listened, distinguished it a second time,
and commanded the Ottomi to cease paddling.
If I know the voice of a friend, that is the whine
of Befo! he exclaimed, looking eagerly, but vainly
back. I remember me now, that I heard him
bark on board the ship. Put back, Techeechee, put
back! The dog is following me, and to his
destruction
,
if we take him not up. Put back, put back!
'Tis the big tiger, said the Indian, very
seriously
.
We found him eating you in the water
he had you by the head; and now he is
following
,
like a wolf, who never leaves the deer, after
having once tasted of his blood.
Good heavens, eating me! said Juan. It
was he, then, that held me up, when I was
strangling
?
I remember to have felt some one pull me by
the hair, before I was utterly senseless. Faithful
Befo! faithful Befo! there is no friend like him!
And I leave him drowning, who saved me from the
same death, and now follows me with affection?
Put back, put back!Nay, thou art sluggish,old
and sluggish:I will paddle myself. What, Befo!
Befo!
Thus exclaiming, and using the paddle, which he
had snatched from Techeechee, with no little skill,
it was soon clear that he was drawing nigh to the
animal, which, hearing his voice, replied with loud
whinings, that were both piteous and joyful.
Alas, poor dog, thou art weary enough. Hast
thou not another paddle, Techeechee? the dog is
drowning.
Techeechee fears not the ocelotl, replied the
savage, with a voice somewhat quavering; he
killed one with his spear, and the great king
Montezuma
said, `The Ottomi is brave: he is
Ocelotzin
.'
The Spanish tiger eats poor Ottomies.
Techeechee
has only his arrows and a macana.
Use them not, and fear not, said Juan, already
catching a sight of the struggling beast. What,
Befo! Befo! true Befo! courage, Befo!
The dog was evidently wholly exhausted; yet
at the cheery cry of the youth, and especially at the
sight of him, he yelped loudly, and raised himself
half out of the water, while Juan, making one more
sweep of the paddle to his side, caught him by the
leathern collar, and strove to drag him into the
boat. But Befo's great weight and his own
feebleness
rendered that impossible; and it was some
time before he could prevail upon Techeechee to
give him assistance, and actually lay his hand on
the dreaded monster.
Dost thou not see that he loves me? cried Juan
by way of argument; He loves me because I have
done him good deeds, and treated him kindly. He
is like a man, not a tiger: he remembers a benefit
as long as an injury. Give him this help, and he
will love thee also.
Thus persuaded, the Ottomi timorously extended
his hand, and greatly emboldened to find it was not
immediately snapped off, plied his strength, which,
notwithstanding his age, was yet considerable, until
Befo was safely lodged in the boat. The poor dog
had scarce strength left to raise his head to his
master's knee, but devoured his hand with caresses,
while he sank trembling, panting, and powerless,
into the bottom of the skiff.
Thus it is with the dog, whom you call a tiger,
said Juan, in a moralizing mood, as he surveyed
his faithful friend: Black or white, red or
olive-hued
,
whom he once loves, he loves well. Happy
or wretched, proud or lowly, it is all one: he asks
not if his master be a villain. A tiger in courage,
in strength, and vindictiveness, he is yet a lamb,
the fawn of a doe,in the hands of his master.
Feed him, he loves youstarve him, he loves you
beat him, still does he love you. Once gain his
affection, and you cannot cast it off: the rich man
cannot bribe his love with gold, and bread will not
seduce him away;nay, he will sometimes pine
away on your grave. His name has been made a
by-word for all that is base and villanousI know
not why, unless it is because, being the fondest and
most confiding of living creatures, he is thefore the
worst used: but the word is a satire upon our own
injustice. Look at him, Techeechee, and at me:
I have been ever poor and well nigh friendlessI
gave him to one who is as a prince among men:
yet when hehis then master,struck at me with
his sword, this dog seized the weapon with his
teeth; he came to me when I lay in prison, he
sprang to me when I was dying in the lake, and he
perilled his life, as thou hast seen, that he might
have the poor privilege to follow me. I am a
beggar
and an outcast, a man degraded and, it may
be, soon outlawed:yet does this poor creature
love me none the less. Ay, Befo! it is all one to
thee, what I am, and whither I go!
To this eulogium, which the desolate youth
pronounced
with much feeling, Techeechee answered
not a word; for though the expressions were
Mexican
,
their purport was beyond his comprehension.
He merely stared with much admiration upon the
good understanding which seemed to exist between
his companion and a creature that was in his eyes
so terrific. But the endearments mutually shared
by two creatures of a race so different, and yet in
heart so much alike, had the good effect to deprive
him of many of his fears, so that he plied his paddle
with good-will, and, the wind abating, rapidly
shortened
the distance that still divided them from the
island city.
He had already put a wide sheet of water
between
him and the battle, and when the Indian
fleet, beaten off, or satisfied with the mischief done,
began to retreat, followed by such of the
brigantines
as were in plight to pursue, it was easy to
preserve so much of the distance gained as to be
beyond the reach of danger. The flash of a
falconet
occasionally burst dimly behind, its heavy roar
startling back the breeze; and sometimes a cannon
ball came skipping over the surges close by. But,
the wind being against the Spaniards, it was soon
seen that there were left no Indians upon whom to
exercise their arms, unless such as had, in their
consternation, lost sight of the dim beacon, and
remained
paddling about the lake at random.
CHAPTER IV.
When
morning broke over the lake, the voyagers
were still at a league's distance from the city. The
wind had died away, the clouds parted in the
heaven
,
and long before the sunlight trembled on
the snows of Iztaccihuatl, the morning-star was
seen peeping over its summit. It bade fair for a
goodly day, and Juan, despite his situation, which,
rightly considered, was in every point of view,
wretched enough, began to feel a sensation of
pleasure, as he breathed the fresh air at liberty,
and looked around him on the fair prospects,
disengaging
themselves each moment from the rolling
mists. Though the tops of the higher mountains
of the east were visible, the lower borders of the
lake in that quarter, as well as to the north and
south, were yet concealed under vapours. In the
west, however, the view was but little obstructed,
and he could behold, distinctly enough, the dense
masses of edifices, which covered the whole island
of Mexico and many a broad acre of water around
it. The huge pyramids, with their tower-like
sanctuaries
,
rose proudly, as of yore, high above the
surrounding buildings; the turrets and pinnacles,
that crowned the royal palaces and the houses of
nobles, still gleamed in the morning air; and, as he
drew nigh, he could see the gardens of shrubs and
flowers on the terraces, which gave to the whole
city a look of verdure strange and beautiful to
behold
.
As soon as objects became distinct, Techeechee,
observing that Juan's garments were yet dripping
with wet, took from the prow of the canoe a little
bundle, from which he drew a broad, richly
ornamented
tilmaltli, or cloak, a
maxtlatl
, or cloth to
wrap round the loins, sandals for the feet, fillets
for the hair, and a fan of feathers to protect the
eyes from sunshine. These he proffered to Juan,
giving him to understand that he should forthwith
doff his Christian weeds, and appear in the guise
of a Mexican noble; telling him, at the same time,
that they had been provided by Guatimozin, in
anticipation
of his deliverance. Yet neither
remonstrance
nor entreaty could prevail upon him to do
more than throw off his reeking surcoat, and
supply
its place by the Indian cloak, which was of
sufficient capacity, when folded about his person,
almost to conceal his under attire, now in a great
measure dried by the warmth of his body. This
being accomplished to his satisfaction, Techeechee
resumed his paddle, and fixing his eyes upon the
imperial city, began to mumble, in an under voice,
certain snatches of native airs, which, both in
quality and pitch, bore no little resemblance to the
suppressed growlings, or rather the groaning of an
imprisoned lion, and which, had Juan required any
such testimony, would have proved how little his
commerce with the Conquerors and his personal
affection for himself, had withdrawn his heart
from the people and the faith of Montezuma.
As he advanced still nearer to the city, his air
grew more confident, his tones more resolute and
animated; and, by and by, without seeming to
regard
the presence of the young Spaniard, he
lanched
boldly into a sort of national anthem, in which the
military pride of the Mexicans was mingled with
the gloom of their ferocious superstitions. The
melody was rude and savage,or rather it was
no melody at all, but a chant or recitative, which
was relieved from monotony only by the variations
of emphasis, which became stronger and stronger,
as the distance waxed less and less to the city. To
express the words employed in any of the metrical
modes of civilized song, would be to rob the roundelay
of its identity; for rhythm and melody were equally
set at defiance;at least, so it would have seemed
to an ear accustomed only to the natural music of
iambics and dactyls. We will therefore express
them in unambitious prose, only premising that
before
the barbarian had proceeded far in the chant,
the song was caught up and continued by the
warriors in the fleet of canoes, now paddling out
of the mists behind, and by many infidels who
watched its approach from the shore, and from
an island crag, strongly fortified, that lay a little
to the east of the city.
Mexitli Tetzauhteotl,
[1]
[1]
Mexitli, the Terrible God.
o-ah! o-ah! thus sang
the pagan,the son of the woman
Coatlicue, or Coatliquay, a religieuse, and sort of
lady-abbess, of a mythic era. She was deified as the
Goddess of Flowers.A strange mother for such a son.
But the Mexicans carried a sword in one hand, and a flower
in the other.
of Tula.
`Mother, I will protect you.'
The words of the god, yet unborn, when the life of
Coatlicue was threatened by her
human
children.
The green plume
is on his head, the wing of the eagle is on his leg,
his forehead is blue like the firmament; he carries
a spear and buckler, and with the fir-tree of
Colhuacan
,
The Hunchbacked Mountain, on the sides of which
the Mexicans won their first recorded victory.
he crushes the mountains. `Mother, I
will protect you.' Am not I the son of Mexico? and
is not Mexico the daughter of Mexitli? O-ah,
o-ah! Mexitli Tetzauhteotl!
My father ate the heart of Xochimilco! Where
was Painalton, the god of the swift foot, when the
Miztecas ran to the mountains? `Fast, warrior,
fast!' said Painalton, brother of Mexitli. His
footprint
is on the snows of Iztaccihuatl, and on the
roof of Orizaba.
[2]
[2]
Pojautecatl
, in Mexican.
Tochtepec and Chinantla,
Matlatzinco
and Oaxaca, they shook under his feet, as
the hills shake, when Mictlanteuctli, king of hell,
groans in the caverns. So my father killed the
men of the south, the men of the east and west,
and Mexitli shook the fir-tree with joy, and
Painalton
danced by night among the stars.
Where is the end of Mexico? It begins in
Huehuetapallan in the north, and who knows the
place of Huehuetapallan?
Huethuetapallan, was the name of the unknown land,
from which came all the hordes of Toltecs and Aztecs. One
remarkable circumstance connected with the famous ruined
city near to Palenque in Guatemala, seems to have escaped
the theorists. It is said that the Indians call this city by the
name of Huehuetapallan. It is far to the
south
of Mexico.
In the south, it sees
the lands of crocodiles and vultures,the bog and
the rock, where man cannot live. The sea washes
it on the east, the sea washes it on the west, and
that is the endWho has looked to the end of the
waters? It is the land of blossoms,the land of
the tiger-flower, and the cactus-bud that opens at
night like a star,of the flower-of-the-dead,
The Dahlia.
that
ghosts come to snuff at, and of the hand-flower,
Arbol de las Manitas
the marvellous tree, of which,
besides that in the present Botanic Garden, there are
supposed
to be but two more specimens in the land, unless
known only to the Indians.
which our gods planted among the hills. It is a
land dear to Mexitli.
Who were the enemies of Mexico? Their heads
are in the walls of the House of Skulls, and the
VOL. II. 4
little child strikes them, as he goes by, with a
twig. Once, Mexico was a bog of reeds, and
Mexitli slept on a couch of bulrushes: our god
sits now on a world of gold, and the world is Mexico.
Will any one fight me? I am a Mexican.Mexitli
is the god of the brave. Our city is fair on the
island, and Mexitli sleeps with us. When he calls
me in the morning, I grasp the quiver,the quiver
and the axe; and I am not afraid. When he winds
his horn from the temple, I know that he is my
father
,
and that he looks at me, while I fight. Sound
the horn of battle, for I see the spear of a foe!
Mexitli Tetzauteotl, we are the men of Mexico!
With such roundelays as these, echoed at a
distance
by the rowers in the fleet and by many
barbarians
from the buildings that projected into the
lake, Techeechee urged the light canoe through a
sluice in the northern dike, and approached that
long neck or peninsula, once the island of
Tlatelolco
,
but long since united to that of Tenochtitlan,
which gave its name to the fifth quarter of the city,
and, as it afterwards appeared, was the site of the
noblest of the many palaces, built at different
periods
,
by the kings of Mexico. A large portion of
the peninsula, midway between its extremity and
the ancient bank of the island of Tenochtitlan, was
occupied by a garden, divided from the lake by a
wall lofty enough to secure it against the assault of
a foe, and yet sufficiently low to expose to the eye
of a spectator on the lake, the rich luxuriance of
groves, among whose waving boughs could be
traced the outlines of a spacious edifice, profusely
decorated with turrets and observatories, some of
which were of great height and singular structure.
Against this wall, through a fleet of fishing
canoes
,
now paddling out into the lake, Techeechee
seemed to direct the little skiff, much to Juan's
surprise
,
until, having drawn nigher, he perceived that
it was perforated by several gateways or sallyports,
very low, and evidently designed to give entrance
only to the humble vessels which composed the
Mexican navy. The largest was wide enough to
admit two or three of the largest piraguas abreast,
and the smaller ones seemed intended only for the
private gondolas of the royal family. All were
defended
by stout wickets, which, as Juan soon
perceived
,
were raised and let fall from within,
somewhat
in the manner of a portcullis.
The tranquillity that seemed to reign within this
sanctified recess, betrayed at once its royal
character
.
In every other quarter of the city, as he
passed it, Juan could hear a roaring hum, as if
proceeding
from a vast multitude pent within the
narrow
island,as was indeed the case, the whole
military strength of the empire being concentrated
within the limits of the island and the shore-cities
that commanded the causeways. But here all was
a profound calm, broken only by the songs of birds,
and, occasionally, by what seemed the cry of some
tamed and domesticated beast of prey.
As Techeechee urged the canoe towards one of
the smaller gateways, Juan beheld the wicket
ascend from the water, but without seeing by whom
or in what manner, it was raised. An instant after,
he was on the very point of entering the narrow
chasm, perhaps never more to repass it. He turned
his eye back again to the lake, and strove to
discover
the dim lines and masses of shore and city,
palace and pyramid, among which he had so lately
dwelt in sorrow and confinement. The mists were
nearly dispersed, and the sky was clear; but the
fiery track of the rising sun over the lake, dazzled
his eyes, and, with a veil of radiance, hid the towers
of Tezcuco. He caught an indistinct view of two
or three brigantines, becalmed at a distance from
the shore, which they were endeavouring to regain
by the force of oars; but the city of the
Acolhuacanese
was no longer visible; and by and by, the
whole prospect of the lake was shut out by the
garden
wall, under which he had passed. He had
scarce turned away his eyes, when the wicket
sunk, with a plunge, into the water. He looked
back: but those who had loosed it, were already
hidden among the shrubbery. It seemed as if the
falling of that portal had shut him out for ever from
the society of his countrymen. His companions
were now to be found among the uncivilized and
the godless.
A narrow canal, bordered with banks of flowers,
conducted the canoe from the gateway to a little
stone basin, planted round with trees, at the roots
of which were placed carved blocks of stone, as if
designed for seats. Here Techeechee sprang ashore,
followed by Juan and Befo, the latter now
completely
refreshed, and, though evidently somewhat
surprised, and even daunted, by the novelty of his
situation, without showing any symptoms of having
repented his change of masters.
The Great Eagle is in the house of the king, his
brother, said the Ottomi, and his enemies cannot
reach him,no, not even if they were the Tlatoani
of the great city. Sit down then, and be at peace;
for presently the king will come from the lake, and
speak to his brother. Techeechee will go to the
wall and look out. The big tiger,the dog,
Pepo.He had already acquired the dog's name,
or as near an approach to it as his organs could
overmaster, and was not a little pleased, when the
animal, raising his head at the sound, stalked
amicably
towards him, rubbing his nose against him
in token of good-will. Pepo! amigo, friend, good
rascal! he said, affectionately, but not without
some nervousnessvery pretty Pepo,
Techeechee's
brother. Guatimozin is the Young Eagle's
brother; Techeechee will be Pepo's! Then, Befo
having returned to Juan, he continued, Let not
Pepo roam through the garden; the watchmen on
the walls would think him a tiger escaped from his
cage, and shoot him with arrows. This is the Pool
of the Full Moon: here the king will come to his
brother.
So saying, Techeechee glided away through the
shrubbery, and was presently seen ascending the
wall, by certain steep steps constructed for the
purpose
,
up to a ledge, undoubtedly prepared to give
footing to defenders, from which he could overlook
the outer parapet, and enjoy an extensive view of
the lake.
And now the outcast Juan, after giving way, for
a few moments, to a grief that was the stronger
perhaps, from the opportunity thus offered of
indulging
it in secret, began gradually to be moved
by other feelings, in which curiosity soon became
predominant; and looking about him, he beheld
with his own eyes an example of the strange and
barbaric magnificence which characterized the royal
gardens of Anahuac.
The sun was already high in the east, and the
last rain-drop was exhaling from the leaf. The sky
was cloudless, the waters were at rest. It was such
a day as lent beauty to objects not in themselves
fair; and to the green brilliance of foliage and the
harmonious hues of flowers it imparted a loveliness
as dear to the imagination as the senses. It was
the spring time, too,the season of Nature's
triumph
and rejoicing.
The Pool of the Full Moon, as Techeechee had
called it, doubtless, from its circular shape, and its
diminutive size, was surrounded by a wall of trees
as dense as that which enclosed the memorable
pond in the garden of Tezcuco. But besides the
4*
addition of the stone seats and basin, it was
ornamented
with banks of the richest flowers, behind
which rose a thick setting of shrubbery; and from
the branches of the trees hung rich tufts and
festoons
of that gray mossthe Barba de Espaa,
which gives an air of such indescribable solemnity
to the forests of the lower Mississippi. A few little
birds warbled among the boughs, and the
field-cricket
chirped in the bushes. In other respects
the place was silent and wholly solitary; and as
its green walls shut out almost altogether the
spectacles disclosed from other places, Juan left it,
after seeing that Techeechee maintained his stand
on the wall, as if the fleet were still at a distance.
He now perceived that the garden, though very
beautiful, was a labyrinth, or rather, as it seemed,
a wilderness of groves, glades, and fountains, some
of which last burst from mounds of stone, that were
the pedestals of rude and fantastic statues, perhaps
idols, and some spouted up into the air, from the
mouths of porphyry serpents and dragons, as if the
science of hydraulics had already begun to dawn
upon the minds of the Mexican artisans. The
noblest cypresses rose over the humblest vine, and
many a convolvulus rolled its cataract of flowers
over the tops of lesser trees, and many an aloe,
from a vast pyramid of leaves, reared up its lofty
pillar, crowned with a yellow canopy of blossoms.
All the splendour of the vegetable world known to
Anahuac, found its place in this magnificent
retreat
:
and the plants of the lower zones, and even
the palms of the coast, had been made to thrive side
by side with those productions which were natural
to the elevated valley.
Besides these ornaments and a thousand similar,
the animal kingdom was made to add a charm,
and, as it soon appeared, a horror to the royal
garden
;
for Juan had no sooner left the pool, than he
beheld, besides a thousand birds of every dye
among the trees, some half dozen deer frisking
over the glades, and heard at but a little distance,
the roar of fiercer animals, such as came to his ears,
while he was yet on the lake.
At a sound so hostile, Befo bristled and uttered
a low bark, as if to apprize his master of the
presence
of danger; but Juan knew enough of the
habits of the Mexican kings to understand that their
gardens, besides enclosing all that was beautiful
among plants, contained also aviaries and
menageries
,
in which were collected the birds and beasts
of their empire;in other words, they were
Zoological
Gardens, such as the advance of science is
now establishing in the countries of Europe. A
little fawn, feeding hard by, started with more terror
at this unusual cry of Befo, than at any of the
howls to which it had been long accustomed, and
ran timidly away. As it fled, Juan remarked that
its neck was encircled by a chaplet of flowers, as
if lately put on by some caressing hand.
At this sight a new impulse seemed to seize the
youth. He faltered, hesitated, cast his eye to the
wall, on which Techeechee was yet standing, and
then marking the quarter whither the little animal
had fled, he beckoned to Befo to take post at his
heels, and immediately followed.
He soon found himself among a maze of copses,
among which were scattered divers cages or
baskets, of great strength, secured to the trunks of
trees, and little paddocks equally strong, each
containing
some ferocious or untameable beast, many
of them brought from the most distant provinces.
Thus he beheld,besides an abundant display of
pumas or mitzlis, (the maneless lion,) jaguars,
wolves, ounces, and wild dogs,the bison of
Chihuahua
staggering in his pen, the antelope or
pronghorn
of the north, and even the great bear from the
ridges of the Oregon or Rocky Mountains. The
tapir of Guatemala rolled by his fenny pool, and
the peccary herded hard by. Here were apes,
ant-eaters, porcupines, and a thousand other
animals
;
and among them, imprisoned with the same
jealous care, in suitable cages, were the reptiles of
the country,lizards and adders, and all the family
of the Crotalus, from the common rattlesnake of
America to that frightful one of Mexico and South
America, which has been distinguished as
especially
the Horrid. Here was the phosphorescent
cencoatl
, whose path through the bushes and grass
by night is said to be indicated by the gleaming
light of his body; the
tlilcoa
, or great black
serpent
of the mountains, and the still more
formidable
and gigantic
canauhcoatl
, or Boa-Constrictor,
which, like his neighbour, the cayman or crocodile,
from the same boiling fens of the coast, made his
prey upon the largest stags, and even human beings.
With these were many smaller snakes,
distinguished
for their beauty, and sometimes their docility,
some of which latter, entirely harmless, were
allowed
to crawl about at liberty.
It would require a book by itself, to particularize
and describe all the members of this fearful
convocation
of monsters; of which it was afterwards
written by Bernal Diaz, that when the beasts and
reptiles were provoked and irritated, so as to howl
and hiss together, `the palace seemed like hell
itself
.'
It is very certain that Befo lost much of his
dignity of carriage at the mere sight of such
assembled
terrors, creeping along reluctantly and
with draggling tail; and Juan himself was not
without some sensations of alarm, as he found
himself
now startled by the growl of an angry mitzli,
now perturbed by the sudden rustling of a boa
among the dried reeds of his couch. The
rattle-snakes
shook their castanets at his approach, the
cayman tumbled, with a sudden plunge, into his
muddy pool, the wolf showed his sharp teeth, and
the ape darted towards him from the tree, with a
wild, chattering, and half hostile scream. But he
had remarked that the little fawn directed its
course immediately through the thickest of the
assemblage; and if that circumstance did not
convince
him of the safety of the path, he was certainly
ashamed to show less courage than the young of
a doe. He therefore trudged onwards, and, in a
few moments, exchanged the scene for one less
frightful, though not less striking.
He was now among the birds of Mexico. A
grove,it might have seemed a forest,of lofty
trees, was covered over with a curious contrivance
of nets, some of which were confined to their tops,
while others were made to surround the shrubbery
at their roots, in all which were confined the noisy
prisoners. Other nets were flung over little
pools, whose banks and surface were enlivened by
the presence of water-fowl. In some places cages
were hung upon the trees, containing the more
precious or unmanageable captives. Through this
grove one might penetrate in all conceivable
directions
,
and seem to be confined along with its
feathered
inhabitants, and yet be really separated from
them by the nets.
The outer portion or border of the grove, was
devoted to the endless tribe of parrots, whose
magnificent
colours gave a beauty to the treetops, not
to be lessened even by the horrid clamour of their
voices. The singing birds were confined within
the silent recesses of its centre.
If curiosity and a mere love of barbarous display,
without other motive, had collected together in the
gardens of Mexico her beasts and reptiles, utility
had some little influence in the selection of her
birds. Their feathers were devoted to a thousand
purposes of ornament, and among others, to the
construction of those very singular Mosaic works,
or pictures, which have won the admiration even
of European painters and virtuosos. But while
thus providing for the supply of one of the most
elegant of wants, the Mexican kings secured to
themselves the means of adding the loveliest and
most natural feature to their gardens. It would
be impossible to convey any just idea of the splendid
creatures that went wandering and leaping, like
sunbeams, among the leaves and over the grass.
Eagles and kites sat on the trees, and storks,
herons
,
and flamingos stalked through the pools.
Here the macaw flashed, screaming, through the
boughs; there the wood-pigeon sat cooing by his
mate. The little
madrugador
, or early-riser, the
happiest of his species, who chirps up his
companions
,
when the morning-star peeps from the
horizon
,
repeated his jovial note; the white-sparrow,
the calandra, the cardinal, the sable-and-golden
orible
,
and the little spotted tiger-bird, added their
charming voices; and the Centzontli, or
mocking-bird
,
as it is trivially called, for it is worthy of a
name much more poetical and dignified, whistled
and sang with such a power and variety of melody,
as left all other songsters in the back-ground. The
little
chupa rosas
,rose-pickers, or humming-birds,
darted about from blossom to blossom, needing
and acknowledging no bonds save those of
attachment
to their favourite flowers.
Through this delightful grove Juan stepped,
enchanted
with its music; and following a pleasant
path, over which there echoed no notes louder than
those of the little wood-pigeon, such as the traveller
yet hears cooing in the copse that surmounts the
mouldered pyramid of Cholula, he was soon
introduced
to a spectacle more striking, more lovely,
and to him far more captivating, than any he had
yet beheld.
CHAPTER V.
In
a green nook, exceedingly sequestered, and
peculiarly beautified by banks of the richest flowers,
were five Indian maidens, three of whom danced
under the trees on the smooth grass, to the sound
of a little pipe or flute, that was played by a fourth.
The other, half kneeling, reclined hard by, fastening
a chaplet of flowers round the neck of a fawn,
younger and tamer than that which had fled from
Befo, and which was now seen frisking uneasily,
or perhaps jealously, about its companion.
Young, pretty, and robed with such simplicity as
might have become the Hamadryads of Thessaly,
revelling around the green oaks with which their
fate was so inseparably connected, the dancers
might indeed have been esteemed nymphs of the
wood, as they moved gracefully and a-tiptoe over
the velvet grass, all unconscious of the presence of
any person or anything to make them afraid. Their
naked feet and arms glimmered with ornaments of
gold and native rubies; and the white
cueitl
, or
cymar, with a peculiar vest or jacket of brilliant
colours, while allowing unrestrained motion to
their limbs, gave almost a classic and statuary
beauty to their figures. The youthful musician
leaned against a tree, pleasantly absorbed in the
melody she was drawing from the pipe; while the
fifth maiden, for whose amusement the diversion
was obviously continued, was too much occupied
with the pet animal, whose ambition seemed rather
to be to browse upon the chaplet than to wear it,
to give much attention to either the dance or the
roundelay.
The whole scene was one of enchanting
innocence
and repose; and even Befo, who was wont
to indicate the presence of a stranger with a growl,
betrayed no token of dissatisfaction, so that Juan
stood for a little time gazing on, entirely unseen.
His looks were fastened upon her to whom the
musician and the dancers were but attendants, and
who, from other circumstances, had a stronger
claim on his regard.
In her he beheld the young infidel, whose
influence
over his mind, operating upon it only for good,
had altered the whole current of his fortunes, and
changed what had once seemed a destiny of
aggrandisement
and renown, into a career of
suffering
and contumely. He was now in the presence
of one, for whom he had incurred the hatred of a
vindictive rival, (for all his miseries were dated
from the period of his quarrel with Guzman;) for
whose sake he had refused the intercession, and
spurned the affection, of the still more unhappy
Magdalena; and for whom he now thought that
even the last and greatest of his griefs, his exile
from Christian companionship, was a happiness,
since it promised her the inestimable gift of a faith,
which he would have gladly purchased her with his
life. How far a barbarian and the daughter of a
barbarian
was worthy of, and capable of inspiring, an
affection so romantic and so noble, we must
inquire
of our hearts, rather than our reason.
She was of that age, which, in our northern
climes would have constituted her a girl, but which,
in a tropical region, entitled her to the name of
woman
.
Her figure was neither mean nor low, but
of such exquisite proportions as, in these days of
voluntary degeneration, are seldom found except
among the children of nature. Her skin was, for
her race, wonderfully fair; and yet there were,
even among the men of Mexico, skins much lighter
than those of some of the Spaniards, of which
Guatimozin
was a famous example. Her dress was
similar in fashion to that of the other damsels, but
consisted of many more garments, according to the
mode of the very wealthy and noble maidens, who
were accustomed to wear one cueitl over another,
each successive one being shorter than the
preceding
,
so that the borders of each could be
distinguished
.
Thus, when they were of different
colours
,
as was often the case, the whole figure, from
the ankles to the waist, seemed enveloped in one
voluminous garment, distinguished by broad
horizontal
stripes, exceedingly gay and brilliant. The
colours upon the garments of this maiden were of
a more modest character, and richness was given
to them rather by borders singularly embroidered
in gold and gems, than by any splendour of tints.
A little vest or bodice of very peculiar fancy was
worn over the shoulders and bosom, secured by a
girdle that might have been called a chain, since it
was composed of links of gold. Her arms were
bare like the others', and her feet, not entirely naked,
as was the case with the rest, were protected by a
sort of pretty shoes, too complete to be called
sandals
,
and yet too low to be mocasins. With this
graceful figure, was a face, singularly sweet and
even beautiful, with eyes so broad, so large, so dark,
so lustrously mild and saintlike in expression, that
they rivalled those of the young fawn she was
caressing
,
and perhaps, more than the trivial
circumstance
presently to be mentioned, had contributed
to obtain for her a name, by which her countrymen
seemed to compare her to the lights of heaven.
Among the gold ornaments and gems of emerald
and ruby, with which her hair was interwoven in
VOL. II. 5
braids, was a large jewel of pearls, the rarest, and
therefore the most precious, of trinkets in
Tenochtitlan
.
It was in the form of a star, to which it bore as
much resemblance among the sable midnight of her
hair, as does the snowy blossom of the great Magnolia
amid the dusky obscurity of its evergreen boughs.
Upon this vision Juan could have gazed for
hours; but the fawn which he had followed to the
retreat, perceiving the formidable Befo so close at
hand, bleated out a hasty alarm, and thus directed
upon him the eyes of the whole party. The dance
and the music ceased; the maidens screamed, and
would have fled, but for the sense of duty which
constrained them to await the bidding of their
mistress
.
She, though much alarmed at the sight of
neighbours so unexpected, yet mingled with her
terror feelings which kept her chained to the spot,
while the attendants clustered around her, confused,
and anxious to fly.
As soon as Juan perceived the alarm of the party,
and saw the eyes of the princess directed upon him,
he bent a knee half to the earth, as if in the
presence
of a princess of Christendom, saying gently,
I am Juan Lerma, a Castilianan exile from
the Spanish camp, entreating welcome from my
enemies
,
and yet am no enemy. Fear me not,
daughter
of Montezuma; and fear not this animal, who
shall be to thee as harmless as the young fawns.
At these words, pronounced in their own tongue,
and with a voice so mild and conciliating, the
maidens
recovered somewhat from their fright, and
assuming
at once an air characteristically sedate, cast
their eyes upon the earth, while the young princess
stood regarding Juan, with a countenance
indicative
of many changing emotions. Seeing, when he
had finished, that he preserved an attitude of
submissive
respect and expectation, she stepped
timidly
forward, and presenting him the garland which
she had failed to secure around the neck of the
favourite
,
said artlessly, and yet with both dignity
and decision,
The king is the Great Eagle's friend; the
daughter
of Montezuma is his bondmaidhe is welcome
to Mexico. I remember the friend of Montezuma
my father,I remember the good acts of the
Christian.He is welcome.
Then putting the chaplet into his hand, and
taking
this into her own, with a confidence that was
perhaps as much the result of unsophisticated
feelings
as of peculiar customs, she touched it with
her forehead,indicating by her words, her gift,
and her act of ceremonious salutation, that, with
her welcome, she confessed the obligation of
friendship
and gratitude for acts of past kindness.
I will wear the garland upon my breast, said
Juan, with a look of purer satisfaction than he had
shown for many long days; and if heaven grant
me fulfilment of the hope that is nearest to my
heart, I will wear it there for ever. Noble and
lovely maiden, I am here by the will of Guatimozin,
I know not well for what purpose, nor how long
I shall be suffered to remain in your presence.
This, at least, is certain: the dark day of war has
arisen, and this happy garden may soon become a
theatre of fierce contention, in which the fairest
and the best may perish at the same hour with the
worst. Let not that day find Zelahualla without
the Christian's cross on her bosom.
Guatimozin will drive the wicked from the
land, said Zelahualla, mildly. Has my lord the
Great Eagle forsaken his wicked people, and will
he yet cling to their gods? After a time, Centeotl,
the mother of heaven and the earth, will prevail
over Mexitli, and redeem men from sorrow: then
will men bleed no more on the pyramids, but
flowers
and fruits will be the only sacrifices demanded
by heaven. How is it with the gods of Spain? do
they not call for victims for ever? The gods of our
land are more just and merciful.
Alas, said Juan, this is a delusion brought
upon you by our sinful acts, not by any defects of
our holy religion. Know, Zelahualla, that there are
no gods but ONE, and He is both just and merciful,
the god alike of the heathen and the Christian.
But of this I will not speak to you now; though
perhaps I may never have opportunity to speak
again. If death should come upon you suddenly,
call then, in that grievous hour, upon the name of
the Christian's God, and he will not refuse to hear
you, who are in ignorance, and therefore sinless.
And wear upon your neck this cross, given to me
by one who was a beloved friend. (It was the
gift of Magdalena.) Look upon it with reverence,
and heaven may vouchsafe a miracle in your favour.
Let it not be forgotten, when danger comes to
you.
The spirit of the Propaganda had infected the
minds of all the Spaniards in America. The
ambition
of conversion was inseparably linked with that
of conquest; and on all occasions, except those of
actual battle, the rage of making proselytes was
uppermost
in the minds of many. This was
undoubtedly
fanaticism, and, in the case of the fierce and
avaricious, it developed itself with all the odious
features of superstition. With a few of more gentle
and kindly natures, it was a nobler and more
benignant
passion. While others sought proselytes
for the glory of the church, these thought only of
doing good to man. The best, the most
enthusiastic
and successful missionaries, were those whose
efforts were prompted by affection. The first
impulse
,
therefore, of Juan, who had long since felt
and cherished, even among distant deserts, a strong
interest in the fate of this young princess, was to
secure to her the blessings of salvation, which his
religious instruction could not lead him to hope for
any one dying in unbelief. It was a consequence
and evidence of affection; but a still stronger proof
was given, when he drew from his breast a little
silver cross, which, up to this moment, he had
treasured
with the most jealous regard, and proffered
it to Zelahualla. It was, as has been mentioned,
the gilt of Magdalena, presented before the evil acts
of Hilario and Villafana had interrupted the
affection
fast ripening in Juan's heart, and accepted
because
it possessed little value beyond that imputed
by consecration and superstition. It was, indeed,
as Magdalena had told him, the gift of her deceased
mother, and she had always been taught to believe
it possessed some of the extraordinary virtues of a
talisman. In these virtues Juan was sufficiently
benighted to believe; and it was perhaps for this
reason, rather than from any grateful memory of
the giver, that he had from that day worn it in
secret upon his bosom, so that it had even escaped
the hands of his jailers in Mechoacan, and from the
eyes of his Spanish companions. It was a proof of
the pure and disinterested nature of his regard for
the Indian princess, as well as of his reliance upon
its heavenly protection, that he could rob himself of
a relic so prized, in order that its presence might
secure to her the benefits of a belief she neither
understood nor professed.
If such were his own superstition, it could not
be supposed that Zelahualla's was less in degree.
On the contrary, she received the humble trinket
with a look of respect as well as gratitude, saying
with the greatest simplicity,
What the Great Eagle loves must be good, and
Zelahualla will listen when his god speaks to her.
Is it possible, thought Juan, while flinging the
chain of silver beads by which it was secured
5 *
round his neck, that a creature so beautiful and
so goodso pure, so innocent, so lovely to the
eye and the thoughtshould be really a pagan and
barbarian?
The question was indeed natural enough. A
sweeter impersonation of beauty both mental and
corporeal, could scarcely be imagined; and the
light of her eyes was so mild and seraphic, that one
might wonder whence it came, if not from the
operation
of that divine belief, which chases from the
heart the impurer traits of nature.
What further thoughts might have crowded into
Juan's breast, and what might have been the
conclusion
of an interview so interesting, it is not
necessary
to imagine. While he was yet securing
the chain around the bended neck of the princess,
a step, previously heralded by the growl of Befo,
rang upon the walk, and the Lord of Death,
followed
at a little distance by Techeechee, stalked
into the covert, arrayed in all the Mexican panoply
of war and knighthood. Instead of a tunic of
cotton
cloth or other woven material, he wore,
doubtless
over some stronger protection, a sort of
hauberk
of dressed tiger's skin, fitting tight to his
massive chest, and bordered by a skirt of long
feathers, reaching nearly to his knees. On his
head was a helmet or cap which had once adorned
the skull of the same ferocious animal, the teeth
and ears flapping about his temples, and the skin
of the legs, with the talons remaining, hanging at
the sides over his shoulders and breast, waving
about in connexion with his long black locks and
the scarlet tufts among them. His shield of stout
cane-work, painted, and ornamented with a long
waving penacho of feathers, hung at his back, and
a macana of gigantic size swung from his wrist.
His legs were swathed, merry-andrew-wise, with
ribands of scarlet and gilded leather, that seemed
to begin at his sandals; and his arms, otherwise
naked, were ornamented up to the elbow in a
similar
way. On the whole, his appearance was
highly formidable and impressive, and not the less
so that many marks of blood, crusted about his
person, as well as divers rents in his spotted
hauberk
,
told how recently and how valiantly he had
borne his part in the terrors of conflict.
As he entered the covert, his step was bold,
springy, and majestic, such as belongs to the native
American warrior, when he treads the prairie and
the mountain, beyond the ken of the white man.
It happened that his ear being struck by the growl
of Befo, his attention was not immediately directed
to the princess and her companion; but, seeing
the dog, and conceiving at once, though not
without
surprise, the cause of his presence, he turned
round in search of his master, and beheld him
engaged
securing the relic around the neck of the
daughter of Montezuma.
At this sight, his countenance changed from the
haughty joy of a soldier, and darkened with gloom
and displeasure. He even grasped his macana,
and took a stride towards the pair, who were
unconscious
of his intrusion, until Befo made it
evident
by a louder growl, and by taking a stand,
ready to dispute the warrior's right of approach.
The person of the Lord of Death was at first
unknown to Juan; but he beheld enough in his
visage to convince him it was not that of a friend.
Still, he knew too much of the almost slavish
reverence
with which even the highest nobles regarded
their king and the child of a king, to apprehend any
danger from the warrior's wrath. In this belief he
was justified by the act of the barbarian, who,
perceiving
Zelahualla look towards him with surprise,
released the weapon from his grasp, and sinking
into the lowest obeisance of humility, kissed the
earth at her feet. Then rising and surveying her
with a melancholy, but deeply respectful look, he
said,
What am I but a slave before the daughter of
Montezuma? The young man of the east is the
king's brother. I speak the words of Guatimozin:
`My brother shall look to-day upon the king of
Mexico, with the crown upon his head, at the
rock of Chapoltepec, among the people.' These
are the words of the king. Shall the king's brother
obey the king?
Doth Guatimozin call the Eagle his brother?
exclaimed Zelahualla, with a look of the greatest
satisfaction. Then shall no evil befall him among
the people. Let my lord the Christian and Great
Eagle depart, and fear not: for the men of Mexico
know that he was good to the king and the king's
daughter, when the king was a captive; and
therefore
Zelahualla will remember what he says of the
god of the silver cross.
Thus summoned, and thus dismissed, Juan
withdrew
his eyes from the beaming and singularly
engaging countenance of the maiden, and looked
to the Lord of Death, as if to signify his readiness
to depart. But the Lord of Death seemed for a
moment to have lost his powers of locomotion. He
remained gazing upon the princess with an aspect
increasing in gloom, and once or twice seemed as
if he would have spoken something in anger and
reprehension. Yet deterred by the divinity of
royalty that hedged about her, or more probably
by the divinity of her beauty, he roused up at last,
and, after making another deep reverence, which
was as if a lion had bowed down at the feet of a
doe, he strode away without speaking, followed by
Juan and Techeechee.
From Techeechee Juan learned what he had in
in part gathered from the obscure expressions of the
noble: He was summoned to witness the
coronation
of the young king in form before the
assembled
Mexicans, on the consecrated hill of
Chapoltepec
,
on which occasion he was to be honoured and
his person made sacred, by the king bestowing on
him the title of friend and brother.
The path led Juan as before through the royal
menagerie; and while passing among the wild
beasts, Techeechee signified to the Christian that
the presence of Befo among the Mexicans would
subject him to much difficulty, if not danger; and
would certainly, the moment he was seen, produce
a confusion in the assemblage, indecorous to the
occasion, and highly displeasing to the king and the
Mexican dignitaries. To this Juan justly assented,
and not knowing in what other manner he could
dispose of his faithful attendant, he agreed, at
Techeechee's
suggestion, to confine him in one of the
several empty cages, wherein he was assured and
believed, he would remain in safety. This being
accomplished, and not without trouble, he
endeavoured
with caresses to reconcile the animal to his
novel imprisonment, and then left him.
He found the Lord of Death at the pool, with a
piragua, very singularly carved and ornamented, in
which were six Mexicans, known at once by their
dress to be warriors of established reputation, the
rules of Mexican chivalry not allowing any soldier,
even if the son of the king, to wear, in time of war,
any but the plainest white garment, until he had
accomplished deeds worthy of distinction. These
were arrayed in escaupil, variously ornamented
with plumes and gilded leather; they had war-clubs
and quivers, and their appearance was both martial
and picturesque.
At a signal from Masquazateuctli, they seized
their paddles and began to urge the piragua
towards
the water-gate of the wall, and Techeechee
leaping into the little canoe, Juan prepared to follow
after him. He was arrested by the Lord of Death,
who touched his arm, though not rudely, and
looking
into his face for awhile, with an expression in
which anger seemed to struggle with melancholy,
said,
The Great Eagle is the brother of Guatimozin,
Masquazateuctli is but his slave. Where would
the king's brother have been this day, had the king
not taken him from the prison-house?
In heaven, if it becomes me to say so
certainly
,
at least, in the grave, replied Juan, in some
surprise. In this capture, or this rescue, as I may
call it, the king will bear witness, I did not myself
concur; for such concurrence I esteemed
unbecoming
to my state as a Christian and Spaniard. Yet
I am not the less grateful to Guatimozin, and I
acknowledge he has given me a life.
It was a good thing of the king, said the
barbarian
;
but what is this? Are you a Spaniard in
Mexico, and alive? neither upon the block of the
pyramid, nor in the cage at the temple-yard? The
king feeds you in his house, he gives you water
from his fountain, and robes from his bed,he takes
you by his side, and, among his people, he says,
`This man is my brother; therefore look upon him
with love.' Is not this good also of the king?
It is, replied Juan, gravely; and I need not
be instructed, that it becomes me to be grateful,
even by a warrior so renowned and noble as the
Lord of Death.
The eyes of the barbarian sparkled with a fierce
fire while he continued,
What then should you look for in Mexico, but
shelter and food?a house to hide you from the
angry men of Spain, and bread to eat in your
hiding-place
?
Where are the quiver and the maca
na? Will the king's brother fight the king's
enemies
?
If they be my countrymen, the Spaniards,
no
,
replied Juan, with great resolution, yet not without
uneasiness; for he read in the question, an early
attempt to seduce him into apostacy. I am the
king's guest,his prisoner, if he will,his victim,
if it must be,but not his soldier.
Hearken then to me, said the Indian, with a
stern and magisterial voice: The king is the lord
of the valley, the master of men's lives, and the
beloved of Mexico; but he has not the heart of the
old man gray with wisdom, and he knows not the
guile of the stranger. Why should his brother do
him a wrong? The king thinks his brother a green
snake from the corn-field, to play with;
[3]
[3]
The Mexicans were accustomed to tame and
domesticate
certain harmless reptiles.
but he has
the teeth of the rattling adder!
Mexican! said Juan, indignantly, these words
from the mouth of a Spaniard, would be terms of
mortal injury; and infidel though you be, yet you
must know, they bear the sting of insult. What
warrior art thou, that canst abuse the helplessness
of a captive, and do wrong to an unarmed man?
Do I wrong thee, then? replied the Lord of
Death, grimly. Lo, thou art here safe from thy
bitter-hearted people, and wilt not even repay the
goodness of the king, by striking the necks of his
enemies, who are also thine! Is not this enough?
Put upon thee the weeds of a woman, and go sleep
in the garden of birds, afar from danger,yet call
not the birds down from the tree; hide thee in the
bush of flowers, yet pluck not the flowers from the
stem. Let the guest remember he is a guest, and
steal not from the house that gives him shelter.
Does the king's brother understand the words of
the king's slave?
I do not, said Juan, with a frown. They are
the words of a dreamer; and he would have
passed on towards the canoe, which he now
perceived
was waiting him near the wicket, but that
the Lord of Death again arrested him.
The king is good, he said with deep and
meaning accents, but the wrong-doer shall not
escape. Perhaps,and here he softened the
severity
of his speech, and even assumed a look of
friendly interest,perhaps the Great Eagle has
left his best friend among the fighting-men of
Tezcuco
?
Let him be patient for a little, and his friend
shall be given to him.
You speak to me in riddles, replied Juan,
impatiently. Let us be gone.
The Mexican gave the youth a look of the
darkest and most menacing character, and uttering
the figurative name which Guatimozin had already
applied to the princess, said,
The Centzontli is the daughter of Montezuma,
the bird that is not to be called from the tree,
the flower that is not to be pulled from the stem.
The king is good to his brother; but Mexico is not
a dog, that the Spaniard should steal away the
daughter of heaven.
Then, clutching his war-axe, as if to give more
emphasis to his warning, the nature of which was
no longer to be mistaken, he gave the young man
one more look, exceedingly black and threatening,
and strode rapidly away. The next moment, he
leaped, with the activity of a mountain-cat, into
the piragua, and speaking but a word to the rowers,
was instantly paddled into the lake.
Juan followed, not a little troubled and displeased
by the complexion and tone of the menace, and
stepping into the canoe, was soon impelled from
the garden. He perceived the piragua floating hard
by, and the Lord of Death standing erect among
the rowers. As soon as the canoe drew nigh, the
warrior-noble made certain gestures to Techeechee,
signifying that he should conduct the youth on the
voyage alone. Then giving a sign to his
attendants
,
the prow of the piragua was turned towards
the east, and, much to the surprise of Juan, and not a
little even to that of the Ottomi, was urged in that
direction with the most furious speed. As they
started, the rowers set up a yell, as if animated by
the prospect of some stirring and adventurous
exploit
.
Techeechee gazed after them for a moment, and
then handling his paddle, he directed the canoe
round the point of Tlatelolco, and was soon lost
among a multitude of similar vessels, all proceeding
to the south-west, in the direction of the hill of
Chapoltepec.
VOL. II. 6
CHAPTER VI.
The
review, division, and minute organization of
the vast army now at the disposal of the
Captain-General
,
occupied nearly the whole day, which was
unexpectedly propitious, as the rainy season might
be said to have already commenced. Clouds,
indeed
,
gathered over the sky, in the afternoon,
giving a melancholy aspect to the hills and
meadows
;
and a thick fog rose from the lake and spread
around, until it had pervaded the lower grounds
on its borders. Yet not a drop of rain fell during
the whole day, and, by sunset, the clouds dispersed,
without having disturbed the firmament with
thunder
;
and the lake was left to glimmer in the light
of a young moon, and the multitude of stars.
The whole native population of Tezcuco had
been drawn to the meadows, to witness the glories
of military parade, and the city was deserted and
solitary. Nay, even the watchmen on the walls,
forgetting the audacious assault of the past night,
and anxious to share a spectacle from which their
duties should have separated them, stole, one after
another, from their posts, until the northern gates
were left wholly unguarded. The vanity of the
Commander-in-Chief could not permit the absence
of a single effective Spaniard from the scene of
display
,
and the walls had been left to Tlascalans.
Late in the afternoon, and when the mists were
thickest, and the hues of the fields most mournful,
a single individual passed from that gate at which
Juan Lerma, eight or nine weeks before, had
terminated
the first chapter of his exile. A friar's
cassock and cowl enveloped his whole form, yet the
dullest eye would have detected in the vigour and
impetuosity of his step, the presence of passions
which could not belong to the holy profession. His
eye was fixed upon a shadowy figure, almost lost
among the mists, that went staggering along, as if
upon a course not yet defined, or over paths
difficult
to be traced; and while he was obviously
watching and pursuing the retreating shape, it
seemed to be with a confidence that feared not the
observation of the fugitive. Thus, when the figure
paused, he arrested his steps, and resumed them
only when they were resumed by the other; and,
in this manner, he followed onwards, with little
precaution, until Tezcuco was left far behind,
hidden
in the fog. As he moved, he muttered many
expressions, indicative of a deeply disturbed and
even remorseful mind.
All this have
I
done, he exclaimed, bitterly,
and almost wildly. Mine own sin, though black
as the soot of perdition, is stained a triple dye by
the malefactions it has caused in others
Mea culpa,
mea culpa, mea maxima culpa!
Cursed avarice!
cursed ambition! There
is
a retribution that follows
us even to the grave; sin is punished with sin,
the first fault lays fire to the train of our vices, and
in their explosions we are further stained,
punished
,
destroyed. That sin! and what has come of
it? Where is the gain to balance it? Cajoled
by the demon that seduced me, cheated and flung
asidesuspected, degraded, demoralizeda
wanderer
,
a villain, a curthe friend of rogues, and
myself their fittest fellowHeaven is strong, and
justice oppressive.
Munda cor meum ac labia
mea!
for I blaspheme!
Thus muttered the distracted Camarga, for it was
he who gave vent to such troubled expressions.
Some of these were uttered so loudly, that they
seemed to reach the ear of the fugitive, who turned
round, looked back for a moment, and then diving
into a misty hollow, was for a short time concealed
from his eyes.
Ay,fly, fly! he muttered, gnashing his teeth;
fly, wretch, fly! But wert thou fleeter than the
mountain-deer, thou couldst not escape the fiend
that is already tearing at thy vitals. Fling thyself
into the lake, too, and after death, open thine eyes
upon a phantom of horror, that will sit before thee
for ever!
Then pursuing with greater activity, he again
caught sight of the fugitive, who was ascending the
little promontory of the cypress-tree, on which Juan
Lerma had first beheld the faces of his
countrymen
.
And Hernan Cortes will yet have me speak the
story! he murmured. Be it solive she or die
she, he shall hear it, and curse the curiosity that
compelled it. Ay! and his anguish will be some
set-off to the joy of having triumphed over the poor
wretch he persecuted. God rest thee, Juan Lerma!
for thou at least hast died in ignorance; and but
for this mischance,this fatal mischance,hadst
been worthy of a better fate, and therefore saved
from destruction.
As he uttered these broken words, he perceived
La Monjonaza,for it was this unhappy creature
whom he followed,steal over the mound to the
right hand, as if turning her steps from the lake
landward. But being aware that she had beheld
him, and suspecting this to be merely a feint,
designed
to mislead him, he directed his course to the
water-side, and stepping among the rocks and
brambles at the base of the hill, passed it in time to
behold Magdalena stalking, with a countenance of
distraction, towards the lake, as if impelled by
some terrible goadings of mind, to self-destruction.
Wretched creature! he cried, springing
forwards
,
and staying her frenzied steps, what is
this you do? Fling not away the grace that is in
wait.
You
, at least, may live and be forgiven.
To his great surprise, the unhappy girl, whose
countenance had indicated all the iron
determination
of desperation, offered not the slightest
resistance
,
while he drew her from the water-side; but
turning towards him with the face of a maiden
detected
in some merry and harmless mischief, she
began to laugh; but immediately afterwards, burst
into tears.
Good heavens! said Camarga, with compassion,
are you indeed brought to this pass? What! the
mind that even amazed Don Hernanis it gone?
wholly gone? Miserable Magdalena! this is the
fruit of sin!
At the sound of a name, so seldom pronounced
in these lands, the lady rose from the rock, on
which she had suffered herself to be seated, although
it was observable that she showed no symptoms of
surprise. She gazed fixedly at Camarga for an
instant
,
and a dark frown gathering on her brows,
she turned to depart, without reply. Camarga,
however, detained her, and would have spoken;
but no sooner did she feel his hand laid upon her
mantle than she turned suddenly round, with a look
of inexpressible fierceness, saying with the
sternest
accents of a voice always strikingly
expressive
,
Who art thou, that comest between me and my
purpose? If a priest or an angel, fly,for here thou
art with contamination; if a man, and a bad man,
still fly, lest thou be struck dead with the breath of
one deeper plunged in guilt than thyself.If a devil,
then remain, and claim thy prey from the apostate
and murderess. Dost thou forbid me even to die?
AyI do, replied Camarga, trembling, yet less
6*
at her terrible countenance than her fearful
expressions
:
I am one who, in the name of heaven,a
name which is alike polluted in thy mouth and in
minecommand thee to recall thy senses, if they
have not utterly fled, and bid thee, thinking of
self-slaughter
no longer, leave this land of
wretchedness
,
and, in a cloister, and with a life of penitence,
obtain the pardon which heaven will not perhaps
withhold.
Pardon comes not without punishment, said
Magdalena, sternly; and I would not that it
should: and for penitence,the moaning regret
that exists without torture and suffering,know
that it is but a mockery. Kill thy friend, and
repent
,yet
dream not of paradise. Scourge
thyself
,
die on the rack or gibbet, and await thy fate
in the grave. Begone; or rest where thou art, and
follow me no more.
Till thou die, or till thou art lodged within the
walls of a convent, said Camarga, grasping her
arm with a strength and determination she could
not resist: thus far will I follow thee, rave thou
never so much. Oh, wretched creature! and wert
thou about to rush into the presence of thy Maker,
unshriven, unrepenting, unprepared?
Magdalena surveyed him with a look that
changed
gradually from anger to wistful emotion; and
then again shedding tears, she dropped on her
knees, saying, with a tone and manner that went
to his heart,
I will shrive me then, and then let me go, for
thy presence persecutes me.Well, and perhaps it
is better; for it is long since I have looked upon a
man of Godlong since I have spoken with any
just Christian but
one
,and him I have given up
to the murderers. Hear me then, and then
absolve
or condemn as thou wilt, for I judge myself;
and I confess to thee, only that my words may drive
thee away, as would the moans of a coming
pestilence
.
Hear me then, friar, and then begone from
me.
Arise, said Camarga, I seek not thy
confession
,
at least not now: I have that will draw it
from thee, at a fitter time and place. In this
distant
spot, thou art exposed to danger from the
infidels
.
If thou fearest them, away! Why dost thou
trouble me! If thou stayest, listen to my words;
for though they come too late, yet will they cause
thee to do justice to the name, and say masses for
the soul, of Juan Lerma.
Speak of Juan Lerma, said Camarga, with a
trembling voice, and I will indeed listen to thee.
In nomine Dei Patris, et Filii, et Spiritus Sancti
,
speak and speak truly. Cursed be thou, even by
my lips, if thou speakest that which is false, or
concealest
aught that is true!
Truth, though I die,and let me die when it
is spoken, said Magdalena, placing her lips with
the instinctive reverence of habit to the cross
which Camarga extended. As she kissed it, her
heart seemed to soften, and she shed many bitter
tears, while pouring forth her broken and
melancholy
story.
Know, father, she said, not once doubting that
she had a true father of the church before her, that
it was my misfortune never to have known the
kindness and care of a parent.
Let that be passed, said Camarga, hurriedly.
Speak not of the sins of thy youth, a thousand
times confessed, and a thousand times absolved.
Speak of thy coming to the island,of thy broken
vows,thy But here perceiving that
Magdalena
started with a sort of affright, at finding how
far his knowledge had anticipated her divulgements,
he continued, with better discretion, Thus much
do I know
how
I know, ask not; and yet thou
mayst be told, too, that much of thy fate was
interwoven
with that of Villafana.
My
fate, and that of Villafana! cried
Magdalena
,
with a withering look of contempt. But
instantly
changing to a more submissive air, she
exclaimed, My
story
, indeed, father, but not my
fate. If he have confessed to you, then do you
know enough,perhaps all. He told you, then,
that his avarice, gratified at the expense of a
horrible
crime,the destruction of the ship, and the
lives of all within it, abbess, nuns, sailors, and all,
was the cause of all my calamities, since it was
my hard fate not to perish with the rest. He
robbed
the ship of the golden and silver
church-vessels
,
when we were near to the port, and made his
escape to the shore, leaving us to sink in the
midst of a storm then rising. Our pilot having no
hope but in running upon the shore, then within
sight, ran the vessel among certain rocks, where
it was beaten to pieces. Father, it chanced to be
my fate, and mine alone, to be plucked out of that
roaring sea, by one to whom, when lying in a gulf
ten times more hideous, I refused to stretch out my
hand. Father! last night a word from my lips
would have saved the life of Juan Lerma, and I
did not speak it!
Dwell not on this, said Camarga, sternly.
Rather thank heaven that thou wert rendered
unable by any exercise of criminal love, to
preserve
on the earth's surface a wretch, at whose
footstep it shuddered.
Hah! cried Magdalena, starting up in a
transport of indignation, and sending daggers from
her eyes, who art thou, that speakest so falsely
and foully of Juan Lerma? Wert thou, instead of
a pattering friar, a canonized saint in heaven, still
wert thou but a thing of dross and earth, compared
with him thou malignest!
Before Camarga could rebuke this burst of
passion
,
she sank, as before, to the earth, weeping
afresh; for she was in that pitiable state of mental
feebleness, in which life seems only to continue in
impulses,a chain of convulsions and exhaustions.
Alas, father, she continued, with sobs, you
have been taught, like the rest, to misconceive and
belie the best and most unfortunate of men;for
such is Juan Lerma;and you have perhaps joined
with the rest to compass his destruction. Has he
wronged you? noyou have imagined a wrong.
Has he wronged Cortes? nohe has wronged no
one; but the ear of Cortes was open to his
enemies
.
Hear me, father, and while you condemn
me, listen to the refutation of slander. Father,
when I opened mine eyes to the light, and in the
presence of him who had saved me, I forgot my
vows; nay, I thought that heaven had absolved
them in the wreck, and ordained that I should be
happy in a new existence. Never before had I
looked upon the world, and the people of the world,
never before had I looked upon Juan Lerma.
When had I seen one smile upon me with
affection
?
Father, for a second such smile, I would
have moaned again on the wreck, seeing my
companions
swept from me one by one. I grew
cunning
and deceitful, and when they asked me of the
ship and people, I told them falsehoods, lest they
should bring me the veil and the priest, and carry
me from his presence. Alas! and my deceit
availed not; he smiled no more; and when
Hilario spoke of affectionaffection for me,Juan
Lerma withdrew without a sigh, without a
struggle
.
Saints of heaven! cried Camarga, starting
with horror, gasping for breath, and, in the sense
of suffocation, forgetting his assumed character so
much as to fling back the cowl that had concealed
his features. Dost thou speak me the truth?
On thy life,on thy hopes of heaven's forgiveness,
on thy love even for this lost, perhaps this dead,
youth,I charge thee speak me the truth. Went
there no more than this between you? And Juan
Lerma loved you not? and Villafana belied ye
both? And you are not
He paused in agitation, unable to utter another
word; and Magdalena, surprised as much at his
extraordinary interest in her story, as well as
confounded by the absence of the tonsure, and
the glittering of an iron gorget about his throat,
seemed for a moment unable to answer his
questions
.
But summoning her spirits at last, she
said,
Thou art not a priest, but a layman, a stranger,
and a man of sin! But be who thou wilt, friend or
foe, thou knowest now enough of my history to be
entitled to know all. Never did man couple my
name with shame, and think of any but him who
died under the dagger of Villafana. As for Juan
Lerma, not even Cortes, his bitterest enemy, would
dare accuse him of a deed of dishonour. Stranger,
if thou art interested in the betrayed and murdered
Juan, know at least that he died innocent of any
wrong to Magdalena.
Now God be praised for this good word! said
Camarga, dropping on his knees, and speaking with
what seemed a distraction of fervour and delight:
God be praised that I may not think, at my
death-hour
,
that my sins have caused among my children
the crime of incest! God be praised! God be
praised!
Incest!
Thy
children! exclaimed Magdalena,
wildly. What art thou? What is this thou
sayst?
What do I say? and why need I say it? cried
Camarga, springing up and wringing his hands
have we not slain him among us? Oh, wretched
Magdalena, if, by thine influence, he was brought
to this pass, know that thou hast slain thine own
brother!
At this strange and exciting revelation,
Magdalena
,
who had, in the ecstacy of expectation, seized
upon Camarga's hands with a convulsive grasp,
uttered
a scream, wild, loud, and thrilling, and yet how
unlike to that which rose from her breaking heart in
the prison! It was some such cry as might be
supposed
to come from a despairing Christian, who finds
that the gates, which he thinks are conducting him
to hell, have suddenly ushered him into the walks of
paradise. It mingled fear and astonishment with
joy, but joy predominant over the others; and
though it sounded as if coming from a bursting
heart, it was as if from one bursting in the
over-bound
and expansion of a breast released from a
mountain of oppression. It echoed over the lake,
and seemed to have called up the spirits thereof;
for before its last hysterical echo had vibrated on
the ear, there sprang up, as if they had risen from
the earth or the waters, six or seven athletic
barbarians
,
flourishing heavy macanas, who rushed
at once upon the pair.
At the sight of such unexpected and formidable
antagonists, though taken entirely by surprise,
Camarga
snatched his concealed sword from the
scabbard
,
leaped with great intrepidity betwixt
Magdalena
and the nearest savage, who seemed the
leader of the party, and made a blow at him, while
calling to her,
Fly! fly! and tell Cortes that thy brother
But his lips finished not the sentence. Whether it
was that he was rendered helpless by long
continued
disease, was embarrassed by the friar's
cassock
,
or was really unskilful in the use of weapons,
it is certain that his blade dropped harmless on the
macana of the warrior. Before he could recover
his guard, the battle-axe of the Mexican fell upon
his head with deadly violence, and he rolled, to all
appearance a dying man, on the ground.
At the same instant, another warrior clutched
upon Magdalena, who, though pale as death, and
agitated by a long succession of passions, yet drew
the dagger she always carried at her girdle, and
aimed it at the breast of the infidel. Before it could
do him any harm, it was snatched out of her hand,
and she herself caught up as by the grasp of a giant,
in the arms of the leader, and hurried to the water.
In an instant more, she was placed in a piragua,
which her capturers drew from a reed-brake hard
by, and secured, though not rudely, beyond the
possibility of further resistance, among the infidels.
They caught up their paddles, uttered a wild yell,
and the next moment dashed from the shore, and
were hidden among the mists of the lake.
CHAPTER VII.
Are
the refinements and delicate sensibilities of
the spirit confined to the highborn and polished?
They are undoubtedly the offspring of nature:
Education
supplies their place only by the substitutes
of affectation. Though poverty may crush, though
wretchedness and evil habits may corrupt and
extinguish
them, yet they throb in the breasts of the
lowly, during the days of youth, and are not
always
banished even by the rigours of manhood.
They dwell under the painted lodge of the
barbarian
,
and they burn even in the heart of the
benighted
heathen.
Let us fancy the moonlight streaming over the
lake of Tezcuco. The moon is in her first quarter,
and the evening-star, almost her rival in lustre and
magnitude, precedes her in the blue paths of the
west. The golden radiance of sunset trembles no
more on the mountain peaks; but the thin vapours
floating through the zenith, are yet gleaming
faintly
with the last expiring glories of day. The birds
are at rest in the garden of Mexico,all save the
little madrugadores, that yet chirp merrily in the
trees, and the centzontli, who leaves her ravishing
melody, to mock them with their own music, made
yet more musical. The breeze sleeps among the
boughs, or it stirs only through the poplar leaves,
and its rustling sound is mingled with the hum of a
thousand nocturnal insects. In such a night, one
VOL. II. 7
forgets that man is not an angel. We see not the
frown of malevolence in the sky; we hear not the
step of the betrayer on the grass; nor does the
dewdrop
,
falling from the leaf, admonish us of the tears
that are streaming, hard by, in sorrow. In such a
night, the feelings of the kind are kindest, the
thoughts of the pure, purest; youth gathers about it
the mantle of hope, and hope whispers in the voice
of affection. At such a time, it is good to look into
the hearts of the youthful, and forget the
excitements
of years. A draught from the waters of
Clitorius
was fabled to extinguish the thirst for
wine.
[4]
[4]
Clitorio quicunque sitim de fonte levarit
Vina fugit.
Metam. Lib.
xv.
He who can creep into the bosoms of the
young, and drink of the fountain of innocent
affections
,
will turn with loathing from the impure and
maddening currents, that convert the human
family
into a race of moral Bacchanals.
Can we think that among the worshippers of
the ferocious Mexitli, and the fierce invaders of
his people, there were none with natures worthy of
a better belief, and a nobler cause? Destiny had
thrown together two, at least, whose spirits were
but little tainted with the evil of their place and
their day,in whom, perhaps, feeling rather than
reason, had set a talisman that left them
incorruptible
.
A good heart is to man what the galvanic bar
of the philosopher was to the ship's
copper-sheathing
.
It gives this protection, at least, that, through
the whole voyage of life, it preserves the integrity
of the vessel. The barnacle and the remora will
indeed deaden its course, but the metal remains
clean and bright: the billows of the world waste
their corrosive powers only on the protector.
Morality
itself is two-fold; it is of the head, and of the
heart. The first belongs to the philosopher, the
second to the poet. The one is an abstraction of
reason; the other an exhortation of passion. The
morality of the head is the only one that is just;
but it is loveliest and best when the heart enforces
its precepts. With good hearts, Juan Lerma and
the princess of Mexico, moved among the
corruptions
of superstition, uncorrupted; and preserved
to themselves, unabated and unsullied, the pure
and gentle feelings, which nature had showered
upon them at their birth.
The moon, falling aslant upon the garden, lighted
the countenances of the young Spanish exile and
the orphan child of Montezuma, as they rested upon
the summit of a little artificial mound, ornamented
with carved stone seats and rude statuary,
constructed
for the purpose of overlooking the walls.
The visage of the Christian was illumined by
pensive smiles, and his lips breathed gently and
fervently the accents that were sweetest to the ears
of the Indian maiden. But did he discourse of
worldly affection and passion to one so ignorant
and artless? A nobler spirit animated the youth.
He spoke of the faith of Christians, and laboured
with more than the zeal, though not perhaps with
the wisdom of the missionary, to impress its divine
truths upon the mind of his hearer. If his
arguments
were somewhat less cogent and logical than
might have been spoken, it must be remembered
that his religion was like that which will perhaps
belong to the majority of Christians to the end of
the world,a faith of the heart, which the head has
not been accustomed to canvass.
He directed her eyes to the moon, to the evening
star, and to those other celestial wanderers, by
which the heart of man was `secretly enticed,' even
before the days of the perfect man of Uz.
They are the little bright heroes that hang down
from the house of Ometeuctli, king of the city of
heaven, said the poor infidel,all save Meztli, (the
moon) who is the king of night, brother of
Tonatricli
,
(the sun) god of the burning day. This is
what they say of the two gods: There were men on
the earth, but wicked: the ancient gods, the sons
of Ipalnemoani killed them. Then Ometeuctli sent
forth from the city of heaven his sons, who
descended
to Mictlan,the dark hell,by the road
that leads between the Fighting Mountains, and the
Eight Deserts,and stole the bones of men, that
Mictlanteuctli had heaped up in his cavern. The
sons of Ometeuctli sprinkled the bones with their
blood; and these men lived again, and the sons of
Ometeuctli were their rulers and fathers. But the
earth was dark,it was night over the world, and
the only light was the fire which they kindled and
kept burning in the vale of Teotihuacan. The sons
of Ometeuctli pitied the men they had revived; and,
to give them light, they burned themselves in the
fire. Ometeuctli, their father, then placed them in
the sky,Tonatricli the first born, to be the sun,
Meztli to be the moon, and the others to be stars.
So they hang in heaven, turned to fire: and men
built pyramids to them, on the place of burning,
Micoatl, the Field of Death.
[5]
[5]
The vale of San Juan de Teotihuacan, where stand
the great pyramids of the Sun and Moon, and the smaller
mounds erected to the Stars.
They are very good
gods, for they shine upon us.
Forget these idle fables, said Juan, with a
gentleness much more judicious than any zeal
could have been. Forget, too, Mexitli,
Painalton
,
Quetzalcoatl, Centeotl, and the thousand vain
beings of imagination, with which your priests have
peopled the world. Think only of the great
Teotl
,
whom you have called Ipalnemoani,the great
God, the only God,for there is no other than He,
and the rest are but fables. Yonder moon and
stars are not divinities, but great globes like this
on which we live; and to worship them is a sin
it angers Ipalnemoani, who is the only God,the
Creator,whom all men worship, though under
different names. Worship but Ipalnemoani, and
in mode as I will tell thee, and thou art already
almost a Christian.
But is not Christ another god of the Spaniards?
said the maiden, doubtfully.
The Son of God, a portion of God, and God
himself, replied the Christian, lanching at once
into all the theological metaphysics with which he
was acquainted, and succeeding in confounding the
mind of the poor barbarian, without being very
sensible
of the confusion of his own. But if he could
not teach her how to distinguish between categories,
not reducible to order and consistency by the poor
aids of human language, he was able to interest her
in the fate and character of the divine Redeemer,
by no other means than that of relating his history.
And it is this, to which men must chiefly look for
instruction, belief, and renovation, without reference
to dogmas and creeds; for here all find the
unanimity
of belief and feeling, which entitles them to
the claims of fraternity.
When Juan had excited her sympathy in the
character of the Messiah, he began to discourse
upon the object and the ends of his mission. But
unfortunately the doctrine of original sin, with
which he set out, had in it something extremely
repugnant to the rude ideas of the child of nature.
It inferred a native wickedness in all, to be banished
only by belief; and it seemed at once to place
her
in an humble and degraded light, in the eyes of the
young Christian.
What has Zelahualla done, she said, with
7*
maidenly pride, that the king's brother should
make her out wicked?
At this application of the doctrine, Juan was
somewhat staggered in his own belief. He looked
at the mild eyes of the catechumen, beaming as
from a spirit without stain and without guile, and
he said to himself, `How can this be? for she has
known no sin?' His imagination wandered among
the moral and religious precepts stored in his
memory, and settled at last with the triumph of a
controversialist, as well as the satisfaction of a
Christian, upon the first rules of the decalogue,
broken in ignorance, and therefore he doubted not,
easily atoned. He told her that the worship of
false gods was a sin, and homage shown to idols
of wood and stone a deep iniquity; and these being
common to all benighted people, he satisfied
himself
,
and perhaps her, that they were unanswerable
proofs of the existence of natural depravity. But
a stronger light was thrown upon the maiden's
mind, when he showed its effects in the scene of
bloodshed, commenced long since in the days of
her sire, and now about to be terminated in a war
of massacre.
He of whom I speak, he said, came into the
world, in order that these things should cease. He
offers men peace and good-will; and when men
acknowledge him and follow his commands, peace
and good-will will reign over the whole world.
Think not, because my countrymen are sometimes
unjust, and often cruel, that our divine Leader is
the less divine. These are the wickednesses of
their nature, not yet removed by full or just belief;
for the belief of some is insufficient, of others
perverted
,
and some, though they profess it, have no
belief at all. Know, then, that our religion, justly
considered, and with a pure mind not selfish, has
its great element in
affection
. It teaches love of
heaven, and, equally love of man. It denounces
the wrong-doer, who is as a fire, burning away the
cords that bind men together in happiness; and it
exalts the good man, who unites his fellows in
affection
.
It punishes vicious deeds and forbids evil
thoughts; for with these, there can be no happiness
and peace. This it does upon earth; and it
prepares
for the world beyond the grave, in which no
human passion or infirmity can disturb the perfect
purity and enjoyment, of which the immortal spirit
is capable.
Thus he conversed, and thus, guided by the
native
bias of his mind, dwelt upon that feature of our
heavenly faith, of which it requires no aid of
enthusiasm
to perceive the amiableness and beauty.
Peace and good-will to all!
[6]
[6]
According to the Vulgate, the good tidings of great
joy offered peace
only
`to men of good-will,'
pax
hominibus
bon voluntatis
,which, whether the translation be
right or wrong, undoubtedly destroys the sublimity of the
conception, by narrowing down the benevolence of the
deity, and deprives of the blessing of peace that majority
of men, who,
not
being men of good-will, have the greatest
need of it.
There is a charm
in the holy sentence, at once the watchword and
synopsis of religion, that thrills to the hearts even
of those, who, to obtain the base immortality of
renown, are willing to exchange it for the warcry
of the barbarian, the
V victis!
of a hero.
Thus far, then, the heart of the Indian maiden
was softened, and tears,not of penitence, for it
never entered her mind that she had anything to
repent,tears of gentle and pleasurable emotion
stole into her eyes, as she listened to tenets
explained
by one so revered and beloved.
The religion that my lord loves, is good; and
Zelahualla shall know no other.
God be praised for this then, said Juan,
fervently
;
for now is the desire of my heart fulfilled,
mine errand accomplished; and I will die, when I
am called, cheerfully; knowing that thou wilt follow
me to heaven. Now do I perceive that heaven
works good in our misfortunes. The miseries
that I have lamented,the hatred of Don Hernan,
the malice of my foes, my downfall, my
condemnation
,what
were they but the steps which have led
me to effect thy conversion and salvation? God be
praised for all things! and God grant that the seeds
of the true faith, now sown in thy heart, may grow
and flourish, till transplanted into paradise!
Thus saying, Juan fell upon his knees, and
invoked
blessings upon the proselyte, who knelt
beside
him, confirmed greatly in her new creed by the
evident pleasure her conversion, if it could be so
called, had given him.
Know now, Zelahualla, he said, as he raised
her from the ground, and folded her in an embrace
that had more of the gentle affection of a brother,
than the ardent passion of a lover, that now thou
art dearer to me than all the world beside. While
thou wert a worshipper of idols, I wept for thee;
now that thou art a Christian, I love thee; and
through this storm of war, that is gathering around
thee, I will remain to protect thee, and, if need be,
to perish by thy side.
What my lord is, that will I be, said the young
princess, with such looks of confiding affection as
belong to the unsophisticated child of nature
Yes, Zelahualla will be a Christian,Juan's
Christian,for she had been long since instructed
to pronounce the name of her young friendand
she will think of none but him
She paused suddently, and disengaged herself
from the arms of the Castilian, who, looking round,
beheld almost at his side, surveying him with
manifest
satisfaction, the young king of Mexico. The
gorgeous mantles of state were upon his shoulders,
the golden sandals and
copilli
, or crown, bedecked
his feet and head; and though no sceptre-bearers
or other noble attendants followed at his heels, his
appearance was not without dignity, and even
majesty
.
He stepped forward, and taking the princess by
the hand, said to Juan,
The Centzontli is the king's sister;thus said I,
when Montezuma lived no more; for the Spaniards
have killed the sons of the king, and who remains
to be her brother? It is enoughthe Eagle of the
east is the king's brother.The king will speak
with his brother.
At this signal, the maiden stooped humbly over
Guatimozin's hand, kissed it with mingled love and
respect, and immediately stole from the mound.
My brother beheld me among my people, said
Guatimozin, as soon as she was gone. What
thinks he of the warriors of Mexico?
They are numerous as the sands and leaves.
But hear the words of him who knows the Spaniards
as well as the Mexicans. Before a blow is struck,
speak good things to Cortes. Acknowledge
thyself
the vassal of Spain, and rule for ever.
Is my brother yet a Spaniard? and does he
tell me this thing?
If I anger thee, yet must I speak! for I speak
with the heart of one grateful to thyself and
friendly to the race of Montezuma. As a true
Spaniard, I should counsel thee to resist; for
resistance
would excuse rapacity. How wilt thou
fight upon this island, with thine enemies round
about thee? They will sit down and sleep, while
the king perishes with hunger.
The houses are garners, replied Guatimozin,
proudly: There is food provided for many days;
and how shall the big ships see the peasant's canoe,
when it brings corn in the night-time?
The lake is broad, but thou knowest not of all
the craft and skill of thy foes. Think then of
this:
Can a man drink the water of the salt lake
and canals? Are the pipes of Chapoltepec under
the mountains? The Spaniards will tear them up
from the causeways; and the warriors will despair
for drink.
Is Guatimozin a fool? exclaimed the royal
barbarian, with a laugh. The rains have begun
to fall; and for seven
[7]
[7]
Mexican months, of twenty days each.
months, the sky will be my
fountain. Is not Malintzin mad, that he should
besiege me at this season? He is not a god!
Were it for thrice seven months, said Juan,
be assured that Cortes will still remain by thy
city, awaiting its downfall.
And what shall be done by the warriors of
Mexico? Will they look from the island, and
wring their hands, till he departs? For every
grain of corn in the garners of Tenochtitlan, there
is an arrow in the quivers of the warriors. Count
the bones that lie in the ditches of Tacuba,number
the bearded skulls that are piled on the
Huitzompan
,
the trophies gathered from the Spaniards in
the night of their flight,there are not so many
living men in the camp of Malintzin, as perished
that night when we drove them from Mexico.
Dost thou hold, then, for nothing the two
hundred
thousand Tlascalans, Tezcucans, Chalquese,
Totonacs, and other tribes, that follow with
Cortes?
There are but three roads to MexicoCan they
hurt me from the shores?
The ships are fourteen more; and by and by,
there will be no canoe that swims the lake, but will
bear the soldiers of Don Hernan. Think not
resistance
can do aught but protract the fate of thine
empire, and incense the miseries of its subjects.
Its history is written. Heaven is angry with your
gods and with your acts. The blood of human
sacrifices, detestable in the eyes of divinity, calls
for revenge. Alas, thou didst this day condemn a
poor Spaniard to the altar, and thus stain thine
installation with cruelty! God will punish the
Mexicans for this.
The eyes of Guatimozin flashed in the moonlight
with indignation.
Is not the prisoner, he cried, the prey of the
victor? The Spaniard burns the captive in the
shoulder, and makes him a slave. Which is cruel?
The prisoner and the felon we give to the godsit
is good. Did the Eagle ever behold a Mexican
chain men to a stake, and burn them with fire?
Yet he saw Malintzin burn the Chief of Nauhtlan
and the fifteen warriors, in the palace-yard, in a
great fire made with Mexican bows and arrows!
Which, then, is cruel?
This act I will not defend, said Juan, and it
was my presumption in censuring it, that made
Cortes my enemy. But, prince, let us speak of
these things no more, for our arguments shake not
each other's minds. Let me speak of myself, for
it is just thou shouldst know my resolve. I am
thy friend, but I will not lift my hand against my
countrymen.
The countenance of the king darkened:
Is not the Great Eagle brave? He fears his
enemies!
I fear
nothing
, said Juan, with conscious
dignity, else would I speak no words to lose
thy favour. I will be thy prisoner, thy sacrifice, if
thou wilt.I lament the fate that is coming upon
thee, but I cannot fight in thy cause.
Guatimozin eyed him earnestly, as if to read his
soul; and then said, a little softly,
The Great Eagle knows all things: he shall
rest in the palace all day, and at night, speak wise
things to the king.
Neither in this can I aid thee, replied Juan,
resolutely. What I know of religion and moral
duties,nay, all that I know of civilized arts, that
are not military,this much I am free to
communicate
;
but nothing more. I can no more help
thee to fight with my knowledge, than with my
arm.
This was a declaration of principles somewhat
above the powers of the infidel to appreciate, and
it filled him, as Juan saw, with serious displeasure.
He took him by the arm, and spoke sternly and
even menacingly:
The faith of a Christian is not that of a
Mexican
.
The Indian kills his foes and the foes of his
friend: the Christian forgets his friend, when his
friend is in trouble.
Juan was stung by the reproach, and replied with
emphasis:
The king took me from the prison-house of
Tezcuco: the block was in waiting for me. Who
talked to me of prisons and of blocks, before Olin
came to the garden?
Guatimozin grasped his hand, and spoke with
impetuosity,
I have said the thing that was false, and my
brother does
not
forget his friend. He did a good
deed to Olin; why should he turn his face from
Guatimozin? Was Olin in greater distress than the
king, beset by enemies who cannot be counted?
My brother has looked in the face of the Centzontli,
my sister.The princes of the city, and the kings
of the tribes, have said, each one, `Give me the
daughter of Montezuma, and I will die for Mexico.'
But the king thought of his brother. Thus it shall
be: the Great Eagle shall take the princess for his
wife, and be a Mexican; and then, when
Guatimozin
entreats him to strike his foe, he will call upon
his god of the cross,the Mexitli of the Spaniards,
and strike with all his force. Is it not so?
Prince! said Juan, sadly, even this cannot
be. According to our thoughts, there are sins of
the deepest turpitude in acts which your customs
cause you to esteem virtues. The Spaniard may
change his country, but he cannot become the foe
of his countrymen. What wouldst thou think of
one of thine own people,thy friend, thy subject
whom thou shouldst find among the Spaniards, and
aiming his weapon against thee?
There are many thousands of them, said
Guatimozin
,
giving way to passion. Malintzin fights
with weapons more destructive than the big
thunder-pipes
.
He goes among the serfs that pay
tribute
,
and he says, `Pay no moreIs it not better
to be free?' Thus he seduces them. But my
brother
shall think of this again. And now he shall
eat and sleep.
So saying, and perhaps thinking it unwise to
pursue his designs at the present moment, he drew
Juan from the mound, and was leading him towards
the palace, when the sound of voices and footsteps
came from the bottom of the garden, accompanied
by the fierce barking of Befo, who was still confined
in the cage.
Now do I remember me, said Juan, with a
feeling of shame, that I have suffered the noble
animal
But his words were cut short by an unexpected
circumstance. No sooner had his voice sounded,
than a wild cry burst from a neighbouring copse,
and a female figure, pursued by Mexican warriors,
VOL. II. 8
rushed forwards, calling upon him by name, and
by a title that had never before blessed his ears.
Juan! Juan! my brother! oh, my brother!
It was Magdalena,her hair disordered and
drooping in the damp air of evening, her face, as
far as it could be seen in the imperfect light, pale
and distracted. No sooner did her eyes behold
him than she redoubled her speed, and throwing
herself upon his neck, she cried, with transports of
emotion, while the pursuers gathered round in no
little amazement.
Oh, Juan! my brother! pardon me and forgive
me; for I am your sister,yes, your sister, your
own sister,and I have come to die with you!
Confounded as much by the strange declaration
as by her presence, Juan endeavoured gently to
disengage himself from her embrace, but all in vain.
She clasped his neck with tenfold strength, weeping
and exclaiming he scarce knew what; and, though
much affected, he began to think that sorrow and
passion had turned her brain. What therefore was
his surprise, when he gathered from her incoherent
exclamations, that Camarga, the masking stranger,
who had, on three several occasions, betrayed such
an unaccountable desire to take his life, had, even
with his dying lips, pronounced them brother and
sister. His heart thrilled at the thought; for his
affection for the singular being whose destiny of
mourning was so like his own, had ever been great,
though chilled and pained by the belief of her
unworthiness
.
He pursued the idea with a thousand
questions, the answers to which provoked his
curiosity
,
while they damped his hope. Was Camarga
their father? and was he dead? What did he say?
What,no more than
this
`He was her brother?'
No more? And no one alive to confirm the story?
Alas, he said, his thoughts reverting to what he
remembered of his childhood; this fancy has
made me as distracted as thyself. Camarga was a
dreameran evident madman.
My
father died at
Isabela in the island; for was not I at his side?
This cannot be, Magdalena;deceive thyself no
longer.
Speak not to me of deceit, my brotherfor my
brother thou art, said Magdalena, vehemently.
Can my heart deceive me? Is it not the work of
heaven, seen in our whole life? Heaven kept thee
yes, Juan, while heaven punished
me
the sin of
neglected
vows with the torments of unavailing
affection
it
kept thee from loving me as much,
because
thou wert my brother. Yes, this it is! The
angels spoke with the lips of that man, who
now lies dead on the lake-side! But what of that,
Juan? We will go to CortesI can win thy
forgiveness
.
Alas, alas! I could have saved thee
before
,
but thou madest me mad. Why didst thou
treat me so, Juan? I was innocentindeed I was;
and Hilario's recantationoh believe me, I knew
not of his murder, till it was accomplished!
Villafana
killed him from fear, for Hilario had discovered
how he scuttled the ship; and thus it was that
Hilario
gained Villafana to corroborate the falsehoods
he spoke of me. I can make all clear to thee,
indeed
I can.But now, dear Juan, cast me not off
again,for you are my brother. We will go to
Cortes,he will pardon thee. We will find out the
friends of Camarga, and it must needs be that we
shall discover all. And then I will go to a convent
again,and then I care not what befalls me; for I
shall have a brother in the world left to love me.
While Magdalena was pouring forth these wild
expressions, for a time almost unconscious of her
situation in the heart of the pagan city, and in the
presence of so many barbarians, Guatimozin, who
had looked on with an astonishment that was soon
converted into the darkest displeasure, turned to
the capturers of Magdalena, who had ceased their
pursuit the moment they beheld the king, and flung
themselves reverently at his feet. The Lord of
Death, who made the like prostration, had
assumed
an erect posture, in virtue of his high rank. But
his looks wandered from the king to the Christian
pair, whose endearments he watched with
exceeding
great satisfaction, and indeed with
exultation
.
What is this that I see? said the king, in a
low but stern voice; and who hath brought this
woman to my garden?
Masquazateuctli bent his head to the earth,
replying
with the complacency of one who has achieved
a happy exploit,
The king made the Great Eagle of the East his
brother; he took him to the hill of Chapoltepec that
his people might know him, and do him honour.
Shall not Masquazateuctli do a good thing to the
king's brother? He was sorry because of his
loneliness
in the king's garden, and the Maiden of the
East was afar in Tezcuco. I thought of this, and
I crept to the gates of Tezcuco: and I said, `I will
take a prisoner for the king, and perhaps I shall
find a maiden with white brows; which will gladden
the heart of the king's brother.' Mexitli was with
me. But I killed the man that came with her, for I
saw she was that daughter of a god, with eyes like
the full moon, of whom the king had spoken, when
he came from Tezcuco alone, and my heart was
very joyful. The Eagle is gladhe will not ask
the king for the daughter of Montezuma!
Guatimozin muttered a fierce interjection betwixt
his teeth, but replied with dignity,
The Lord of Death should have spoken this to
the king; but if he be angry, he remembers that
Masquazateuctli was Montezuma's soldier. By and
by, I will speak with him in the palace.I have
said.
The Lord of Death, thus dismissed, and not a
little mortified at such insufficient thanks, beckoned
to his followers and departed.
Guatimozin strode up to the Christians, and
touching
Juan on the shoulder, said, with a stern voice,
What shall the king say of his brother, to the
daughter of Montezuma?
The colour rushed into Juan's cheeks; but he
replied immediately, and even firmly,
That he brings her his sister, to whom, for his
own sake, he prays her to be kind and gentle.
Does my brother tell me this? said the king,
starting. The Great Eagle said he was alone in
the world, with none of his kin remaining.
And so I thought, until this hour, said Juan,
not without embarrassment: and now must I tell
the king, that though I call this maiden my sister,
and pray heaven she may prove so, yet neither she
nor I have aught upon which to found our belief,
but the words of one whom the Lord of Death
killed
,
when he seized her.
Guatimozin intently eyed the maiden, who
watched
with painful interest the changes of his
countenance
and Juan's, for she understood not a word of
their speech; and then said,
Let it be so: Guatimozin will think of this. The
Spanish lady is welcomethe Eagle shall speak
with her a little, and then give her up to the women,
that they may be good to her.The king's house
is very spacious.
He then turned gravely away, signing to the
outcast
pair to follow him.
They were suffered to be alone together for a
brief hour, in which Magdalena, rejecting
impetuously
and passionately all Juan's doubts, poured
out all the secrets of a life full of unhappiness, but
8*
not of crime; and Juan himself, forgetting the
weakness of all her claims of consanguinity, melted
into belief, and learned to call her his sister. There
were indeed certain circumstances of mystery about
his birth, which might have often disturbed his
thoughts, had he been of an imaginative turn. The
man whom he had called and esteemed his father,
had died a violent death in the islands, while Juan
was yet very young. He could recollect little of
him that was agreeable to remember; and all that
had afterwards come to his ears, only served to
chill his curiosity; all persons, who had not
forgotten
him, representing the elder Lerma as a most
depraved and infamous man. No one knew whence
he had come, or if he had any relatives left in the
world; and Juan remembered well, that the
planters
had, on several occasions, when the unnatural
parent, if parent he was, had maltreated and
abandoned
him, taken him away from Lerma, and
comforted
Juan with the assurance that the villain had
undoubtedly
stolen
him from some one. It is,
however
,
very certain that Juan never seriously thought
of doubting that this man was his parent; nor
would he have recalled such trivial circumstances
to his mind, had he not been staggered by the
impetuosity
of Magdalena, and by his own feelings of
affection, into a credulity almost as ample as her
own. That he should desire also to find a relative
in one, who, considered without reference to the
weakness shown only in her love for him, was of
a soul as stainless as it was noble, is not to be
doubted; and such love he could be rejoiced to
return
.
In truth, his reasons for admitting her claims
were as flimsy as hers for making them, as he came
to discover, when left to examine them in solitude.
They made, however, a deep and lasting
impression
upon his mind. Perhaps the impression would
have been still deeper, had the two been
permitted
to remain longer together; but before
Magdalena
had yet been able to speak with composure,
there came a train of maidens, bearing chaplets of
flowers, and rich ornaments of feathers, giving Juan
to understand, that it was the king's will his
companion
should now leave him.
Magdalena turned pale, when this command was
announced to her by Juan, and seemed at first as if
resolved never to be parted from him more. But
being persuaded by Juan that she had nothing to
fearthat the king was his friendthat they should
certainly meet again,she at last consented. She
strode to the doorshe listened to his words of
farewell, and she sobbed upon his breast; and then
departed with the happy but delusive hope of
seeing
him again on the morrow.
It was the last night of peace that ever darkened
over the Mexico of the pagans.
CHAPTER VIII.
To one whose perverted imagination can dwell
with pleasure on `the pomp and circumstance of
glorious war,' no better study can be recommended
than the history of the siege of Mexico, which may
be considered as one single battle, lasting for the
space of ninety-three days, counting from the time
when the different divisions of the besieging army
had taken their positions in form, upon the different
causeways. This does not include the period
occupied
in the march of these bodies from Tezcuco,
and which was not devoted to inactivity. On the
contrary, the Captain-General took advantage of the
occasion to discipline his naval force, by sweeping
over the lake from bay to bay, and town to town,
destroying every piragua that made its appearance,
as well as such chinampas, or floating gardens, as
he could approach, and frequently by cannonading
the imperial city itself. Besides this, he assaulted
and took, on each occasion after a most sanguinary
combat, certain fortresses upon two island rocks,
one of which rose near to Iztapalapan: the other,
though no longer insulated, still lies a little to the
east of the republican city, and is called the Peon,
or Crag, of Montezuma.
The preparations of the Mexicans were
extensive
and anticipative of all the peculiar evils which
they thought it in the power of their great enemy
to inflict. They had cut through the causeways
numberless ditches, each of which was furnished
with a light bridge, to be withdrawn, when about
to fall into the power of the Spaniards; and the
earth and stones thus removed, were built up
before
and behind the chasms, into strong ramparts,
which were still further strengthened with
palisades
.
In this manner, while opposing the greatest
obstructions to the passage of the foot-soldiers,
they made it impossible for horses to be brought
against them,a precaution that, for a long time,
robbed the Spaniards of their greatest advantage.
The beginning of the siege of Mexico, then, lay in
the struggles of the besiegers to obtain possession
of the ditches, which were to be filled up, by
levelling
the ramparts. This was a work both of
infinite
danger and toil, the besieged fighting from
behind
the advanced barriers with unexampled
resolution, and, however overpowered, never
retreating
beyond the ditch, until their companions
had left but a single plank for their passage, which
was immediately afterwards withdrawn. After
this, the Spaniards were forced to overturn the
first barrier into the chasm, before they could rush
across the slough of mud and water, to attack the
second; and all this was to be done not only
against violent opposition in front, but with a most
dangerous and audacious species of annoyance
practised on one flank or the other, and
sometimes
on both. Wherever the shallows admitted,
the Mexicans drove into the bottom of the lake,
and at but a short distance from the dike, strong
piles, to which they secured their canoes, furnished
with high and thick bulwarks of planks, almost
musket-proof; and from these they drove arrows,
darts, and stones against the soldiers with
destructive
effect, Nay, with such wisdom had the young
king of Mexico devised means to embarrass his
adversary
,
that he had even secured his little flotillas
from the possibility of approach, by sinking rows
of piles in the lake, parallel with the causeways,
through which the brigantines could not pass, to
disperse battered them. It was to but little purpose that
Cortes battered them from a distance with his
falconets
;
the following morning saw replaced every
loss of men and canoes. The soldiers were excited
to fury by an annoyance so irritating, and some
were found at times frantic enough to leap into the
lake, where the waters happened to be sufficiently
shallow, and endeavour to carry the flotillas, sword
in hand.
The narrowness and obstructed condition of the
dikes making it impossible that all the forces could
act upon them together, the vast multitudes of
native allies were left in reserve, with the cavalry,
on the shore,where they were not idle, the
numbers
,
as well as the boldness of the Mexicans being
so great, that they frequently sent armies to the
shore by night, who, at the dawn, fell upon the
reserved troops with all the rancour of opponents
in a civil war.
This was the condition of the war at its
commencement
.
The grand desiderata,the
removal
of the flotillas, and the profitable employment
of the confederates, were not effected until Cortes
had seized all the piraguas of the shore-towns, and
sent them, manned with Tlascalans, against the
palisaded posts, where, besides doing what
execution
they could upon the enemy, the allies tore
away the piles, and thus admitted some of the
lighter brigantines among the canoes.
Aided in this manner, the soldiers were able to
advance along the several dikes, until they got
possession of certain military stations, on each,
which might have been called the gates of Mexico.
It has been already said, that the causeways of
Iztapalapan and Cojohuacan, coming respectively
from the south and southwest, united together at the
distance of less than a league from Mexico. At
the point of junction, the causeway expanded into
a mole or quay, where was a strong and lofty
stone wall, the passage through which was
contrived
by the overlapping of the walls, in the
manner
described at Tezcuco. This rampart was
defended
by very strong towers and by a parapet with
embrasures, from which the defenders could easily
repel any enemy, inferior in strength and
determination
to the Spaniards. The point was called
Xoloc, and when wrested from the hands of the
Mexicans, became the head-quarters of Cortes.
A similar expansion of the dike of Tacuba,
fortified
in the same way, and at the distance of two
miles from the city, and one from the shore,
afforded
a resting-place and garrison for the forces under
Alvarado, whose first act, after reaching Tacuba,
was to destroy the aqueduct of Chapoltepec, which
consisted of a double line of baked earthenware
pipes, carried across the lake on a dike constructed
only for that purpose, and therefore so narrow and
inconsiderable, that it does not appear that the
Spaniards derived any advantage from the
possession
of it.
The division of De Olid united with that of
Sandoval at the point Xoloc; the latter of whom
was afterwards directed to take possession of the
northern dike of Tepejacac, the remains of which
may yet be traced between the city and the hill of
Our Lady of Guadalupe, on which was a
fortification
resembling the others.
These positions being thus assumed, the
Captain-General
divided the fleet of brigantines among
the three captains, to whom they were of vast
service, by protecting the flanks of their
divisions
.
From this period, the siege may be considered
to have been begun in form; and it was continued
with a fury of attack and resistance almost without
parallel in the history of conquest. Foot by foot,
and inch by inch, the invaders advanced, staining
the causeways with their blood, and choking the
lake with the bodies of their foes. Ditch after
ditch was won and filled, and almost as often
lost and re-opened. The day was devoted to
battle
,
the night to alarms. The only periods of rest
were when the daily tempests, for it was now the
heart of the rainy season, burst over the heads of
the combatants, as if heaven had sent its floods to
efface the horrible dyes of carnage, and its thunders
to drown the roar of man's more destructive
artillery
.
Then, the exhausted soldier and the fainting
barbarian flung themselves to rest upon the trodden
mud of their ramparts, within sight of each other,
regardless of the wrath of the elements, so much
less enduring than their own.
At first, the Spaniards after winning a ditch and
filling it, were content to return for the night to the
fortified stations, to shelter themselves in the towers,
and in miserable huts of reeds which they had
constructed
,
from the rains, that, usually, continued
until midnight. But finding that the infidels, more
manly or more desperate, devoted the night to
repair the losses of the day, by again opening the
chasms, they denied themselves even this poor
solace, and threw themselves to sleep on the spots
where they fought, ready to resume the conflict at
the first glimmer of dawn.
Thus, day by day, the approaches were effected,
and by the end of the second month, the besiegers
had advanced almost to the suburbs, which jutted
out into the lake along the three causeways,
supported
upon foundations of piles, and sometimes
piers of stone. The houses stood apart from each
other, but were connected, in seasons of peace, by
light wooden drawbridges, running from terrace to
terrace; so that the
streets
of these quarters may
be said to have been on the tops of the houses,
and the same thing was true of the gardens.
The communication below was effected always
by means of canoes. Among these edifices, the
water was often of sufficient depth to float the
brigantines of lighter draught, which sometimes
entered them, to fire the buildings, that were so
many fortresses, from which the soldiers on the
causeways could be annoyed.
The labours and sufferings of the besiegers were
constant, and almost intolerable; yet they endured
them with a patience derived from the assurance of
a certain though tardy success. The toils and
distresses
of the Mexicans were greater, and endured
with heroism still more noble, because almost
without hope; and it may be said with justice of
these poor barbarians, whose memory has almost
vanished from the earth, that never yet did a
people
fight for their altars and firesides with greater
courage and devotion. They saw themselves each
day confined to narrow limits,they fought the
more resolutely; they beheld all the marine forces
of the neighbouring towns, late their feudatories,
led against them,they sent navies of their own to
chastise the insurgents, and still kept their ground
against the Spaniards.
It was certain that Cortes had found in the young
king an antagonist far more formidable than he
had expected. The resistance at the ramparts,
the sallies by night that were often made with
fatal effect, the secret expeditions against the
shores, and the stratagems put in execution to
cripple the brigantines, all indicated, in the infidel
prince, a capacity of mind worthy of his
unconquerable
courage. A single exploit will prove his
daring and his craft. He decoyed two of the
largest brigantines into a certain bay, where many
VOL. II. 9
of his strongest piraguas lay in ambush among the
reeds. With these, he attacked, boarded, and
carried
the two vessels, and had he possessed any
knowledge of the management of sails, would have
conducted them in safety to his palace walls. As
it was, they were maintained against an
overpowering
force, sent to retake them, and not yielded until
the captors had destroyed every Christian on board,
fifty in number, as well as the sails and cordage,
and cast the falconets into the lake.
Another stratagem of a still more daring
character
,
and infinitely more fatal to the Spaniards,
was conceived and executed, almost at the moment
when they thought the young monarch reduced to
despair. But of that we shall have occasion to
speak more at length hereafter. The thousand
conflicts on land and water, that marked the
progress
of a siege so extraordinary, have but little
connexion with the adventures of the two outcasts;
and we are glad of the privilege to pass them by.
CHAPTER IX.
When
Magdalena was led from the presence of
Juan, she was conducted through many chambers
and passages, which gave her an idea of the
immense
extent of the palace, to the quarter
especially
appropriated to the women, and which was as
carefully guarded from the approach of the other
sex as the harem of an oriental monarch. It
consisted
of a series of dormitories and other small
apartments, as well as a vast hall, covered with
pictured tapestry and knots of flowers, in which
the daily labour of the loom and spindle was shared
by all, the princess and the slave alike, mingled with
the more elegant occupations of embroidery and
feather-painting.
But the toil of the day had been long since over,
and when she entered, the maidens were amusing
themselves, some talking and laughing, and others
dancing to the sound of flutes, and all unconscious
or heedless of the perils that were about to hem
them in.
The appearance of a vision so strange, so often
imagined, yet never before seena woman of the
race of the invaders, and one at once so majestic
and lovely as Magdalenaproduced an immediate
sensation throughout the merry crew. The dancing
ceased, the music of the pipe was exchanged for a
murmur of admiration, and all eyes were turned
upon the novel apparition. But it was observable,
that the maidens indulged in no rude demonstrations
of curiosity or surprise. They neither thronged
about her, nor uttered any loud exclamations; and
however ardently they gazed, when unperceived,
each cast her looks modestly to the floor, the
moment
she found the eyes of the stranger directed
upon her.
Troubled as were Magdalena's thoughts by the
strangeness of her situation, and conscious of her
inability to exchange a word with these new
companions
,
she yet felt a sort of relief, and even
pleasure
,
to find herself once more surrounded by
individuals
of her own sex, who, as was evident from
their appearance, were neither rude in manners nor
degraded in mind.
In this happier frame of feeling, she suffered
herself
to be conducted to a chamber, where two
young female slaves attended her with refreshments
of meats, fruits, and confections, and pointing to
a couch of robes, upon a little platform under a
canopy, left her to her meditations.
She rose from a troubled and dreamy slumber at
the dawn, and waited impatiently for the moment
when she should be led to Juan. The slaves again
made their appearance, bearing, besides food, which
they set before her, rich garments of the most
splendid
hues, which they desired her by signs to
substitute
for her monastic attire. To this she
acceded
,
after some hesitation, thinking it needful to
humour the wishes of those upon whose friendship
her existence, as well as that of Juan, so obviously
depended. She exchanged, at least, the gray veil
for a broad mantle embroidered with feathers and
gold, and placed over her other dress three several
tunics, each of a different hue, and each gorgeously
ornamented. Her toilet was completed when the
slaves had encircled her arms and neck with jewels,
and wreathed her hair with chains of gold; to all
which she passively, yet impatiently, submitted.
Thus dressed and decorated, she was conducted
again to the great hall, and seated upon a throne
cushioned over with feathers of every hue, when,
to her great surprise, she found herself the object
upon whom was to be showered marks of the most
extraordinary honour. The crowd of maidens was
huddled in the farther end of the apartment, where
they stood with downcast eyes, giving place to a
female, evidently of exalted rank, who came from
among them, followed by five or six girls, much
more splendidly dressed than the others, one of
whom bore in her arms a sleeping infant.
The Indian lady was distinguished from her
attendants
by apparel similar in hues and splendour
to that worn by Magdalena, and she had on her
head a little cap or caul of emeralds, mingled with
pearls. Her face was prepossessing, her figure
well proportioned, and her bearing not without
dignity
.
Yet there was in her aspect something of
trouble and hesitation, and she went through the
business of salutation, or rather homage, for so it
appeared, with visible reluctance. She approached
the throne, and kneeling before it, took Magdalena's
hand, and laid it upon her head, speaking a few
words which the Christian did not comprehend.
Then taking the infant from the girl who bore it,
she laid Magdalena's hand upon its innocent brows,
in the same manner; after which she stepped aside,
and the young attendants went each separately
through the same ceremony. This accomplished,
she stole from the apartment, and in a few
moments
,
the spindle rolled, the shuttle of the simple
loom rattled, and the fingers of the embroiderers
and feather-painters moved over their tasks.
The morning passed away, and Magdalena still
expected a summons to the presence of Juan. The
evening darkened, the fragrant torches were lighted,
the pipe and dance were again summoned to close
9*
the labours of the day, and Magdalena was, a
second
time, conducted to her chamber, to muse with
fear and distrust over her singular situation.
The second day beheld the same ceremonies,
succeeded
by the same labours and diversions, and
still not a movement indicated the approach of a
messenger. She looked upon the maidens around,
their faces were grave and placid. They gazed
upon her no more, except when her eyes were
averted. She imagined a thousand reasons to
account
for her seclusion. Was her brother, not
withstanding
his assurances to the contrary, in a state
of as much restraint as herself? Orwas it
possible
?did
it not depend upon himself?was it
possible
,
he did not desire to see her? She thought of
his slowness to admit her claim of consanguinity;
she thought of the words of Camarga,of their
wildnessHad not Juan said he was insane?of
their insufficiency. Nay, she remembered that Juan
spoke of
his
father, whom he well remembered;
and among the tears she shed of doubt and
disappointment
,
she blushed at the boldness and warmth
with which she had advocated her claims.
Another day came,another, and still another;
and her heart sickened and her cheek grew pale
with suspense and humiliation. Then impatience
waxed into anger, and she stalked among the
maidens
with looks of determination, as if she would
have commanded them to lead her from what she
justly conceived to be imprisonment. But
how
command
them? Her language was as the language of
the gods to them, and their words were to her as
unmeaning
as the songs of the birds at the windows.
Eyes can speak many things, but not all; and
signs are of too arbitrary a nature to serve as the
medium of communication betwixt two
hemispheres
.
If she strove to depart from the chamber,
she was followed by the two slaves, who seemed to
be specially devoted to her service, and who,
attending
her from room to room, yet arrested her with
humble and supplicating gestures, when she seemed
to be overstepping the limits of the harem. If she
persisted, she found herself in the power of certain
antique beldames, who prowled around the sacred
chambers, bearing wands to indicate their authority,
and who opposed themselves, though without
rudeness
,
to further egress. If she still made her way
through these, she found herself stopped by
passages
,
in which were armed barbarians, who did not
hesitate to block up the avenues with their shields
and spears. In other words, she found that she
was a prisoner, confined to a society as recluse, as
peaceful, and perhaps as happy as that from which
it had been her misfortune to be released. The
pride and energy of her nature were here lost; for
there was nothing with which to contend, except
her feelings, and nothing to excite, save a sense
of wrong, inflicted she knew not by whom, nor
why.
This was precisely the state of things to tame
her spirit into submission and inaction; and, almost
insensibly to herself, she began to accommodate
her deportment to her condition, substituting
anxiety for anger, and despondence for decision.
She began to think that Juan was, like herself, a
prisoner; and the apprehension of his distresses
weighed on her heart more heavily than the sense
of her own; and, as with all her strength of mind
and passion, there was a tinge of superstition
running through all her thoughts, she beheld, in
the singular train of calamities that had brought her
so often to his side, a revelation and proof that she
was ordained, finally, to rescue him from this,
as well as the other ills, which oppressed him.
Another thought brooded also in her bosom.
Hitherto, whatsoever efforts she had made for his
good, had ministered only to his griefs; and what
had they brought to
her?
From the moment in
which she had first attempted deceit, by concealing
the sanctity of her profession, her life had been but
a history of agony and shame. Had she avowed
herself, immediately after the shipwreck, the bride
of the cross, Hilario had not died under the knife
of the assassin, Juan Lerma had not forfeited the
favour of his general, and she herself had, perhaps,
closed her life in the peace with which it had
begun
.
She began to picture to herself the sinfulness
of her evasions of vows, and to consider these the
causes of her sufferings. Such thoghts as these,
and a thousand others, divided and harassed her
mind by turns, and confounded while they
tormented
.
But one idea never left herand that was, the
uncertainty of the fate of Juan Lerma, and the hope
that it might be reserved for her to free him from
the bondage of infidels. But how was this to be
effected? She knew not.
Her first vague desire was to gain a friend
among the grave and passionless creatures, by
whom she was surrounded. She examined all
their countenances, and soon fixed upon several
in which she thought she could trace kindly
feelings
and simplicity of character. She strove also
to acquire a little of their language,an effort
which she soon gave up, not so much from the
difficulty of acquisition, as from the remoteness of
any benefit to be derived in that way.
She perceived that the Mexican lady who, each
morning, for the first fortnight of her captivity,
(after which time she was seen no more,)
commenced
the ceremonies of salutation, so humble, and
indeed to her so irksome, must be of the highest rank,
perhaps the queen of Guatimozin himself; though
it seemed improbable that one so exalted would
condescend to homage so servile. She was
conscious
also, that the six maidens who attended upon
this princess were of no mean rank; for though
they frequently remained in the hall, engaged in
labour, like the rest, it was clear that the others
looked upon them with the greatest deference. Of
these she had long singled out one who was
superior
to the others in beauty and mildness of
countenance
;
and it seemed to her that this one, in
going through the morning ceremony, endeavoured
to make her sensible that she did so with sincerity
and feeling. Thus, besides placing Magdalena's
hand on her head, she carried it also to her lips,
expressing as much desire as her countenance
could convey, to be esteemed the Christian's friend.
These things almost escaped Magdalena's notice
at first; but she afterwards remembered them,
and strove to respond with manifestations of
similar inclination. She observed, however, that
the maiden gradually changed from tranquillity to
melancholy, as if something preyed upon her spirits.
She repeated, indeed, her salutation each morning,
but it was no longer with smiles, and with a
disposition
to linger about Magdalena's person. On
the contrary, she retired without delay to a little
nook under a window, where she continued her
task among feathers and flowers, seldom stirring
from the spot. It was evident to the penetrating
eye of Magdalena, that the Indian maiden was
wasting away under some grief as poignant and
enduring as her own; and though she attributed
it only to some of the evils of war, the
commencement
of which had long since been indicated by the
distant explosions of artillery, she was the more
favourably impressed by the damsel's emotion,
since none of the others seemed to share it, nor to
betray either fear or anxiety.
She attempted then to come to some
understanding
with this maiden. She sat down by her in her
little nook, and watched, with what, had she been
in a better frame of mind, would have been
admiration
,
the progress of her toils, as well as the
effects of previous labours. She beheld, with
surprise
,
garlands and bouquets of flowers, constructed
of feathers, and imitated with such wonderful
precision
,
that when they were mingled with a few
natural ones, and impregnated with their odours, it
seemed almost impossible that they could be
artificial
.
The same art has existed in other parts of the
continent, and is practised to this day, in some of
the nunneries of Brazil. There were also pictures,
worked with the same beautiful materials, upon a
groundwork of prepared cloth, which were chiefly
confined to the representation of flowers and birds.
When Magdalena first visited the maiden, she
found her engaged upon what seemed a
wood-pigeon
,
surrounded by a little wilderness of flowers
and leaves. The design, though simple, was pretty
and spirited; yet the maiden seemed dissatisfied
with her work, and altered it daily, as if each day
still more displeased; until, at last, she seemed to
have hit upon a plan more to her taste, when she
pursued her task with what seemed a morbid
ardour
.
When Magdalena looked at it last, she found
the whole design and character of the work changed.
The flowers had been displaced by stones and
brambles; an arrow was represented sticking
through the neck of the bird; and the story of a
wounded heart was told in the metaphor of the
poor flutterer, harmed by some wanton bolt, and
left dying in a desert place.
When Magdalena beheld this painted sentiment,
she took the hand of the artist, and pressing it as
if with sympathy, pointed to her bosom. A faint
tinge of blood passed over her embrowned visage,
but she looked confidingly into Magdalena's face,
as if not ashamed to confess her grief. When
Magdalena was persuaded she was understood,
she directed the painter's eyes to the bird, and then
pointed expressively to her own bosom, as if to
signify that she also was unhappy. The maiden
bowed her head upon her breast, and Magdalena
saw that tears were stealing from her eyes. She
thought they were the tears of sympathy; and
when the damsel looked up, she cast off all
reserve
,
and indicated as plainly as she could, by
gestures, that she desired to make her way into
the garden.
The maiden shook her head, and would have
departed, but that Magdalena, rendered indiscreet
by her impatience, arrested her, to make trial of a
new appeal. She took the jewels from her hair,
and without reflecting that the rank of the maiden,
indicated by gems quite as valuable as her own,
might render her inaccessible to such temptation, she
made as if she would have thrown them upon her
head and neck. She was sorry for the act; for as
soon as the maiden understood what she designed,
she drew back with a look of offended dignity, and
with cheeks burning at once with mortification and
anger. Then, gathering up her little picture, her
bodkins, and basket of coloured feathers, she left
the apartment, and returned to it no more that day.
Amid all her grief at the disappointment of her
hopes, Magdalena had yet generosity enough to
appreciate the spirit of the young pagan, and to
lament having outraged her feelings.
That night, when the female slaves had departed
from her chamber, and she was musing
disconsolately
in the light of a little night-lantern, consisting
of a taper of resinous wood, surrounded by thin
plates of gold, perforated with holes in many
fantastic
figures, which transmitted the light, she was
roused by a sigh; and looking up, she beheld, to
her great surprise, the young artist standing before
her, in an attitude of sad and patient humility. As
soon as the visitor perceived that she was seen, she
approached, and knelt at Magdalena's feet, who
now saw, with a touch of shame, and, at first, even
of resentment, that, as if in requital of the insult of
the morning, she held in her hands all the jewels
that had decorated her hair and person, and offered
them for her acceptance. But Magdalena's
displeasure
soon passed away; for the jewels were
proffered with the deepest humility, and the
damsel's
eyes were suffused with tears. She murmured
out some words, too, and the tone was expressive
of grief.
All this was mysterious to Magdalena, who
puzzled herself in vain to account for the act and
the donation. She restored the jewels, and the
maiden being wholly submissive, she replaced them
about her person with her own hands; and then,
taking advantage of the opportunity, made another
effort to come to a better understanding with her.
She remembered that her companion was a painter,
and being herself a little skilled in the art, she drew
with a bodkin from her hair, upon the soft wood
of the table that supported her lamp, the figure of
a man in Spanish costume, bound in a cell. The
representation was awkward, yet it appeared that
the damsel understood it; for she took the bodkin,
and immediately, though with a trembling hand,
completed the picture by the addition of another
figure, representing a Mexican, with a crown like
that Magdalena had seen on the head of Guatimozin,
who, with one hand, extended to him the handle
of a macana, while threatening him with another,
brandished above his head.
This was expressive enough, and Magdalena's
alarm for the safety of the young man was only
removed when the maiden drew what was plainly
designed for a buckler, interposed between the
weapon and his head.
Magdalena then, without further hesitation, leaped
to the grand object of her desires, by drawing the
figure of a man paddling in a canoe. This also her
companion understood, and replied to it
significantly
enough, by surrounding the little vessel with
many others, filled with Indians, or other human
beings, who attacked it with showers of arrows
and darts.
Alas! is there no hope for us then? no hope
for my poor brother? exclaimed Magdalena,
wringing
her hands. Maiden! maiden! carry me but to
him!Alas, I speak as to a stone statue!
She then resumed the bodkin, and returning to
the first sketch, she drew the figure of two women,
entering the cell. The response to this ended her
hopes immediately. The Indian girl sketched the
outlines of men, armed with spears, circling around
the whole cell.
Magdalena sank upon the couch in despair, and
almost in a frenzy. The maiden, frighted by the
vehemence of her grief, endeavoured to soothe her,
by pressing her hand to her bosom and forehead,
and covering it with kisses and tears; after which
she stole quietly from the chamber.
It was many weeks before Magdalena beheld
her again. She vanished from the hall, she came
no more to kneel on her footstool in the morning,
and display her melancholy visage to the stranger.
Magdalena's heart died within her. She was in a
solitude among living creatures,the most
oppressive
of all solitudes. Her suspense was intolerable,
and preyed upon her health, until she was wasted
to a shadow, and the pagan damsels eyed her,
when she appeared among them, with looks of pity.
She succumbed at last to her fate; the fever of her
mind extended to her body; and she was missed
VOL. II. 10
from the hall, as well as the young artist. She
became
ill, and she threw herself upon her couch, to
waste away with passion and delirium. But there
was still a gleam of happiness to break upon her.
One night, when the dancing,now no longer
pursued with spirit, for the cannon of the Spaniards
sounded each day louder and nearer,had ceased,
and the flutes were breathed upon no more, she felt
her hand pressed with a gentle grasp. She looked
up, and beheld the Indian girl at her side, eyeing
her with compassion. She sprang to her feet, in
an ecstacy of delight, and embraced her; for she
hailed her appearance as the herald of joy.
Oh, maiden! maiden! she cried, what news
of my brother?
The damsel replied with the only words in her
power, but the best she could have used, had she
been acquainted with the whole speech of Castile.
She looked sadly but firmly into Magdalena's face,
and murmured softly,
Juan Lelma
The accent was imperfect and false, but the
sounds were music to Magdalena. She clasped the
young barbarian again in her arms, but her
caresses
were only responded to by tears and sobs,
which seemed to increase in proportion to her own
raptures. But Magdalena was too wild with hope
to think of the sorrows of her friend. She saw that
the Indian held in her hand, two long and capacious
mantles of a plain stuff, which, she knew, were to
veil them from evil eyes, while they crept to the
cell of her brother. But the maiden checked her
impetuosity. She removed the trinkets from her
head and person, and again offered them to the
Christian; and persisted to do so, though still most
gently and humbly, until Magdalena, thinking this
might be some important ceremony, a proof
perhaps
of friendship offered and received, and
perceiving
,
what was more influential still, that it was
necessary to hasten the proceedings of her visitor,
consented to receive them. She yielded to her
importunities
,
and the Indian girl clasped around her
ankles, arms, and neck, and twisted in her hair, all
the jewels that had decorated her own person,
besides
hanging round her neck the silver cross and
rosary,Magdalena's own gift to Juan,which she
received with rapture, not doubting that he had sent
it to her as a token and a full warrant to submit
herself
to the guidance of the young infidel. This
accomplished
,
she assisted Magdalena to secure the larger
mantle about her figure, and wrapped herself in
the other. Then beckoning the Christian to follow,
and signing to her to preserve silence, she led the
way from the chamber.
CHAPTER X.
A short passage through which they stole,
darkly
,
for it was not lighted, conducted them to a
chamber, where the guide paused a moment, as if
in doubt and fear. A strong light beamed through
the curtained door. They listened for a time, until
hearing no one stir within, the Indian maiden pulled
the curtain timidly aside, and then beckoned
Magdalena
to follow her. It was a spacious apartment,
richly tapestried, and lighted by many such masked
torches as Magdalena had seen in her own
chamber
.
The hangings were even continued over the
ceiling, so that it resembled a pavilion rather than
the sleeping apartment of a king,for such it was.
In the centre was suspended a magnificent canopy,
wrought with feathers, overhanging a couch
blazing
with gold, and bedecked with the richest spoils
of the parrot and flamingo, with little pedestals both
at the head and foot, on which incense was
burning
before golden idols. Upon this lay sleeping
the Indian lady, whom Magdalena had so often
seen during the two first weeks of her durance;
and the infant slept clasping her neck. Magdalena
doubted no longer that she beheld the queen of the
young monarch. But she crept softly after her
guide, and was soon buried again in darkness.
After many turnings and windings, which made
her fancy the palace was a great labyrinth, she
suddenly
found herself conducted into the open air, by
a door exceedingly narrow, and concealed by a
mass of trailing vines. But secret as this entrance
appeared, it was not unguarded. A tall savage
with a spear, started up from the bushes, as if to
dispute their right of egress. But a word from his
companion, low as the whisper of a breeze, removed
his opposition. He flung himself upon the earth,
as if to his divinity, and thus remained, until the
maidens had passed.
It was by this time midsummerfor so long a
period had elapsed since the departure from
Tezcuco
;
but it was the season of the rains, and the
chill winds from the lake penetrated Magdalena to
the heart. The sky was overcast, the grass loaded
with moisture, and every gust shook down a shower
from the trees.
It was very dark, and she knew not well to what
quarter she was bending her steps. But she could
see a line of fires running as it seemed across the
lake, from a point in the city to the right hand, and
lost in the distance or obscurity of the left. This
was, in fact, the northern causeway, or dike of
Tepejacac, the nearest point of which was scarce a
mile distant from the garden. It was occupied by
the troops of Sandoval, who had extended his
approach
already within the limits of the water suburb.
Two or three of his brigantines were also perceived
anchored near to the calzada,at least, their
lanterns
were seen shining from their prows.
While Magdalena was yet stealing along after
her guide, her eyes fixed upon this line of fires, she
heard suddenly a great tumult begin among them,
in which the yells of men were faintly
distinguished
amid the crash of fire-arms and artillery.
Shocked and frighted as she was, at being thus
made a witness, though afar, of the terrors of
human
wrath, she soon began to look upon the
conflict
as of good omen for herself. It would certainly
10*
be a more attractive spectacle to any wandering
infidels in the garden than might be furnished by
the obscure figures of herself and companion.
Apparently the Indian maiden thought so too;
for she increased her pace, and instead of skulking
as before, among green-arched and shadowy alleys,
she walked boldly along in a broad exposed path,
that led directly to a corner of the palace. But
from this very corner they saw rushing a
tumultuous
throng of barbarians, some of whom ran
directly towards them, though the course of others
was in another direction.
The young guide drew Magdalena into a
sheltered
walk, and crept timorously along until she
reached the palace wall, when she sank down, from
fatigue or fear, signing to Magdalena to do the
same thing, and thus remained, until the last of the
barbarians had vanished. The path now seemed
clear, but still the Indian maiden remained
cowering
on the earth; and Magdalena, whose impatience
distracted her mind and almost hardened her heart,
perceived that she was sobbing bitterly. She
touched her arm. The guide shrank away, but
seemed to collect her spirits and courage at the
sign. She rose up, and led the way to a broad
door, where an armed Indian stood, holding a
flambeau
.
He seemed alarmed, though not surprised
at the sight of the pair, and spoke earnestly to the
guide, as if to dissuade her from entering. She
passed him, however, with a word, and the next
moment stopped, in great agitation, before the
curtain
of a door. Magdalena looked eagerly to her
to confirm her hopes; but before the maiden could
lift her finger, signing to her to enter, she heard,
from within the apartment, the well known growl
of Befo.
Juan! dear Juan! she exclaimed, and darted
through the curtain.
The young man was pacing to and fro, not
bound hand and foot, as her fears had anticipated,
but evidently excited in the most painful degree by
the distant firing. He turned at the sound of her
voice, and threw himself into her arms.
Sister! for I believe thou
art
my sister, he
cried,else how could I love thee with a love so
unlike that of man for woman? God be praised
that I have seen thee once again: for it is time thou
wert wrested out of this place. But what is this?
Thou art wasted and thin! very thin: thy hands
burn, thy cheek is hotSister, dear sister, thou
art ill!
Think of it not, said Magdalena, with the
delight
of a maiden, listening for the first time to the
voice of affection, and caressing him without
reserve
:
Oh, Juan, I could die twice over, to hear
you speak so; and I care not if I do die, so you are
but saved; for you have made me very happy.
You are a prisoner, Juan,we are both prisoners.
An Indian girl brought me hereshe will help you
to escape, for you can speak her language. You
can go to Cortes, and tell him you are the brother
of Magdalena. He will not wrong you then,no,
he will not dareOr perhaps we can fly together
we can fly in a canoe. The maiden will help us,
the good maiden: She is at the doorI will call
her in.
At this moment, the Indian girl, driven in,
immediately
after Magdalena, by some sudden alarm,
stood at a distance, near the door, muffled in her
cloak, and shrinking almost within herself. A
single dim and half expiring torch twinkled in the
apartment; and its light scarcely reaching her, she
remained unobserved, a spectator of every thing,
but of course unable to understand a word of the
conversation.
Go not, dear Magdalena, said Juan, folding her
in his arms; for it may be that we have but a
moment more to share together. Tarry, and hear
what I have to say. I am, as I may say, a prisoner;
yet it seems, if I can believe the young king, more
because I have incurred the wrath of the Mexicans
than his own. Thus it is: the king rescued me
from prison in Tezcuco, first, because I had not
long before given him liberty, to my own great
misfortune, and secondly, because he doubted not,
that the wrongs I have suffered would incense me
to take part with him, and fight against my
countrymen
;
whereby, as he thinks, he would gain an
invaluable auxiliary. On the day of his coronation,
he presented me to his people, and called me his
brother; nevertheless, they gave me but sour looks,
for bitterly do they hate the sight of a Spaniard. If I
will fight with them and for them, I win their love,
so he assures me, and so I can well believe; but this
is clearly impossible. I have not fought, and I will
not; and they say, therefore, that the king should
give me up to be sacrificed; and twice already,
after having suffered some severe losses, they have
come turbulently to the palace, to demand me.
For this reason, I dare not appear among them,
unless to be torn to pieces.Tremble not, fear
not, he continued, as Magdalena clasped him, as
if to shield him from approaching weapons: I
have seen thee bold and resolute among roaring
breakers,else how could I have saved thee, dear
sister?Heaven pardon Hilario! and heaven
pardon
me, my sister, that I imputed his death to thy
warrant!I have seen thee bold and intrepid.
Now summon back what courage thou hast; and,
if heaven will, I will save thee yet again from
destruction
.
I can myself escape, but not with
thee
Think not of me, Juan, think not of me, said
Magdalena, earnestly and fondly. Thou canst
do nothing to make me so happy, as to tell me how
I can die for thee. Fly, then; pause not a moment,
but fly; and know, that, if I meet thee not again
but in heaven, yet thou wilt leave me in heaven,
even upon earth, knowing that thou art saved, and
that I have ministered somewhat to thy liberation.
Be of this heart, Magdalena, said Juan, and
rest assured that I will soon return, if I have life,
with such a force as will rescue thee likewise from
thraldom. My plan of escape involves duplicity,
nay, even perfidy; yet are mine ends all pure,
honourable, and humane. I perceive that
Guatimozin
is incapable of resisting much longer. His
people are slain by thousands each day, and
thousands
must soon perish from want. Cortes has
already his foot upon the island; and house by
house, the city is tumbled into ruins. The poor
king is distracted, and resolved to die, burying
himself and his whole people under the ruins of his
capital. This may be excused in a soldier, and in
men; but the town is thronged with poor women
and children; there are thousands of themtens
of thousands; and they must perish, if the siege be
longer continued. To save themto save the king
himself (for thus only can he be saved,) I will break
faith with him; and thus also will I save thee. My
only fear is, that his anger may fall upon thee, when
he finds I have deceived him; yet this he may not
discover. There is one here, with whom, could I
but find speech, I could secure thee a protector.
Magdalena, I have one friend here, who will be
thine. An unfortunate attempt to escape has
perhaps
robbed me of her assistance. Yet I spoke of
thee to her, andBut, dear Magdalena, thou art
sick and feeble!I talk to thee too much. If thou
art alarmed, I will not leave thee: we will await
our fate together.
I
am
sick, Juan, and I know not what is the
matter with me, said Magdalena, faintly, suffering
the young man to place her upon a seat. But
who is this of whom you speak? Your friend,
Juansurely I shall love
your
friends.
At this moment, Juan, as he bent over her,
caught sight of the jewels which the Indian maiden
had placed upon her head and neck, and among
others, beheld the star of pearls which had gained
for the daughter of Montezuma the name of
Zelahualla
,
or the Lady of the Star, and the silver
crucifix.
Good heaven! he cried, do you wear her
jewels, and yet ask me who she is?
Magdalena started to her feet, and both turning
together, they beheld the Indian princess, shrinking
in the shadow of the room, behind Befo, who
seemed to consider her an old friend, her arms
crossed upon her breast, her head drooping, and
her whole attitude and appearance indicative of a
spirit entirely crushed and broken.
Zelahualla! cried Juan, with a voice of
delight
;
and rushing towards her, he folded her in
his arms, and strove to draw her towards his sister.
Why didst thou not speak to me, Zelahualla?
Why dost thou turn from me, Zelahualla?
The maiden sobbed, and strove to disengage
herself from his embrace, saying,
There is no Zelahualla nowThe bright lady
of the east is Zelahualla. Juan and the bright lady
shall go. Why should Juan think there are
two?
In these broken expressions, Magdalena, had
they not been in an unknown tongue, would have
traced the workings of jealous and wounded
affection
.
They filled Juan with surprise.
What is this you say to me, Zelahualla? he
cried, and what do you mean? Did not
Zelahualla
promise she would love my sister?
She did, replied the princess, without abating
her grief: she will love Juan's sister, and any
one that Juan loves; and she has brought the
bright lady to Juan, and she has given her her
jewels, that Juan may love her more, and forget
Zelahualla,and the cross of his God, too, that he
may not be sorry.
Alas, Zelahualla, what evil-eye has struck thee?
Dost thou think I deceive thee? Wilt thou not
believe
this is my sister?
The princess looked at him doubtfully and
sadly:
It is all as Juan says: but the king has asked
questions, and the nobles have spoken to him with
the words of captives; and they say, he has spoken
falsely of the bright lady.
Wilt thou believe
them
, and not
me?
said
Juan, not without emotion, for he was touched by
the deep and unreproachful sorrow of the young
princess, though greatly surprised to find how her
ear had been abused. I swear to thee, and may
heaven judge me according to my truth, that, in
this matter, I deceive thee not. There is but one
Zelahualla, and she is the daughter of
Montezuma
.
The maiden sank upon his breast, sobbing, but
now with rapture. Then running to Magdalena,
who had surveyed the scene with varying and
extraordinary
emotion, she threw herself at her feet,
and embraced her knees.
Magdalena stood like one entranced, until Juan,
raising up the princess, placed her in her arms,
saying,
Dear sister, give her thy friendship; for there is
no one more pure or noble of spirit, though artless,
than this poor ignorant maiden; and let the cross
again hang on her bosom, for she has confessed her
Redeemer. She will watch thee and guard thee
while I am gone;nay, she will nurse thee too, for
thou art very ill, and needest kind nurture.
Magdalena returned the embraces of the Indian
maiden, but it was with a wildness of manner, that
greatly disturbed her brother, and even frighted the
princess. He took her hand,it was hot and
trembling. He kissed her, and found her lips
burning
with fever; and he perceived that excitement
had wrought her indisposition into a degree of
illness that might prove serious.
Compose thyself, dear Magdalena, he said.
All now depends upon thy coolness and courage.
If thou becomest ill, my scheme must needs
miscarry
Nay,
I cannot attempt it, until thou art better;
for it seems to me now thou art almost delirious.
Delirious, Juan? No, I am not delirious. Yet
I am ill,very ill, I think. Thou goest alone, dost
thou not? Tarry not a moment.We will leave
thee,we will not stay longer, lest the guards
should return and find us.
Listen to me, Magdalena, said Juan, earnestly,
as if he feared lest her senses should wander. If
I fall into the Spaniards' hands alive, I will come to
this garden in canoes, with a proper force, and
enter
it by surprise. If it be possible, I will seize the
person of the king, having previously secured him
such terms from Cortes as shall protect him in
person
and in his government, as the vassal of Spain.
This will end the war at once. But in this I may
not succeed, yet be able to liberate both thee and
the princess. Through her address, thou wilt be
enabled to walk often in the garden. Walk therein,
as near to the lake as possible, especially late in
the day, and in the first hours of the evening. The
dog Befo I will leave in a cage: when you are in
fear, give him liberty.The princess hath often fed
him, and he will guard you well; and his voice, if
I come in the night-time, will show me where to
seek you.Do you understand me, dear sister?
Struggle but a little against this fever, and perhaps
it may leave you. At all events, the thought of
your suffering will arm me with double strength,
when I return, bringing you relief. Alas,
Magdalena
,
I am sorry to see you thus!
It shall be as you say, Juan, said Magdalena,
a little incoherently. I will be governed by this
maiden, and for your sake, I will love her well.
We will walk in the garden, too. Yet think not of
us. If you are safe, we will be content.
Farewell, Magdalena, dear Magdalena, said
Juan. Walk, if thou art able, even to-morrow;
for in the morning I will essay to depart. At any
rate, be thou sick or well, if thou hearest a bugle
winded in the garden, at any hour, be it morn or
midnight, then be sure that you sally out, and
Zelahualla
with you.Farewell, sister, farewell!
and farewell, thou, dear princess. When thou
thinkest of me, let the cross be in thy hands and
on thy lips!
With these words, and having tenderly embraced
them both, Juan led them to the door, and putting
their hands together, he had soon the satisfaction
to hear them step from the passage into the open
air.
VOL. II. 11
CHAPTER XI.
What
Juan had said in relation to the cause of
his confinement, was true, although he was not
aware of the whole extent of the truth. In
releasing
him from impending death at Tezcuco, the
young infidel did not doubt, in the simplicity of his
heart, that he was adding a powerful engine of
defence
to his preparations, as well as requiting the
obligation, which, he believed, had been the
principal
cause of Juan's downfall. He reckoned
confidently
upon Juan's desire for vengeance, the
absence
of which feeling, after wrongs so stirring and
manifold, his nature did not allow him to anticipate;
and he dwelt also, with the security of pride, upon
the incentive offered in the love of the daughter of
Montezuma. In this spirit of confidence, without
much regarding Juan's previous averments, he
introduced
him to his assembled forces, upon the day
of coronation, that all might know him, and respect
him thenceforth as one honoured with the highest
of titlesthe king's brother. So far, all was well:
the name of the Young Eagle was not wholly
unknown
to the Mexican warriors; and the sight of
his manly figure, arrayed in a native cloak, his
head crowned with a lofty penacho, put on by the
king's hand, and the glittering axe of obsidian
received
from the same quarter, and grasped a
moment
with a military air, made an impression in his
favour, that could only be obliterated by his own
act of rejection. The spectacle was hailed with
acclamations, and
Far and wide, the thundering shout,
Rolling among reduplicating rocks,
Peal'd o'er the hills and up the mountain vales.
[8]
[8]
Southey's Roderic.
Unfortunately, Juan, unwilling that any act should
be interpreted as expressing his assent to take arms
against his countrymen, immediately threw down
the macana, and would even have taken the plumes
from his head, had he not been arrested by
Techeechee
,
and made sensible that such a proceeding
would be followed by the most fatal consequences.
The movement, however, had been observed by
many of the nobles; and from that moment, Juan
saw that he was watched by jealous and hostile
eyes. His explicit and absolute refusal to take part
in the conflicts, had convinced the young king of
his error; yet, though greatly exasperated, he took
such measures, from motives of honour or
humanity
,
as protected the obdurate Christian from the
daily increasing anger of his people. He confined
him in the palace, and forbade even the ardent
Zelahualla to go near him. In this he was actuated
by suspicions, constantly inflamed by the Lord of
Death, and not unnatural in themselves, that the
young man had abused his credulity in the case of
Magdalena. The love of the Indian maid, however,
penetrated through guards and prison-doors; and
Juan, almost as impatient of confinement and
suspense as Magdalena herself, resolved to effect
his escape, and by throwing himself upon the mercy
of the Captain-General, make one effort to liberate
his unhappy sister. The attempt was discovered
and thwarted; and from that moment his
confinement
had been very rigid.
Still, however, the young infidel was wont
frequently
to visit him, after the combat of the day, in
the hope of overcoming his scruples, or of
gathering
from his accidental expressions some hints that
might be turned to advantage against the besiegers.
On all such occasions, he refused to satisfy the
prisoner's
questions concerning his sister and the
princess; giving him plainly to understand that
nothing
but the assumption of the pagan battle-axe,
or positive counsels in his straits, which he did not
attempt to conceal, could purchase a sight of either.
In all these things, if the infidel acted with more
crafty selfishness than generosity, he only proved
that he belonged to his race. The whole conduct
of Juan was, according to
his
scale of morals and
honour, both unfriendly and unaccountable. He
designed, this very night, to visit the prisoner, of
which intention Juan was apprized; and hence his
eagerness to dismiss the maidens from the chamber,
before the conclusion of the attack upon the
neighbouring
dike, with the nature and objects of which
he was well acquainted.
Before the maidens had departed, it was evident
that the firing and other noises on the causeway
were subsiding. Before they had been gone the
full space of an hour, a heavy step rang in the
passage, and the next moment the Indian monarch
stood before the captive. He was singularly and
sumptuously armed. From head to foot, his body
was covered with a garment, perhaps of escaupil,
fitting so tightly as to display his limbs to advantage;
and over all was a coat of mail, consisting of
copper
spangles or scales, richly gilded, and stitched
upon a shirt of dressed leather. His head was
defended
by a morion of the same metal, shaped not
unlike to those of the Spaniards, and equally strong;
and its ability to resist a violent blow was
increased
by the folds of a stout serpent, painted green,
wreathing over its whole surface. A shield of
tapirskin
,
studded with copper nails, hung from his neck;
and he bore a macana, which was stained with
blood. He wore none of the emblems of royalty,
and his appearance was only that of some highly
distinguished noble. His eye was bright and fiery,
his step firm and proud, but his aspect was thin
and haggard.
Has my brother heard the shouts of men near
him, and does he yet say, `Let me sleep?' were
the words with which he saluted the captive.
Prince, said Juan, eyeing him anxiously and
interrogatively, though speaking with positive
emphasis
,
as I told you before, so has it happened.
The cannon were ready on the dike, the falconets
were charged in the ships, and the men of Sandoval
slept with swords and matches in their hands, and
with their eyes open. Guatimozin does not come
back a victor!
He comes back with a prisoner, said the
prince, proudly; and, to-morrow, the lord with
red hair (Sandoval) will count the dead and weep,
and Malintzin shall see the flames of sacrifice rising
from the pyramid.
Alas! exclaimed Juan, in condemning
captives
to this horrible death, against your will, for I
know your heart is not cruel, you harden the soul
of Cortes against you; and he will remember each
sacrifice, when the day of surrender comes at last.
Let it be harder than it is, what cares the
Mexican who dies? replied the king. Does my
brother think that I am weary, or that Malintzin
can fight longer than I?
Think not to deceive me, princeI know that
already your altars and palaces are within reach of
the cannon-shotnay, of the musket-bulletYou
11 *
are hemmed in, like a wild-cat on a treeYour
enemies are all round you, and they look into your
eyes. Are not the water-suburbs already taken?
Why should I lie? replied Guatimozin. If
you go to Tacuba, you will see the banks of the
islandthe city of the water is not there. If you
look from Iztapalapan, the surges go rushing up
towards
the great templethe houses are under the
lakeIf you look from the door of my dwelling,
you will see the quarter of Tepejacac falling also
into the lake. When Malintzin calls aloud in the
morning, the lord of the red hair answers him, and
Malintzin hears. Thus it is with Mexico; yet my
brother sleeps, while I die, saying to his soul, `It is
all very just, for I sleep and see not.'
If I see not and help not, yet is my heart torn
by your distresses, replied Juan, earnestly. But
why should I help? It would be a great sin upon
my soul, and could do you no good. Listen to
my counsel, Guatimozin: It is not yet too late.
Cease to protract an unavailing resistance; send to
Cortes with offers of submission, and be assured
of reigning still, a king, though a vassal.
Does Guatimozin fight to be a king? said the
infidel, with dignity. He struck the Spaniard
before he thought of a crown. He thinks not of
palaces and fine garments, but says, `Why should
the people of Mexico be made slaves?' The king
fights for Mexico.
He will fight best for Mexico with peace. The
kings of Tezcuco and Iztapalapan pay tribute to
Mexicoare their people slaves? Thus shall it
be with Mexico: the king shall give gold, as the
tributary of Spain, and Mexicans shall remain in
freedom.
Will my brother prattle like Malintzin?
demanded
the monarch, sternly. Where is the
freedom of Zempoala, of Tlascala, of Cholula?
The people talk of it, while a Spaniard strikes
them with a lash. Where is the freedom of
Tezcuco
?
The young king, who is a boy, sits on the
throne; but the Spaniard, whom my brother struck
in the face with a sword, when he chased Olin-pilli,
is there with him, and he robs and abuses the
people, so that they have sent their tears to
Malintzin
.
What was the fate of Montezuma? He
sat in the Spaniards' house in chains, and the
soldiers
murdered his nobles, who danced in peace in
the courtyard. What was the fate of Montezuma?
The Spaniard, who is lord of the king of Tezcuco,
would have done violence to the captive maiden
Does my brother remember?
Ay! replied Juan, with the gleam of passion
that visited his eyes, only when he spoke of
Guzman
:
I remember, and I hope yet to avenge
Sinner that I am, I cannot think it a crime, to covet
the blood of this man!But, prince, let me know
My captivity is very hardWhy should I not be
allowed to speak with the princess? Why should
my sister be hidden from me?
The countenance of Guatimozin darkened.
When my brother will fight for them, he shall
be at liberty. My brother thinks again of the
canoe
at the bottom of the garden?
Juan coloured, and said,
You keep me a prisonerI strove to escape.
The king mocks me, to call me his brother.
The warriors are very angry, yet the Great
Eagle is alive. He cannot go among them in
safety
,
unless as their friend.
And who, said Juan, shall warrant me of
safety, if I go even as a friend?
He deemed it now the period to commence
acting
upon his scheme of escape, yet hesitated, stung
with shame at the thought of the duplicity to which
he was descending.It is better to die on the
dikes than to pine in the dungeon.
Guatimozin's eye gleamed with a sudden fire:
Does my brother jest with me? he said. If
my brother think it wrong to strike a Spaniard, he
shall not be called upon to fight. He can teach
me the things it is needful to know; and be in no
fear.
When did Guatimozin see me afraid? cried
Juan, stifling as well as he could the sense of
humiliation
and disgust, with which he began the office
of a deceiver. To give you counsel how to resist
or attack, will make me as much a renegade as to
draw sword at once. If I do become apostate, it
shall be boldly, and with the sword. Prince, I have
thought over this thing: my heart is grieved with
your distress; and for my sister, and for Zelahualla,
I will do what my conscience condemns. Does the
king know what shall be my fate, if I am found
fighting by the Spaniards?
Twenty chosen warriors shall circle my brother
round about, and he shall keep aloof from the van
of battle.
If I fight, it shall be in the van, said Juan, his
self-condemnation giving a character of sullenness
to his tones. But what, if I fall,what shall
become
of my sister?
She shall be the sister of Guatimozin and of
Zelahualla, said Guatimozin, with energy, yet
with doubt; for he could hardly believe that Juan
was speaking seriously.
Let the king say
this
, and I will go out with
him to battle:If I die, he will cause my sister and
the princess to be delivered into the hands of
Cortes.
The Spanish lady shall be sent to Malintzin;
but the Centzontli shall remain with her brother
the king. It is better she should die with him than
dwell with the Spaniards. Why shouldst thou
think it? Are there not more Guzmans than
one?
Juan muttered painfully to himself,
Perhaps it
is
better. Heaven will protect her,
for she has acknowledged her Redeemer.Will
the king swear, then, if his brother falls, that
Magdalena
shall be sent to the Spaniards?
He will swear, said Guatimozin, ardently.
It is better for the Spanish lady; for she knows
not our speech, and she pines away with grief. And
if the king prevails over his enemies, the king will
remember what Juan says of her.
Now, then, let the king tell me the truth, and
mislead me not. How much longer can he
maintain
the city?
Till he is dead!But he may soon die, he
added, confidingly, for now he doubted no longer
that he had gained his purpose. My brother shall
first teach me how to get food. The ships move
about at night, and no canoe can reach the shore.
The king sits down to eat with the warriors, and
he eats no morebut the warriors cry all night for
food.
Good heaven! said Juan, surveying the
wasted cheeks of the monarch; are you already
so straitened? your garners already exhausted?
Who can reckon for so many mouths? cried
Guatimozin.
I dreamed not of thisSure,
I
have never been
denied abundance!
My brother is a prisoner; and the women and
children are feeble. Why should
they
want, when
the warriors can endure hunger better?
The communication of this painful intelligence
nerved Juan more strongly in his purpose. He
perceived the necessity of acting without delay, if
he wished to protect the young infidel from the
consequence of his own despairing fury, and the
maiden of his love, and his sister, from a fate too
dreadful to be imagined. His eagerness the more
fully deluded the young monarch, not prone to
suspicion where he loved, and he was soon made
acquainted with the whole condition of the
beleaguered
city, and the situation of the Spaniards.
He was also instructed in the particulars of a
design
of Guatimozin, to be practised upon the ensuing
day, the boldness of which, as well as its strong
probabilities of success, both astonished and
dismayed
him. He perceived that perhaps the fate of
the entire Spanish army depended upon the course
he might pursue, and his honour and feelings seemed
all to call upon him for some exertion to arrest
the impending destruction.
When he had been made acquainted with all that
Guatimozin thought fit to divulge, and had again
and again repeated his resolution to take arms and
accompany the Mexicans against his countrymen,
the king embraced him with great warmth,
promising
to provide him with a good Spanish sword
and helmet from among the spoils; but
recommending
that, in all other respects, he should
assume
the guise of a Mexican.
When these arrangements were completed, he
turned to depart, and yet seemed loath to go.
Finally, he took Juan by the arm, and said,
To-night the king will sleep by the side of his
brother: we will wake in the morning and go out
together.
Why will not the king speak kind things to the
queen? It will rejoice her to look upon the king.
Has she not a little sick babe by her side? and
are they not very wretched? said Guatimozin,
exposing, without reserve, the miseries preying
upon his own bosom, and abandoning himself to a
grief that seemed to mock the greatness of his
station. When I look upon them, he said, I
am no longer the king who thinks of Mexico and
the people, but a man with a base heart, who cries,
`Why am not I a prisoner and a slave, that my
little child may be saved, and his mother protected
from the famine that is coming?' The king should
not think these things,he should not look upon
his household, but his country.
Go, notwithstanding, said Juan, touched still
further by the distresses of the infidel. Comfort
them with your presence, and let their sufferings
admonish you of the only way to end them. It is
not too late to submit.
Is this the way my brother begins the duties
of a Mexican? said Guatimozin. The gods tell
me to die, not yield. I fight for Mexico,not for the
wife and child of Guatimozin.
With these words, and having banished all traces
of weakness and repining, he left Juan to slumber,
or to weigh, in painful anticipation, the risks and
uncertainties of his projected enterprise.
CHAPTER XII.
As
Guatimozin had confessed to Juan Lerma,
the three suburbs of the causeways were already
demolished, and their ruined walls, battered by
cannon and blackened by smoke, peered over the
lake, along the causeways, in melancholy ruins.
The hand of desolation had extended still further;
at least, in the quarter that was pierced by the dike
of Iztapalapan. Here Cortes commanding in
person
,
and fighting every day at the head of his
army, he had infected the whole division with a
share of his own energy. While Alvarado and
Sandoval were contending for a foothold on the
very borders of the city, he had already penetrated
it to the distance of half a mile, destroying many
houses, though without being able to effect a secure
and permanent lodgment upon any portion of the
island.
It must not be supposed, that, having reached
the island, the Spaniards could exchange the
narrow
and ditched causeways for firm and spacious
streets. On the contrary, the causeways, so to
speak, were continued up to within half a mile of
the principal square which was in the very centre
of the city, and contained the great pyramid, as
well as the chief temples of Mexico. On either side
was a canal both broad and deep, dividing the road
from the houses; and others, running from
intersecting
streets, perforated the causeways with
chasms, the number of which the Mexicans had
long since greatly increased. The island, which
was circular, did not exceed three miles in
diameter
,
of which the central third only was dry and
solid. Hence the advanced posts of the three
divisions
were at no considerable distance from each
other; and if the call of Cortes in the morning was
not absolutely heard and answered by his two
lieutenants, the bugles of each could be easily
distinguished
,
cheering one another as they advanced
to the daily assault.
The labour of Cortes in destroying the suburb
in his quarter, was less than that of the others; for
here, the lake being deeper, the houses extended
but a short distance from the island. His advanced
post was almost within the limits of the suburb,
and separated from the island by only one ditch,
which he had twice or thrice taken and filled up, but
was as often obliged to yield again to the foe,
subduing
his impatience, until his lieutenants had
advanced
equally far in their quarters.
The outposts were always guarded with the
most jealous vigilance, particularly in the later
hours of the night, after the rains, which, in this
climate, commonly prevail with the greatest
violence
between the hours of noon and midnight. A
guard of forty men, with two pieces of artillery,
kept watch until midnight; when, yielding their
places to forty more, but not retiring, they threw
themselves to sleep upon the damp stones and
clay. Two hours before dawn, the post was
strengthened by another company of forty, who
watched until morning, the others flinging
themselves
in their cloaks among the first watchmen.
Thus, there were ready, before day, one hundred
and twenty men, the strongest and boldest of their
divisions, who, in case of sudden attack, could
preserve
the station, until reinforced by the whole
strength of the division, from the towers of the
VOL. II. 12
gates, which were still the head-quarters of the
several divisions. The causeway between the
gates and the pickets, was occupied by patrols of
horsemen, who watched lest the enemy, coming in
canoes, should make a descent behind the advanced
post, and thus cut it off.
Two hours after midnight, upon the night in
which Juan revealed his purpose of escaping, the
second guard on the causeway of Iztapalapan was
relieved from watch by the coming of the third; and
the soldiers flung themselves, as usual, upon the
earth, to prepare for a morning, which, it was known
to all, was to witness a general assault, made
simultaneously
by all the divisions, from their three
several quarters.
The watchfires were replenished, and two
subalterns
,
the leaders of the party, advanced a little
beyond them, to reconnoitre the condition of the
enemy. Three hundred paces in front, the
causeway
was intersected by the ditch; held by the
Mexicans; and beyond it, on a strong rampart,
blazed a great fire, in the light of which the pagan
sentinels could be seen, squatting upon the mound,
or stalking idly about. The gap was bridgeless,
as was well known; but this the Spaniards could
not observe with their own eyes, not thinking it
prudent to advance within the range of a Mexican
arrow.
As they returned, they conversed together in
low voices; and it was worthy of remark, as
indicating
how little their spirits were occupied by
the dangers around them, that they bestowed more
words upon the ordinary scandal of the camp than
upon the horrible conflicts through which they had
passed, or in which they were yet to mingle.
They lay this thing of Camarga entirely to the
door of Guzman, said one; and, in my mind, the
imputation were reasonable, could we discover any
cause for enmity between them. They say, that
Guzman smothered him with pillows of
cottontreedown
.
Wherefore
Pho, Najara, said the other, bluffly; blame
not a man upon these vain fancies; for Camarga
was killed by a hard weapon, and by no pillows of
cotton-down or feathers. I found him myself.
Ay, said Najara, for it was the hunchback,
whose companion was no other than the worthy
historian
,
Bernal Diaz del Castillo,Ay, seor
amigo
,
but he was not dead; and we are speaking of
two very different events: to make which palpable
to thy historical wits, we must e'en go back to the
starting point. It is with a man of ill mind as with
a cannonier; who, if he look for the mark of his
ball in a forest, must go back to the place whence
he shot it, and take the range over again.
I do not understand thy trope, said Bernal,
nor what thou meanest by an `ill mind,' not
having
one myself, but one that harbours animosities
against none but Indians. As for Camarga, I found
him myself. It was when we marched out of
Tezcuco
,
by the northern road; for I was then with
Alvarado
,
going to Tacuba. I say it, and it is to my
honour, not shame, that Cortes, when he left the
brigantines, demanded me of Alvarado; `for,' said
he, `Bernal Diaz is one of my best friends, and a
soldier second to none:' which is true, though I say
it myself. De Olid was with us, with his men. The
story is this: When we passed by the cypress-tree
on the hill, I bethought me of a chapter of my book,
which I had lost, I knew not where nor when.
`Now,' said I, `perhaps I left it under this tree;'
for what with the sudden coming of Juan Lerma,
poor fellow, and the quarrel I had with Gaspar on
his account, I departed from that place, without
much thought of what might be left behind me. But
pondering on this, as we passed, I dropped from
the ranks, and hunting about, I saw Camarga lying
mangled at the bottom of the hill; and when we
came to examine him, it was plain he had been
strugglingthere for many hours,perhaps, all night.
We thought he was dead; but Juan Catalan, the
cannonier, who is so good at a fresh wound, said,
his heart was yet beating, and he might live. So
we sent him back to Tezcuco, then in charge of
Guzman, that the Indian doctors might see what
could be done for him. And there he died.
Ay, if we can believe Guzman, said Najara;
and no doubt, he did: but
how?
Know now,
Bernal
,
for thou art too innocent to look further than
thy nose, that this man's death has made a great
noise at head-quarters; for, somehow, they have
come to associate it with the marvellous
disappearance
of La Monjonaza; for which there are but two
ways of accounting.
As how? said Bernal, gravely. `Gil Ortaga
told me, he saw her ghost, six nights after, in
Iztapalapan
,
dragging the spirit of Villafana by the hair;
which frightened him very much.
The first thought, said Najara, is, that she
drowned herself for the love of Juan Lerma, of
whichthat is, of her love, at leastthere is some
proof that might be mentioned, were there any
wisdom
in speaking it; and the second, that Guzman
hid her in some den about Tezcuco, trusting to the
departure of Cortes on the morrow. It is well
known that Guzman will play rival with the devil
himself, if he have taken a fancy to a woman.
Fu, said Bernal, that is a foolish thought.
Dost thou not know, demanded the
hunchback
,
that he is in disgrace, for acts still darker
than these? He abused the Indians in the palace,
robbing them of their gold and women, at his will,
and greatly incensed the young king Ixtlilxochitl,
who complained to Cortes. Cortes sailed to
Tezcuco
in person, and removed him from his
government
;
and now he is in such disgrace, that were it
not for some old friendship between him and the
Captain-General, it is thought, Cortes would
utterly
renounce him. The Indians say, that he
murdered
Camarga, when the poor man was
recovering
.
But this is improbable. Camarga was a
stranger, and without foes. Yet his fate has
greatly
troubled the general. As for the lady Infeliz, Don
Francisco persists in averring that he knows
nothing
about her. He brought a Tlascalan, who
swore he saw both her and Camarga walk out from
the northern gate together, during the review;
whereby he would have us believe they fell into
the hands of the Mexicans; but Indians will swear
anything, if you tell them how. It is said, that
Guzman
has got permission to serve in the fleet with
Garci Holguin, his old friend. They are two
daredevils
together, and neither in very good odour;
so they will doubtless do some desperate act to
regain
favour.Hark, Bernal! dost thou hear
nothing
?
Nothing but the whistling of the Indians at the
fire;for that is the way they make their signals.
We shall have hot work to-morrow, Najara.
Hark!Ah, 'tis the sound of oars! One of the
night-ships is approaching the dike. What's i' the
wind now?Hah, sirrah! what brings thee out of
limits?
These words were directed to a tall man, cloaked
to the eyes, whom they had not before noticed, who
stood hard by, peering into the lake, as if he sought
to discover the approaching vessel. Najara hobbled
up to him, in no little dudgeon, and repeated the
question, before the stranger deigned to answer
him. He then turned, and replied, with great
coolness,
12 *
Curiosity, crookback, curiosity,some little
itching to know how thou and thy brother ass,
Bernal Diaz, discourse of thy betters. Well,
rogues, have you done? have you despatched mine
honour twice over again? I am not in good odour,
hah? I have murdered Camarga, and suborned
Indians to invent fables of La Monjonaza? Out
upon ye, fools! I thought thou wert not so
sodden-brained
,
Najara!
As if his voice were not enough to make him
known, the cavalier removed the cloak from his
visage, and exhibited the iron features of Don
Francisco de Guzman, illuminated by the watchfire
hard by. There was something about his
countenance
unusually dark and fierce; yet he did not
speak angrily, although Najara perceived he must
have overheard some of his concluding expressions.
But Najara was not a man to be daunted even by
a stronger arm and a sterner eye. He replied
therefore, with composure,
What we have said, seor Don Francisco,
we have said, and may take the same liberty again.
But under your favour, seor, I am, just now, the
captain of the guard; and as I cannot number you
among my company, I must e'en make bold to ask
your will, as well as your business, here, in advance
of the post?
Thou shalt ask, and be answered, said
Guzman
,
clapping his fingers to his lips, and whistling
with a strength that might have done honour to
the neighbouring infidels, though in a manner
differing
entirely from any of their signals. One,
two,three,and
too-whit! too-whit!
like a
hungry
kite in the morning! Dost thou understand
that
, mi Corcobado? If thou dost not, then
poco
poco, y paciencia
, as we say after dinner; for
presently
thou shalt be made wiser. After which, get
thee to thy dogs there, in the mud, and snore with
them.Ah,
amigo y hermano!
Garci,
mi
corazoncito
!
I will know thy pipe among a thousand, for
it whistles out of the nose, like the hiss of a
serpent
!Fare
ye well, patches; and heaven send ye
a rough rouse in the morning.
While the cavalier was yet speaking, a little boat
from the brigantine, the heavy oars of which they
had long since heard, though they could scarce
trace it in the gloom, shot against the causeway;
and an officer of a powerful frame and forbidding
aspect, just rendered visible by the fire, rising up,
extended his hand to Guzman, who immediately
jumped aboard, and took a seat at his side. It was
then pushed off, and soon vanished on the lake.
There they go, said Najara, not without
admiration
,
two imps after the devil's own liking,
strong-handed, tough-headed, hard-hearted! Wo
betide ye, brown lambkins of Mexico! for these
wolves have scented a hole in your pinfold. I tell
thee, Bernal, man, we shall have rare work
to-morrow
,
and these men will make it rarer. When the
gall comes from Guzman's lips, the devil is
waked up in his liver. `A rough rouse in the
morning!' For thy good wish, mayst thou have as
rugged a couch in the eveningAmen! for I love
thee not.
CHAPTER XIII.
The
two subalterns now rejoined their
companions
,
and passing them, as they stood patiently
to their arms, waiting for the dawn and the battle,
they crept through the sleepers towards the cannon,
which were placed in the rear, the cannoniers
sleeping around them. Here, they found a solitary
individual of the watch they had relieved, leaning
moodily against one of the pieces, instead of sharing
the slumber of his comrades.
Bernal Diaz surveyed him for a moment, and
then touched him on the shoulder:
Townsman, said he, it is but a foolish thing
of thee to stand upon thy legs, watching, when thy
guard duty is over. Sleep a little, GasparWe
shall have toilsome work to-morrow.
Sleep thyself, Bernal, replied Gaspar Olea.
What care I for sleep? Come, get thee into the
mud, and I will take thy place. Thou shalt have
my cloak, too, if thou wilt, to keep the rain outI
can warm me by walking.
I will do no such thing, said Bernal, grasping
the hand of his friend, though Gaspar turned from
him, and seemed desirous to continue the
conversation
no longer; if thou wilt wake, why well. I
will talk thee out of thy melancholy. Thou art very
much changed, Gaspar. I know not why thou
shouldst grieve after this boy. Thou must now
confess, he is unworthy thy friendship.
Gaspar returned no answer, and Bernal continued
to give consolation by inflicting pain,which is the
common way.
It is allowed by all, that he is a renegade; and
doubtless, also, he has become a worshipper of false
gods; for he who will turn his sword against his
countrymen, is a rogue and a blasphemerThat
is my opinion. Gil Ortaga said
The fiend seize Ortaga, and thee into the
bargain
!
said Gaspar, angrily. If a deer be
wounded
,
and hide himself in a by-way, his fellows will
not hunt after him, to gore him!Why shouldst
thou have less humanity than a deer?
Come, Gaspar, if I have offended thee, I ask
thy pardon, said Bernal Diaz; for thou art my
townsman and friend, though we have quarrelled
sometimes; and what I say, I say with a good
meaning.
Gaspar looked over his shoulder, and finding
that Najara had returned to the front, he grasped
Bernal's hand, and said earnestly,
Let there be ill will and ill words between us
no more; for who knows what may come to us
to-morrow
?
I know what is said of Juan Lerma. He
is with the infidelsbut what drove him among
them? He is a renegade, too,yet what made
him so? He teaches the enemy to cut ditches and
throw up ramparts, to lay ambushes and attack
ships, and a thousand other feats and stratagems,
not to be looked for among barbarians. This they
say,all say; and some swear they have seen
him, in a Mexican cloak, fighting at the head of the
pagans, and knew him by his stature and voice.
Let us believe all thisWhat then? Bernal, it is a
thought that preys upon me, remembering his
honour
,
his goodness, and truth,and this it is,that
a damnable malice has driven him, against his own
will, into the den of perdition. Hark thee, here, in
thine earThou rememberest the expedition to the
South Sea? Before that, thou knowest, I was in
great favour with Cortes, whom I loved well, for
he had done me many good deeds in Cuba. About
that time, Juan Lerma lost favour, and no one
knew why; for as to censuring the indignities
offered
to Montezuma, that was a crime committed
by some hundreds besides, who were never
punished. The cause, Bernal, the true cause,I
would I might tell thee the true cause: but I swore
an oath never to breathe it to mortal man. But
this
I may speak, (and thou must afterwards
forget
it.) I see things more clearly than I did before;
and methinks, this night, mine eyes are further
opened. I see very well, that we are all deluded
and abused, and Juan Lerma an innocent man.
Hearken then to what I say. One night, Cortes
came to me, looking more like a demon than a
man, and he said to me, `Gaspar Olea, thou must
kill me a snake, that has stung me upon the breast.'
And with that he told me a thing, which I cannot
speak; but this followedI agreed that I would
kill Juan Lerma.
Thou art beside thyself, Gaspar! said Bernal,
with the utmost astonishment.
I had good reason given to me, continued
Olea; and at that time I had but little
acquaintance
with the young man, and no love; and I was
bound very strongly to Cortes. Understand me,
Bernal: I did not consent to play the part of an
assassin, for that was no part for Gaspar Olea. But
being convinced the thing was just, and that the
young man was a knave deserving death, I agreed
to exasperate him into a quarrel; wherein I
appeased
my conscience, by thinking of the risk I ran,
he being reckoned very good at all weapons. But
what dost thou think? The very next night comes
me Cortes again, with quite another story. `
Gaspar
,'
said he, `the thing I told thee was false, and I
have done the young man a wrong.
Wherefore
,
quarrel with him not, and forget what I have
told thee; adding many things which satisfied my
mind, that the youth was an innocent man, very
basely slandered. This caused me to think well of
him; and I consented to go with him to the South
Sea. There, Bernal, I learned to love him, for he
was brave, and noble, and good;ay, by my faith,
I loved him better than ever I had loved the
general
.
But `What then?' you will say; `Whereto
tends this?' To thisand it is damnable to think
upon: The General deceived me,he repented
having made me his confidant; but he still longed
for the blood of Juan Lerma. Hence the South
Sea scheme, devised for our destruction(At this
moment, I see it plainly,)for Juan's, because of
the General's hate, and for
mine
, Bernal, because
he had confided to me a secret of which he was
ashamed. Ay, by my faith! he repented him that
passion had made him so indiscreet; and therefore
designed to put me out of the way. The soldiers
have a story that he was angry with me for some
freedom of speech. This is false. He smiled on
me to the last, and thus lulled my fears. Neither
Juan nor myself had any suspicion of evil
intentions
.
He made it appear, that the expedition was
given to us, because of his regard for our courage;
and he deigned to tell me in secret, that his chief
reason for sending Lerma, was that he might be
angered no longer by his censures,Juan being
then very melancholy and peevish, in consequence
of the death of some old companion he had killed in
Espaola. But, Bernal, he deceived us both, as I
can now see clearly. He made it appear to the
soldiers, that he was sorry to punish JuanNay
some said he shed tears, among the Indians, when
he signed the death-warrant. But this was
hypocrisy
.
I know that he was rejoiced; for he
remembered
the old cause, and abhorred him.
Marry, said Bernal Diaz, it cannot be
doubted
he did. But the cause, Gaspar? I do not ask
thee, what it was: but was it enough to excuse
such rancour?
If true,
yes
, replied Gaspar, with deep
emphasis
:
But it was not true. Juan was innocent. I
have probed his heart a thousand times, while we
were in the desert together, and when he knew not
what I was doing. He has not wronged Cortes
no, nor any other living creature. This I told the
General, when we returned to Tezcuco, after the
campaign round the lake. But what wouldst thou
think? He averred that he had forgot the thing;
that it was very foolish;a groundless slander
brought against Juan by an enemy;that he loved
him as well as ever, and proceeded against him
only on account of broken laws and decrees;that
he durst not pardon him, since his affection was
well known, (his
affection
, Bernal!) and the men
would cry out against his favouritism. I knew he
spoke falsely, and so I told him. He hardened my
heart; and then I ran to Villafana, who had the
power to save him, and promised to make him our
chief captain.
Now that you speak of Villafana, said Bernal,
it reminds me of this: Why, had Juan Lerma
been a man of honour and a Christian, should he
have joined in the murderous plots of that
detestable
traitor?
Thou shouldst ask that of
me
, said Gaspar,
fiercely. But it matters not. Who says that
Juan Lerma joined him? Najara avers that he kept
them from speech together; and Luis Rafaga, who
died of the wounds he got among the piraguas, a
week since, declared to his comrades as well as the
priest, (and being of the prison-guard, he knew all,)
that Juan fought in the prison with Villafana, about
the list, the very night that Villafana was hanged,
and would have been killed, but for the coming of
La Monjonaza. I saw the traitor, myself, when he
came among the cavaliers; and he was hurt in the
shoulder. Does this look like joining him? Trust
me, Bernal, we have done a great wrong to my
young captain; and I cannot die, without thinking
that I leave behind me one man, at least, to do him
justice. This is what I say:Not his crime, but
the general's secret malice, has driven him among
the infidels. He is a prisoner with them, or
perhaps
he has already died the death of sacrifice.
They lie, who say they have seen, or will see him
in arms against us. On this I will gage my life;
and I pray heaven to take it, the moment the pledge
is forfeited! I swear itAmen.
The worst point in the character of a dog, is
that, in all the quarrels betwixt others of his
species
,
he always takes part against the feebler. In
this particular, he is sometimes aped by his
master
,not,
indeed, in an absolute conflict between
man and man; for ninety in a hundred will, in such
case, befriend the weaker party,but in those
combats
which an individual wages with an evil
destiny
.
Ill thoughts naturally follow upon ill luck;
and it is the curse of misfortune to be followed by
ungenerous suspicion and still more odious
crimination
.
As the whole army were acquainted with
the manner of Juan's flight, or rather captivity,
they did not hesitate to believe him up in arms
against them; and every repulse which they
endured
from the barbarians, they traced to the
malignance and activity of the exile's treason.
Fear and invention together clothed him with the
vestments of a fallen angel; and if some savage,
more gigantic and ferocious than the rest,
distinguished
himself in the front of battle, straightway
VOL. II. 13
a dozen voices invoked curses upon the head of
the unhappy Lerma. There were few who did
not forget his sorrows and wrongs, and speak of
him only with execrations; and many had already
begun to anticipate, as the chief triumph of victory,
and the most delightful of all their hopes, the
privilege
of burning him alive on the temple-top, or
even sacrificing him to their vengeance, after the
equally horrific manner of the Mexicans.
While Bernal Diaz was thus conversing with
the outcast's only friend, there came from the
distant
gates of Xoloc, a suppressed hum, as of an
army arising from its slumbers. This was soon
followed by the sound of heavy bodies of men,
approaching
over the causeway; and it soon became
evident, that the morn was to be ushered in with
the usual horrors of contention.
Up, knaves! cried the voice of the hunchback,
ye grumbling, growling, wallowing, swine, that
call yourselves lions and tigers! up, and shake the
clay from your cloaks, before it is trodden off by
the hoofs of the horsemen!
As he spoke, a cavalier galloped up to the party,
and drawing in his steed, while the men rose to
their feet, he exclaimed,
Halon
, Najara, man! where art thou? Dost
thou talk thus in thy sleep?
Ay, may it please your excellency, said the
hunchback, recognizing the voice of Cortes; for
it is well, on such a post, that a soldier should
have the faculty of issuing commands asleep, as
well as waking.
Dost thou hear, Diaz? muttered Gaspar in his
companion's ear. Wouldst thou think now to
what the devil has tempted me, ever since I have
seen clearly that of which I have spoken? I tell
thee, man, I have sometimes thought it were but a
turn of good friendship, to kill the man who has
brought these things upon Juan Lerma!
Thou art mad! said the historian in alarm.
But his further remonstrance was cut short by
Cortes riding by, and even urging his charger,
though at a cautious pace, beyond the watch-fire,
as if to reconnoitre with his own eyes, the situation
of the foe.
Fear me not, said Gaspar, bitterly. You
shall see me do what I have done before at
Xochimilco
,pluck
him out of the jaws of the devourers,
if need be. I think I was then enchanted; for,
when I saw the Indians have him off his horse, I
said to myself, `If I let him die now, no harm happens
to Juan Lerma.' But comelet us follow after
him. And bid some of your dull sluggards along
with us, lest the pagans should make a sally from
the rampart. Hark! he has ridden up, till their
fire shines on his armour, and they see him! He
will have the villains upon us, before the
reinforcements
arrive!
The Captain-General did, indeed advance so far
that he was seen by the pagan sentinels, who
whistled out a shrill note of alarm, and then bent
their bows against him, till his corslet and the iron
buckler which he carried before his face, rattled
under the crashing arrowheads. Thus admonished,
he rode a little back, and was joined by three or
four other cavaliers, who came galloping up from
the causeway.
What say ye, cavaliers? he cried. Methinks
there is not even a duck lying near the
causey-side
,
much less a brace or two of my brigantines.
If your excellency be looking for the ships,
said Najara, I can satisfy your mind. There
were some five or six here an hour since: I heard
the plunging of their anchors on both sides of the
dike.
Ah! I will set thine ears against mine eyes any
dark morn, Corcobado.Fetch up the Indians,
Quinones; and bid the horsemen follow at their
heels. And hark ye, Najara,let your drowsy
knaves take post on the causey-sides, lest they be
trampled to death under the feet of my red
pioneers
.
Wheel up the pieces some ninety or an
hundred paces in advance; and see that your
matchsticks be dry and combustible. Where didst
thou hear the sound of the anchors?
But a little distance on the lake; and methinks
I can see two of the vessels on the left, betwixt us
and the Indians.His valour, Don Garci Holguin,
did but now take up the seor Guzman
A pest upon Guzman! said the general,
sharply
.
Get thee to thy men, and move me the
ordnance
without delay.
`A pest upon Guzman? muttered Gaspar.
I have a thought of him also; but I know not that
he has done Juan a wrong. At all events, methinks,
his case is like mine.The general's secrets are
unlucky.
With that, he retired, and took post among the
soldiers.
In a few moments, a numerous body of Indian
auxiliaries made their appearance, bearing, besides
their ordinary weapons, which were slung on their
backs, certain hoes and mattocks, called
coas
, some
of stone, others of copper, but most of them of some
hard wood. It was the business of these men to
fill up the ditches, after the defenders had been
driven
away by a fierce cannonade from the ships,
and by incessant discharges of stones and arrows
from fleets of piraguas, manned by other Indian
confederates, which lay near the brigantines. And
here it may be observed, that the labour of filling a
ditch was much inferior to that of re-opening it; and
the causeways being constructed of stones as well
as clay, it was not possible to remove the former to
any great extent. Hence, the gaps that had been
once or twice filled, remained, notwithstanding the
toil of the besieged, so shallow, that they might, at
almost any period, be forded; though this, usually,
was not done, until they were filled above the level
of the water.
Immediately after these pioneers, came a small
body of horsemen, behind whom were ranged the
lancers and swordsmen; the musketeers and
crossbowmen
being chiefly distributed among the ships.
These arrangements having been made, and the
Tlascalans halting within the distance of two
hundred
paces from the ditch, and throwing themselves
flat upon their faces on the causeway, to guard
against the first volleys of the foe, all were directed
to remain in repose, until the coming daylight
should give the signal for battle.
Nothing now broke the silence of the hour, save
the dropping sound of paddles from two numerous
squadrons of canoes, filled with allies, which were
stationed on the flanks of the rear.
13*
CHAPTER XIV.
Slowly
the morning dawned; and the foremost
Tlascalan, raising his head from the earth, could
behold, dimly relieved against an atmosphere of
mist, the outlines of the foe, yet loitering upon the
rampart behind the ditch, and warming his naked
body, for the last time, over his smouldering fire.
And now, also, were seen the brigantines, four in
number, which had taken post, long before day, on
either flank of the ditch, while a line of well-manned
piraguas extended some distance beyond them.
The savages gathered up their arms, and leaping
upon the ramparts, shook them with defiance at the
besiegers, taunting them with such words of
opprobrium
as marked both their hatred and resolution.
Ho-ah! ho-ah! What says the king of
Castile
?
what says the king of Castile? they cried,
for all the offers of peace and composition, (sent
occasionally by the hands of liberated captives,)
being
made by Cortes in the name of his master, the
barbarians prefaced every defiance by expressing
their contempt for his authority,what says the
king of Castile? He is a woman,he shows not his
face,he is a woman. What says Malintzin?
what says Malintzin? He calls for peace,he is a
coward: he fights in the house, when his foe is a
prisoner, but he calls for peace, when Mexico
comes out upon the causeways. What say the
Teuctlis,the Spaniards,the sons of the gods?
They bring the Tlascalans, to fight their battles,
the Tlascalans, the Tezcucans, the Chalquese, and
the other little dogs of Mexico. Their flesh is very
bitter, and their hearts sour: the mitzlis and
ocelotls
,
the wolves and the vultures, in the king's
garden
,
say, `Give us better food, for this is the flesh
of crocodiles.' What say the men of Tlascala?
They are slaves,they say they are slaves, and
what matters it where they fight? If Malintzin
prevail
,
wo for Tlascala! for he will scourge her with
whips, and burn her with brands, even from the
old man with gray hairs down to the little infant
that screams: If Mexico be victorious, wo for
Tlascala
!
for we will strike her down with our swords,
as we strike the maize-stalks in the harvest-field.
Ho-ah! ho-ah! Come on, then, ye women,
cowards
,
and slaves! for we are Mexicans, and our
gods are hungry!
With such ferocious exclamations, the bold
barbarians
provoked the besiegers; and with such
they were used, each morning, to incite them to the
work of slaughter.
The Spaniards still stood fast, and the
Tlascalans
lay upon the earth, receiving the arrows that
were for awhile shot at them; until the Mexicans,
exhausting their voices with outcries, at last ceased
to continue them, and assumed an attitude as
quiescent
as that of their foes.
While they thus remained, each party staring
the other in the face, and the rapidly increasing light
made it evident that a very considerable multitude
of infidels were gathered upon the dike, a trumpet
was winded behind the Tlascalans, in one single,
prolonged, and powerful note, that woke up the
echoes of mountains, even at the distance of leagues.
It was answered, first from the west, from the dike
of Tacuba, in a blast both strong and cheery, and
immediately after, though much more faintly, from
the northern causeway, where Sandoval was
marshalling
his forces.
As soon as these signals, for such they were, had
been exchanged between the leaders, the trumpet
of Cortes sounded again, with a succession of short,
sharp, and fierce notes, such as blast fury into
men's hearts, through their ears. Instantly, and as
if by enchantment, the four falconets in the
brigantines
were discharged, and swept hundreds of the
barbarians from the causeway, Then followed the
rattle of musketry, mingled with the clang of
crossbows
;
which din was continued, until the gunners,
loading again, discharged their pieces a second time
upon the enemy. And now the Tlascalan pioneers,
springing up, rushed, with wild yells to the ditch,
which they began to fill with frantic speed.
Notwithstanding the boldness of their defiance,
the Mexicans made a much less manly resistance
than was expected. But they stood as long as
any human beings could do, exposed between
two deadly batteries, both plied with unexampled
activity, and both strengthened by the addition of
the native archers in the piraguas. They handled
their bows and slings as they could, and they
cheered
one another with shouts; but it was evident
that they must soon give way, and take post
behind some ditch unapproachable by the
brigantines
.
As soon as this became known, the Spanish
footsoldiers
began to encourage one another, in
anticipation
of the charge which they were soon to be
called on to make; and Bernal Diaz, losing his
grave equanimity, in the prospect of adding another
leaf to his chaplet of immortality, ran briskly to and
fro, in virtue of his official rank, which could scarce
be defined in any one title of modern military
nomenclature
,
and cheered every soldier with whom
he happened to be well acquainted. In the course
of his rounds, he fell upon Gaspar, from whom he
had been before separated, and whom he now
seized by the hand, crying,
Now, Gaspar, my dear brother of Medina del
Campo, we shall have such a rouse among the red
infidels as will make posterity stare.
He was then about to extend his exhortations to
others, when Gaspar arrested him, turning upon
him, to his great surprise, a countenance extremely
pale and agitated.
Art thou sick, man? cried the historian, or
art thou worn out with watching? A few knocks,
Gaspar, will soon warm thy blood.
Bernal, said his friend, with an unnatural
laugh, wert thou ever in fear?
In fear? echoed Bernal Diaz. Never, before
an infidel;never, at least, but
once
, when they
had me in their hands, and I thought they were
carrying me to the temple.
What were thy feelings then? demanded
Gaspar
,
with singular eagerness: Was there ice in
thy bosom, and lead in thy brain? Were thy lips
cold and thy tongue hot? Did thy hand shake, thy
teeth chatter, thy leg fail?Faugh! what should
make
me
fear to go into battle?
Fear!
thou
fear? said Bernal, anxiously.
Thou art beside thyself, never believe me else,
frenzied with over-watching.
I tell thee, said Gaspar, with a grin that was
indeed expressive of terror, that, if thou hunt this
whole army through, thou wilt not find a
white-livered
loon of them all, who is, at this moment,
more a coward than myself. Why should I be so?
Is there an axe at my ear, and a foot on my breast?
There are an hundred stout Spaniards, and thirty
score Tlascalans betwixt me and the foe; and yet
I am in great terror of mind. I have heard that
such things are forewarnings!
If thou art of this temper, indeed, said honest
Bernal, with more disgust than he cared to
conceal
,
get thee to the rear, in God's name, and thou
mayst light somewhere upon a flask of
maguey-liquor
.
Shame upon thee, man! canst thou be so
faint-hearted?
Ay! replied Gaspar; yet I go not to the rear,
notwithstanding. I thought thou shouldst have
counselled me.Fare thee well, then, Bernal
Thou dost not know, that one can be in terror of
death, and yet meet death without flinching. Fare
thee well, brother; and what angry things I have
said to thee, forget, even for the sake of our early
days. Fare thee well, Bernal, fare thee well.
The Barba-Roxa locked his friend in a warm
embrace, kissed him on both cheeks, and then
starting away, rushed towards the front, with an
alacrity that seemed utterly to disprove his
humbling
confession. Whether or not fear had, indeed,
for the first time in his life, beset him, it is certain
that Gaspar Olea did, that day, achieve exploits
which eclipsed those of the most distinguished
cavaliers, and consecrated his memory for ever in
the hearts of his comrades.
The Tlascalans, working with furious zeal, had
now so choked up the ditch, that stones and earth
already appeared above the water. The Mexicans
wavered, and seemed incapable of maintaining
their post for a moment longer.
The fiery spirit of the Captain-General became
incensed with impatience and hope. He rose upon
his stirrups, and exalting his voice, always of vast
and thrilling power, exclaimed,
This time, brothers! we will seize the bridges
before the pagans have leisure to destroy them.
Footmen! see that ye follow after the horse, with
all your speed. Cavaliers! put your lances in rest,
and be ready. What, trumpeter! speak thy signal
to the pioneers; and, brave hearts! fear not the gap,
for it is strong enough to support you.Sound,
trumpeter, sound!
The trumpeter winded a peculiar blast, and the
Tlascalans, dividing asunder, flung themselves,
from either side of the causeway, into the lake,a
feat often before practised,and thus left the whole
space up to the ditch vacant for the horsemen. At
a second blast of the instrument, the cavaliers
spurred up to the chasm, and crossing it as they
could, and clambering over the rampart, dashed
down at once upon the disordered infidels. The
footmen followed, running with all their strength,
and returning the cheers, with which those in the
ships beheld the exploit of the cavalry.
Meanwhile, the Mexicans, seized with unusual
consternation, fled with great haste towards the
city, pursued so closely by the cavaliers, that they
made no attempt at a stand, even at the second
ditch; nor did they pause a moment, according to
their usual tactics, to destroy the bridge that
spanned it. It was indeed a narrow chasm, with
an unfinished breastwork, and could not have been
maintained for an hour. Another, equally narrow
and indefensible, occurred at a distance of less than
two hundred paces; and at such intervals, it
appeared
that the dike was perforated, as far as it
extended
,
even within the limits of the island.
The ardour of the cavaliers, aided by that
incentive
to valour, the back of the foe, carried them
over three several bridges, before they bethought
them of the propriety of drawing up their horses a
little, and waiting for the footmen.
Halon
! halt! and God give us better heads to
our helmets, or better helms to our heads! cried
Juan of Salamanca, a valiant young hidalgo, who
had won immortal renown upon the field of
Otumba
:
Does your excellency intend that we twenty
Paladins of Spain shall sack this city with our
lances and bucklers? In my mind, we should
divide
a moiety of the honour with those who will
share a full half of the profit.
Ay, said another, an ancient hidalgo, as all
checked their steeds at the sudden call of the
young man: We should be wise, lest we fall
into an ambush. Let us wait here for the
footmen
.
And have the bridges torn up before our eyes!
cried Cortes; with ungovernable fire. Heaven
fights for us to-day; the infidels are seized with a
panic, and they are but few in number.
Say not so, seor, exclaimed Salamanca,
pointing in front, where they could see the
fugitives
checked by what seemed a flood of armed
men, pouring out from the city. They are in no
panic; but we took them too early. Their drum
has not yet been beaten upon the temple-top; but
we shall hear it now, soon enough.What ho! ye
lame ducks with swords and lances! ye lagging
footmen! come on like men, and be fleeter.
Let us pass on, at least, slowly, said Cortes.
The footmen are nigh, and we may yet gain two
or three bridges. Do you not see, we are almost
upon the island?Hark! I hear the trumpet of
Alvarado!He will win the race to the pyramid!
Press on, gallant cavaliers, press on!
They were indeed within but a short distance
from the island, surrounded by the ruins of the
water suburb; and it seemed yet easy to secure, at
least, two more bridges, over which the fugitives
had fled without pausing, and which could be
gained
before the causeway should be obstructed by the
advance of the dense column from the city.
Calling
out therefore to the infantry to hasten, and
finding
themselves already joined by two or three of
the fleetest of foot, of whom the Barba-Roxa was
one, they again dashed onwards, and secured the
desired passes.
They now found themselves so near to the
island, as to be within reach of annoyance from the
adjoining housetops; and this circumstance,
together
with the unexpected conduct of the
Mexicans
,
produced such alarm in the bosom of the
cavalier who had seconded Salamanca's caution
before, that he exclaimed,
Seor mio, and good brothers, let us think a
little what we do, before proceeding further. Let
us beware of an ambuscado. The knaves yielded
us the rampart, almost without a blow; and they
leave the ditches bridged behind them. This is
not the way Mexicans fight, when they fight
honestly. Lo you, now, yonder is a herd of twenty
thousand men, with flags and banners, and they
stop at sight of us, as if in dismay! What does this
mean, if not some decoy for a stratagem?
It means, said Cortes, that they are in a
perplexity, because their priests have not yet given
them the signal to fall on: and of this perplexity it
should be our wisdom to take advantage. See,
now, the dogs are in confusion!Nay, by my
conscience! 'tis the confusion of attack, and they
come against us! Couch your lances, and at them!
for it is better they should feel the weight of our
horses, than we the shock of their stormy bodies.
On, footmen, on! spur, cavaliers, spur! Santiago
and Spain! and down with the paynim scum!
At these words of exhortation, the horsemen
closed their ranks, shouted their war-cries, and
dashed with fearless audacity upon the advancing
warriors. They swept the causeway, like a moving
wall, and however insignificant their numbers, it
did not seem possible for the enemy to withstand
VOL. II. 14
the violence of their onset; indeed, before a drop
of blood was shed, they manifested such symptoms
of hesitation and wavering, as greatly exalted the
courage of the assailants. They plied their slings
and arrows, indeed, they darted their javelins,
brandished their spears, and added their discordant
shrieks and wild whistling to the shouts of the
Spaniards; but still it was in a kind of confusion
and disorder, that showed them to be, from some
cause or other, not yet prepared for combat. Nay,
some were seen, as the galloping squadron
approached
,
to cast themselves into the lake, as if in
fear, and swim to the nearest ruins for protection.
This degree of disrelish for battle was a
phenomenon
,
so unusual in the character of barbarians
brave not only to folly, but to madness, that a wary
commander would have laid it to heart, and
pondered
over it with suspicion. But not so the
Captain-General
.
He remembered, with Salamanca,
that the sound of the enormous drum on the temple
of Mexitli, with which, each morning, the Mexican
emperor gave the signal for battle, had not yet been
heard; and as there seemed to be as close, and almost
as fanatical, a connexion between the thunder of
this instrument and the courage of the pagans, as
he had found, in former days, in the case of the
sacred horn, he did not doubt that their present
timidity was caused entirely by the failure of the
signal. Perhaps he thought it increased also by
their sense of weakness; for, now that he was
nigh, it became obvious that their numbers were
much less considerable than they had appeared at
a distance. At all events, they were in fear, and
they wavered; which was enough to give his valour
the upperhand of his prudence.It is with martial
ardour as with a pestilence;it ravens most furiously
among the ranks of fear.
Fierce, therefore, was the zeal of his cavaliers,
and their hearts flamed at the thought of blood.
They raised their voices in a cry of victory, and
bounded like thunderbolts among their opponents.
The shock was decisive; in a moment, the whole
mass of pagans was put to rout. They flung down
their arms, and betook themselves to flight. Those
who could, fled down along the dike into the city;
others flung themselves into the water, and swam
to the island, or to the neighbouring ruins. The
only ones who made resistance, were those whose
hearts were transfixed by Spanish lances, before
they could turn to retreat. Such men uttered the
yell of battle, and, in their dying agonies, thrust
with their own hands, the spears further through
their vitals, that they might be nearer to the foe,
and strike the macana once more for Tenochtitlan.
On, ye men of the foot! cried the
Captain-General
.
Let the Tlascalans fire the houses
behind
me; for now we are again upon the island.
Charge, cavaliers, charge! The saints open a path
for us. Charge, my brothers, charge! and
viva
for Spain and our honour!
CHAPTER XV.
The
horsemen pursued along the dike, spearing,
or tumbling into the water, the few who had the
heart to resist; and so great was, or seemed, the
terror of the barbarians, that the victors penetrated
even within the limits of the island, until the turrets
of houses, from which they were separated only by
the lateral canals, darkened them with their
shadows
.
Upon these were clustered many pagans,
who shot at them both arrows and darts, but with
so little energy, that it seemed as if despondence
or fatuity had robbed them of their usual vigour.
Hence, the excited cavaliers gave them but little
attention
,
not doubting that they would be soon
dislodged
by the infantry. They were even
regardless
of circumstances still more menacing; and if a
lethargy beset the infidel that day, it is equally
certain
that a species of distraction overwhelmed the
brains of the Spaniards. It seemed as if the great
object of their ambition depended more upon their
following the fugitives to the temple-square than
upon any other feat; and to this they encouraged
one another with vivas and invocations to the
saints. They could already behold the huge bulk
of the pyramid, rising up at the distance of a mile,
as if it shut up the street; and its terraced sides,
thronged with multitudes of men, seemed to prove
to them, that the frighted Mexicans were running
to their gods for protection. It is true, they
perceived
vast bodies of infidels blocking up the
avenue
afar, as if to dispute their passage beyond the
canalled portion of the island; but they regarded
them with scorn.
They rushed onwards, occasionally arrested by
some flying group, but only for a moment.
There was a place, not far within the limits of
the island, where they found the causeway, for the
space of at least sixty paces, so delved and pared
away on either side, that it scarce afforded a
passage
for two horsemen abreast. The device was
of recent execution, for they beheld the
mattocks
of labourers still sticking in the earth, as if
that moment abandoned. This circumstance, so
strange, so novel, and so ominous, it might be
supposed
,
would have aroused them to suspicion. The
passage, as it was, so contracted, broken, and
rugged
,
looked prodigiously like the Al-Sirat, or bridge
to paradise of the Mussulmans,that arch, narrow
as the thread of a famished spider, over which it is
so much easier to be precipitated than to pass with
safety. Yet grim and threatening as it was, there
was but one among the cavaliers who raised a
voice of warning. As the Captain-General, without
a moment's hesitation, pushed his horse forward, to
lead the way, and without a single expression of
surprise, the ancient hidalgo, who had twice before
sounded a note of alarm, now exclaimed,
For the love of heaven, pause, seor! This is
a trap that will destroy us.
Art thou afraid, Alderete? cried Cortes,
looking
back to him, grimly. This is no place for a
King's Treasurer, (such was Alderete, the royal
Contador.)Get thee back, then, to the first ditch,
and fill it up to thy liking.
This
will be charge
enough for a volunteer.
14*
I will fight where thou wilt, when thou wilt, and
as boldly as thou wilt, said the indignant cavalier;
but here play the madman no longer.
I will take thy counsel,rest where I am,
and, in an hour's time, see myself shut out from the
city by a ditch, sixty yards wide! God's benison
upon thy long beard! and mayst thou be wiser.
Forward, friends! Do you not see? the knaves are
running amain to check us, and recover their
unfinished
gap! On! courage, and on! Santiago and
at them!
It was indeed as Cortes said. The infidels, who
blocked up the streets afar, were now seen running
towards them, with the most terrific yells, as if to
seize, before it was too late, a pass so easily
maintained
.
The cavaliers, animated by the words of
their leader, were quite as resolute to disappoint
them, and therefore rode across as rapidly as they
could. The pass was not only narrow, but tortuous
and irregular; which increased the difficulties of
surmounting it; so that the Mexicans, running with
the most frantic speed, were within a bowshot,
before
Cortes had spurred his steed upon the broader
portion of the dike. But, as if there were something
dreadful to the infidels, in the spectacle of the great
Teuctli of the East, thus again in their stronghold,
they came to a sudden halt, and testified their
valour
only by yelling, and waving their spears and
banners.
Courage, friends, and quick! cried Cortes.
The dogs are beset with fear, and will not face
us. Ye shall hear other yells in a moment. Haste,
valiant cavaliers! haste, men of Spain! and make
room for the footmen, who are behind you.
The screams of the barbarians were loud and
incessant; but in the midst of the din, as he turned
to cheer his cavaliers over the broken passage,
Don Hernan's ears were struck by the sound of a
Christian voice, calling from the midst of the
pagans
,
with thrilling vehemence,
Beware! beware! Back to the causey!
Beware
!
Hark! cried Alderete, who had already passed;
Our Saint calls to us! Let us return!
It is a trick of the fiend! exclaimed Cortes,
in evident perturbation of mind. Come on, good
friends, and let us seize vantage-ground; or the
dogs will drive us, singly, into the ditches.
Back! back! shouted the cavaliers behind
We are ambushed! We are surrounded!
Their further exclamations were lost in a
tempest
of discordant shrieks, coming from the front
and the rear, from the heavens above, and, as they
almost fancied, from the earth beneath. They
looked northward, towards the pyramid,the
whole broad street was filled with barbarians,
rushing towards them with screams of anticipated
triumph; they looked back to the lake,the
causeway
was swarming with armed men, who seemed
to have sprung from the waters; to either side, and
beheld the canals of the intersecting streets lashed
into foam by myriads of paddles; while, at the same
moment, the few pagans, who had annoyed them
from the housetops, appeared transformed, by the
same spell of enchantment, into hosts innumerable,
with spirits all of fury and flame.
What says the king of Castile? What says
the king of Castile
now?
roared the exulting
infidels
.
Santiago! and God be with us! exclaimed
Cortes, waving his hand, with a signal for retreat,
that came too late: Cross but this devil-trap
again, and
Before he could conclude the vain and useless
order, the drum of the emperor sounded upon the
pyramid. It was an instrument of gigantic size
and horrible note, and was held in no little fear,
especially after the events of this day, by the
Spaniards, who fabled that it was covered with the
skins of serpents. It was a fit companion for the
horn of Mexitli; which latter, however, being a
sacred instrument, was sounded only on the most
urgent and solemn occasions.
The first tap,or rather peal, for the sound
came from the temple more like the roll of thunder
than of a drum,was succeeded by yells still more
stunning; and while the cavaliers, retreating,
struggled
,
one by one, to recross the narrow pass, they
were set upon with such fury as left them but little
hope of escape.
If the rashness of Cortes had brought his friends
into this fatal difficulty, he now seemed resolved to
atone his fault, by securing their retreat, even
although
at the expense of his life. It was in vain
that those few cavaliers who had succeeded in
reaching him, before the onslaught began, besought
him to take his chance among them, and recross,
leaving them to cover his rear.
Get ye over yourselves, he cried, with grim
smiles, smiting away the headmost of the assailants
from the street: If I have brought ye among
coals of fire, heaven forbid I should not broil a little
in mine own person. Quick, fools! over and
hasten! over and quick! and by and by I will
follow
you.
For a moment, it seemed as if the terror of his
single arm would have kept the barbarians at bay.
But, waxing bolder, as they saw his attendants
dropping one by one away, they began to close
upon him, and his situation became exceedingly
critical. He looked over his shoulder, and
perceived
that his followers threaded their way along
the broken dike with less difficulty than he at first
feared. The very narrowness of the passage left
but little foothold for the enemy; and their attacks,
being made principally from canoes, were not such
as wholly to dishearten a cavalier, whose steed was
as strongly defended by mail as his own body.
Encouraged
by this assurance, the Captain-General
still maintained his post, rushing ever and anon
upon the closing herds, and mowing right and left
with his trusty blade, while his gallant charger
pawed down opposition with his hoofs. Thus he
fought, with the mad valour that made his enemies
so often deem him almost a demigod, until satisfied
that his own attempt to cross the pass could no
longer embarrass the efforts of his followers.
Then, charging once more upon the pagans, and
even with greater fury than before, he wheeled
round with unexpected rapidity, and uttering his
famous cry, Santiago and at them! dashed boldly
at the passage.
Seven pagans sprang upon the path. They
were armed like princes, and the red fillets of the
House of Darts waved among their sable locks.
The Teuctli shall have the tribute of Mexico!
shouted one, flourishing a battle-axe that seemed
of weight sufficient, in his brawny arm, to dash out
the charger's brains at a blow. The words were
not understood by Cortes; but he recognized at
once the visage of the Lord of Death.
I have thee, pagan! he cried, striking at the
bold barbarian. The blow failed; for one of the
others, springing at the charger's head with
unexampled
audacity, seized him by the bridle, so that
he reared backwards, and thus foiled the aim of his
rider. The next moment, the Spanish steel fell upon
the neck of the daring infidel, killing him on the
spot; yet not so instantaneously as to avert a
disaster
,
which it seemed the object of his fury to produce.
His convulsive struggles, as he clung, dying, to the
rein, drove the steed off the narrow ledge; and
thus losing his foothold, the noble animal rolled
over into the deep canal, burying the
Captain-General
in the flood.
The general! save the general! shrieked the
only Christian, who, in this horrible mele, (for the
battle was now universal,) beheld the condition of
Cortes, and who, although on foot, and bristling
with arrows that had stuck fast in his
cotton-armour
,
and resisted by other weapons at every step,
had yet the courage to run to the rescue. It was
Gaspar Olea. His visage was yet wan, and
expressive
of the unusual horror preying upon his mind;
yet he rushed forward, as if he had never known a
fear. He exalted his voice, while crying for
assistance
,
until it was heard far back upon the
causeway
;
yet he reached the place of Don Hernan's
mischance alone. The scene was dreadful: the
nobles had flung themselves into the flood, and were
dragging the stunned and strangling hero from the
steed, which lay upon its side on the rugged and
shelving edge of the dike, unable to rise, and
perishing
with the most fearful struggles; while, all the
time, the elated infidels expressed their triumph with
shouts of frantic joy.
Courage, captain! be of good heart, seor!
exclaimed the Barba-Roxa, striking down one of
the captors at a single blow: Courage! for we
have good help nigh, he continued, attacking a
second with the same success: Courage, seor,
courage!
No Mexican helm of dried skins, and no
breastplate
of copper, could resist the machete of a man
like Gaspar. Yet his first success was caused
rather
by the Mexicans being so intently occupied
with their captive, that they thought of nothing else,
than by any miraculous exertion of skill and
prowess
.
He slew two, before they dreamed of attack,
and he mortally wounded a third, ere the others
could turn to drive him back. A fourth rushed
upon him, before he could again lift up his weapon,
and grasping him in his arms, with the embrace of
a mountain bear, leaped with him into the canal.
There were now but two left in possession of
Cortes; yet his resistance even against these was
ineffectual. His sword had dropped from his hand;
a violent blow had burst his helmet, and confounded
his brain; and he had been lifted from the water,
already half suffocated. Yet he struggled as he
could, and catching one of his foes by the throat, he
succeeded in overturning him into the water, and
there grappled with him among the shallows. The
remaining barbarian, yelling for assistance, flung
himself upon the pair; and though twenty
Spaniards
,
headed by Bernal Diaz and the hunchback,
were now within half as many paces, Cortes would
have perished where he lay, had not assistance
arose from an unexpected quarter.
Among the vast numbers who came crowding
from the city over the broken passage, were
several
who knew, by the cry of the seventh noble, that
Malintzin was in his hands; and they rushed
forward
,
to insure his capture. The foremost and
fleetest of these was distinguished from the rest by
a frame of towering height; and, had there been a
Spaniard by to notice him, would have been still
more remarkable from the fact, that he uttered all
his cries in good, expressive Castilian. He bore a
Spanish weapon, too, and his first act, as he flung
himself into the ditch where Cortes was drowning,
was to strike it through the neck of the uppermost
noble. His next was to spurn the other from the
breast of the general, whom he raised to his feet,
murmuring in his ear,
Be of good heart, seor! for you are saved.
What more he would have said and done can
only be imagined; for, at that moment, the
Barba-Roxa
rushed out of the ditch, followed close at
hand by the hunchback, Bernal Diaz, and others,
and seeing his commander, as he thought, in the
hands of a foeman, he lifted his good sword once
again, and smote him over the head, crying,
Down, infidel dog! and
viva
for Spain and our
general!
At this moment, there rushed up a crew of fresh
combatants, Spaniards from the rear and infidels
from the front. But before they closed upon him
entirely, the Barba-Roxa caught sight of the man
he had struck down, and beheld, in his pale and
quivering aspect, the features of Juan Lerma.
The unhappy wretch, thus beholding the beloved
youth, with his own eyes, a leaguer and helpmate of
the infidel, and punished to death, as it seemed, by
his hand, set up a scream wildly vehement, and
broke from the group of Spaniards, who now
surrounded
Cortes, endeavouring to drag him in safety
over the pass. The exile had been seen by others
as well as Gaspar, and many a ferocious cry of
exultation burst from their lips, as they saw him
fall.
Meanwhile, Gaspar, distracted in mind, and
dripping
with blood, for he had not escaped from the
ditch and the fierce embrace of his fourth
antagonist
,
without many severe wounds, endeavoured to
retrace his steps to the spot where Juan had fallen.
It was occupied by infidels, who drove him into the
ditch, where his legs were grasped by a drowning
Mexican, who raised himself a little from the water,
and displayed, between his neck and shoulder, a
yawning chasm, rather than a wound, from which
the blood, at every panting expiration of breath,
rolled out hideously in froth and foam. It was the
Lord of Death, thus struck by Juan Lerma, as he
lay upon the breast of Cortes, and now perishing,
but still like a warrior of the race of America. He
clambered up the body of Gaspar, for it could hardly
be said, that he rose upon his feet; and seeing that
he grasped a Christian soldier, he strove to utter
once more a cry of battle. The blood foamed
from his lips, as from his wound; and his voice was
lost in a suffocating murmur. Yet, with his last
expiring strength, he locked his arms round the
neck of the Spaniard, now almost as much spent as
himself, and falling backwards, and writhing
together
as they fell, they rolled off into the deep
water, where the salt and troubled flood wrapped
them in a winding-sheet, already spread over the
bosoms of thousands.
VOL. II.
CHAPTER XVI.
If
it be indeed permitted to disembodied spirits to
look back to the world they have left, and to read the
hearts they have, in life, mistaken, then should that
of Gaspar Olea have seen, that his unlucky blow
fell not upon the head of an apostate, and that it had
not slain his friend and companion of the
wilderness
.
Even Gaspar's strength failed to pierce
entirely
through a morion composed of tiger-skins and
thickly-padded escaupil; and though the violence
of the blow forced Juan to the earth, and left him
for a time almost insensible, it had done him no
serious injury. It robbed him, to be sure, of the
dearly coveted opportunity of escape, which the
lucky service he had done the Captain-General would
have rendered of still more inestimable value; but
it yet served the good purpose, since he did
not
escape
,
of removing from the minds of the Mexicans
many fierce doubts and suspicions, with which they
beheld him rush into the mele.
He was dragged back upon the causeway, and
soon found himself in the arms of the king.
My brother is brave and true, said the young
monarch, tearing from his own hair the symbols of
military renown, and fastening them to Juan's.
The people have seen his bravery, and now they
know him well. Did he not lay his hands upon
Malintzin? and was not Malintzin his prisoner,
until the red lion with the white and bloody face,
struck my brother with his sword? Is this a good
deed, men of Mexico?
The king's brother is valiant! exclaimed many
nobles, who surrounded the monarch with a guard
of honour, eyeing the outcast with reverence.
Their words stung Juan to the soul; for he
abhorred
his deception, though still urged by his
desire
of escaping, to carry it on.
Why do we stand here idle? he cried, with
affected zeal: Is not Malintzin yet upon the
causeway
?
My heart is very strong; I will look him in
the face again.
At this proof of courage and apparent devotion to
their cause, the infidels shouted with approbation.
But the king took him by the arm, and
withdrawing
him a little, said,
My brother will go now to the palace.What
is this that Azcamatzin says of my brother? He
says that my brother pierced the Lord of Death
with a sword, and pulled Malintzin out of his hands!
This foolish thing of Azcamatzin has made many
angry, and they say, `Let us know; for perhaps
the Great Eagle is for Malintzin.' Therefore my
brother shall not go from the king, till Azcamatzin
thinks better things; for many hurts have made him
mad.
Think not of this, said Juan, eagerly, for every
moment the shouts of the Christians were at a
greater distance, and he feared that every step of
their retreat was one more link taken from his chain
of hope.
My brother, said Guatimozin, interrupting
him, may yet fight the battles of the king, and
be the king's friend. It is said to me, by a
messenger
,
that the ships have broken the wall of my
garden, and that Spaniards are slaying the
women
.
Ha! cried Juan, his own agitation at this
information
,
contrasting strongly with the frigid
placidity of the king.
Why should the king think of his womenof
his wife and his little boy,when he is taking the
Spaniards, like birds in a net? Let my brother
think for the king, for the king thinks for his people.
My brother's arm is yet stronghe will fight for
Zelahualla, and for her sister, the queen.
A thousand contrary emotions tore the breast of
Juan, yet his thoughts were fixed upon the garden.
He remembered what counsel he had given to the
maidens, to sally forth, at any moment, when a
trumpet should be heard among the trees; and he
conceived the danger in which they would be
involved
,
among a troop of enraged and merciless
soldiers. He needed no second exhortation to run
to their assistance; and following Techeechee, who
remained at his side, he made his way through the
multitudes that thronged all the great streets, with
a rapidity that, at any other period, would have
even surprised himself. He passed the great square
of the pyramid, the Wall of Serpents, and the House
of Skulls, from which, had he been so minded, he
might have looked, at the same moment, upon the
three battles raging upon the three several
causeways
,
(for it was here the dikes terminated;) he
passed the house of Axajacatl, in which the
Spaniards
,
a year since, had endured those assaults
which terminated only in their expulsion from
Tenochtitlan
;
and he trod again upon the vast market
square of Tlatelolco, the northern side of which was
bounded by the walls of Guatimozin's palace and
garden. Upon this square he beheld many infidels,
shouting at once with wrath and triumph, a party
of whom bore in their arms a Christian prisoner,
bound hand and foot, over whom the others seemed
to exult, piercing the very heavens with their
clamorous
cries.
Heart-sick, for well he knew the fate in store for
the captive, and struck with foreboding fear, he
rushed over the fosse that laved the garden wall,
and was now choked up by the falling of a portion
of its extent, washed and undermined by the heavy
rains, and passed into the pleasant wilderness
within. It was a theatre of wild disorder and
affright: men were seen rushing to and fro in great
numbers, and their cries were re-echoed by the
yells of a thousand beasts of prey, famished with
hunger, or alarmed by the tumult.
He perceived that the water-wall was rent at one
of the chief sally-ports, as if battered by cannon;
and he had no doubt, if it were not yet over, that
some terrific combat had but lately taken place in
the garden.
He came too late to share in it, but as he ran
down to the water-side, he beheld four brigantines
making their way with oars, for the atmosphere
was breathless, towards the dike of Tepejacae,
which was itself a scene of furious conflict. The
vessels were surrounded by countless canoes and
piraguas, some of which seemed to be manned by
Tlascalans; for while the brigantines were seen
contending with this aquatic army, it was equally
manifest that a battle was raging also among the
canoes themselves.
He gave but little heed to this spectacle, nor did
he scarcely note that among the many human corses
which strewed the lower part of the garden, there
were several with the visages of Spaniards.
His attention was arrested by a yelping cry;
and looking round, he beheld the dog Befo lying
15*
upon the ground, with an iron sword-blade, broken
off near the hilt, sticking quite through his body.
But this painful sight was forgotten, when, having
approached, he beheld three or four barbarians
raising from the earth what seemed the dead body
of Magdalena. There were indeed blood-drops upon
her hollow and ghastly cheeks; and when he rushed
up among the Indians, they exclaimed,
The Teuctlis killed her, the men of Malintzin
with beards,they killed the bright-eyed lady, and
they killed the daughter of Montezuma! And
then they added their wild lamentations to the
mourning cries of Juan.
Distracted himself, as indeed were all the infidels,
he could learn nothing but that the Teuctlis, or
Spaniards, had suddenly burst into the garden, and
besides slaughtering all that opposed them, in their
attempt to reach the palace, had killed, or carried
off, as seemed much more probable, the princess
Zelahualla.
The misery that took possession of his heart
at these evil tidings, he smothered within its secret
recesses, or strove to forget it in the contemplation
of his sisterfor so his heart acknowledged her.
He bore her to the palace, and gave her in charge
to the maidens, who, whatever was their fright,
were not unmindful of the duties of humanity. He
then, in much of that sullen despair that had
oppressed
him in the prison of Tezcuco, returned to
the garden and to Befo, whom he had left in
suffering
,
and drawing the sword-blade from his body, he
examined it with stern curiosity, as if hoping to
penetrate the mystery of the whole unhappy
transaction
,
from such records as it might furnish. His
scrutiny was vain: it was a blade without any
name, by which he might be enabled to guess at its
owner. He snapped it under his foot, and muttered
a malediction upon the unknown foe:
Cursed be he that did this deed, he cried; for
he slew the only protector of a feeble and wretched
woman.
He then carried Befo, almost with as much
tenderness
as he had bestowed upon Magdalena, into
the palace, and stanching his wounds as he could,
deposited him upon his own couch.
CHAPTER XVII.
The
effects of this battle upon the Spaniards
were disastrous in the extreme. The assault, as
has been mentioned, and as was anticipated, was
made upon all the causeways at once; and, on all,
successfully repelled, though an ambuscade was
only attempted upon the dike of Iztapalapan. It
seemed as if the Mexicans, thinned as their
numbers
had been, by so many conflicts, and now the
remainder absolutely perishing under want and
pestilence, had collected all their energies for one
final blow. It was first successful in the quarter
attacked by the Captain-General, in consequence of
his surprising infatuation; and victory soon after
followed in the others. The Spaniards fled, so
completely broken and so utterly defeated, that the
priests, in the wild hope of completing their
destruction
at once, even drew the sacred horn from the
tabernacle of Mexitli, and added its dreadful uproar
to the thunder of the great tymbal. This was
always
regarded by the Mexicans as the voice of the
god himself, and was never sounded without filling
them with a delirium of fury, utterly inconceivable.
It was not more maddening to the infidels than
frightful to the Spaniards; who remembered the
horrors of the Noche Triste, augmented, if not
altogether
caused by its unearthly roar. The
Spaniards
were driven back to their strong and
defensible
stations at the gates; the dikes were lost; and
had not famine now fought for them, they must
have given up the siege in despair. Nearly an
hundred Spaniards, and many thousand Indian
allies
,
were killed; the fleets of canoes and piraguas
were destroyed, and several brigantines wholly
ruined.
But the miseries of the besiegers were not
confined
to the events of the day. Night opened to
them a scene of grief and horror. The whole mass
of the pyramid, always a striking object, was
suddenly
illuminated by a myriad of flambeaux, so
that it blazed like a mountain of solid fire. The
night was clear, and the peculiarly rarified and
transparent atmosphere of Mexico rendering objects
distinct at a much greater distance than in other
lands, the Spaniards, looking from the towers at
the gates, could plainly perceive some of their late
fellow-soldiers, stripped naked and their hands
bound behind them, driven up the stairs from
platform
to platform, by the blows and other indignities
of their cruel captors. On the summit of the
pyramid
,
they were unbound, their heads adorned with
plumes, and great waving penachos placed in their
hands, with which they were forced to dance round
the ever-burning censers of the gods, in the midst
of shouting pagans, until dragged away by the
priests and immolated, at a signal blasted from the
sacred horn, upon the stone of sacrifice. The
station
of Alvarado on the dike of Tacuba, was nearer
than either of the others; and his men, while they
wept and prayed over a spectacle so appalling, even
fancied they could distinguish the figures and faces
of particular individuals, and hear their cries to
heaven. Many were the wretches who had yielded
themselves alive into the hands of the foe; and for
ten nights in succession, the blazing temple echoed
to their groans, and their garrisoned friends were
compelled to be the witnesses of their torments.
But this triumph was the last of the pagans. All
supplies of corn from the lake-sides were cut off,
and they were known to be famishing; and
besides
,
as if heaven were willing to assist even the
arms of rapacity, to subdue a race, all whose
institutions
were more or less infected by the spirit of
blood that brutalized their religion, the rainy season
was brought to a close preternaturally early, and
they were left without water. The Spaniards
recovered
their spirits, and collecting again vast
bands of confederates, recommenced the siege,
advancing
with prudence, and destroying every thing
as they advanced, and not only regaining all they
had lost, but even effecting, despite all resistance,
a secure lodgment upon the island, from their
several
points of attack. The Mexicans still fought; but
it was with bodies emaciated and enfeebled, and
with hearts subdued by despair. The three
divisions
of besiegers met upon the great square, blew
up the Huitzompan, and all the temples within the
circuit
of the Wall of Serpents, which they fortified and
preserved; and then, still demolishing houses as
they advanced, they pushed on until they reached
the great market-place of Tlatelolco; and thus
hemmed in upon the narrow peninsula the
unfortunate
king of Mexico, and the few shattered
remnants
of his army.
Before this crisis had yet arrived, there occurred
another incident, in which, as in all others since his
return from the South Sea, the virtues of Juan
Lerma
were made the instruments of still further
misfortune
.
He beheld Magdalena but once, after the
adventure of the garden; and she was then raving
with delirium, in which she did not know even him.
The fate of Zelahualla was still wrapt in obscurity;
for such had been the suddenness of the attack in
the garden, that none knew of her fate, and
Magdalena
was incapable of uttering any rational word,
to remove the mountain of anxiety from his breast.
His scheme to effect the deliverance of the princess
had doubtless thrown her into the power of the
Spaniards; and the thought of such a captive in
such hands, preyed upon him with a bitterness
that exceeded death. He fought no more, and
indeed
he was urged no longer by the king, who was
himself reduced to such desperation, that he thought
no further of stratagems, but merely of blind and
sullen resistance.
On the third day after the battle, he was
summoned
by Techeechee to attend the king in public;
and without questioning for what purpose, he
gloomily obeyed, taking with him the Spanish
sword with which he had been provided, on the day
of his attempted escape.
It was midday: no sound of contention came to
his ears, for the besiegers were yet lying in their
quarters on the dikes, healing their wounds and
lamenting their friends; but the quiet of the garden
was broken by the howling of the beasts, and the
shrill screams of birds of prey,of such at least as
had not already been slaughtered, to appease the
hunger of the wretches, who yet fought for their
expiring
empire. One circumstance, had Juan
noticed
it, might have convinced him of the dreadful
extent and intensity of the suffering, of which he
had been before apprized. The trees of the garden
had begun to be robbed of their leaves, but not by
summer heat or autumnal drought;the tender
shrubs were stripped of their bark;the smaller
plants had been rooted up, and even the grass, in
some places, torn from the earth, and even the earth
itself upturned, in the search after edible roots.All
that could be gnawed by the teeth of man had
vanished, or did soon after vanish, from the garden.
When the Spaniards walked afterwards through
their conquest, not a green leaf, as they have
recorded
,
was found in all the city.
He passed through the broken wall, now only
defended by rude palisades, strengthened by an
abatis of withered shrubs and brambles, and
passing
the moat, over the ruins of the prostrate wall,
found himself on the market-square of Tlatelolco, of
which the Spaniards gave such surprising accounts,
when they beheld it filled with the merchants and
riches of the empire, before the death of
Montezuma
.
It was of very great extent, and contained, at
the eastern boundary, a pyramid, on which was the
temple of one of the lesser divinities. On the west
was a platform, or rather stage, faced and flagged
with stone, and devoted to theatrical exhibitions,
which, however primitive and barbarous, were yet
a chief feature among the amusements of a Mexican
festival.
Almost in the centre of the square, and yet so
nigh to the garden wall that it could be overlooked
by the nearest turrets of the palace, was another
platform, perhaps four feet in height, and circular,
upon which lay the famous stone
Temalacatl
,
devoted
to the purpose of the gladiatorial sacrifice.
It now lies in the Plaza May or of the modern city,
near the walls, and within the enclosure, of the
great Cathedral, and is one of the few monuments
which the conquerors have left of the savage
institutions
of the Aztec empire. It is a circular block
of porphyry, nine or ten feet in diameter, and is
sculptured over with the effigies of warriors. The
privilege of dying upon this stone was awarded
only to captives of the most extraordinary prowess;
and as such were never taken alive, unless when
conquered by accident, the exhibition of such a
sacrifice
was as rare as it was agreeable to the fierce
tastes of the Mexicans. It was essentially
gladiatorial
,
and it offered a prospect even of life and
liberty to the valiant prisoner. A sword and
buckler
were put into his hands, and he was tied by one
leg to the stone; yet, if he succeeded in slaying or
defeating six chosen Mexican warriors, he was
released
and sent back in safety to his own country.
The last victim of the Temalacatl was the famous
Tlascalan chief, Tlahuicotl, the Orlando of Anahuac,
captured by Montezuma not many years before the
advent of the Spaniards, who, fighting only to die,
(for he refused to accept life, even as the meed of
his own heroism,) and fighting till he
did
die, slew
no less than eight different opponents, and disabled
twenty others, before his great spirit sank under
his exertions. If the gladiator fell, before he had
accomplished his task, he was dragged to the
neighbouring
temple, and there sacrificed, while yet
living
.
The last victim, destined to close the list of
those to whom Mexico did honour, was a
Spaniard
.
A vast multitude of pagans surrounded the
platform
,
except on that side which looked to the
temple
.
Here stood the priests, few in number, yet
prepared, at the moment of the victim's fall, to
clutch upon him, and bear him to the altar, a space
being left for them, as much out of reverence for
their sacred character, as to preserve their pathway
entirely unobstructed. The side that looked to the
palace was also but little encumbered; for here the
king of Mexico sat upon a scaffold, attended by his
chief nobles.
The grim looks of expectation, with which the
assembled
multitude surveyed the platform, were
heightened in ferocity by the privations that had
pinched and hollowed their visages. They looked
like winter wolves, gaunt with famine; and one
VOL. II. 16
would have thought their appetites were whetting
for a repast on the flesh of the victim. There was
indeed something horrid in their appearance, as
well as in the cause which had assembled them
together. It was plain that they waited
impatiently
for the coming of the prisoner. As they rolled
their eyes over the square, they caught sight of Juan,
conspicuous by his lofty stature, though he now
drooped his head with gloom, and hailed his
appearance
with such shouts as proved what a change
had been made in their feelings, by his presence, in
the battle of the ambuscade. The imputations of
Azcamatzin were ended, for Ascamatzin perished
an hour after uttering them, under a shot from the
crossbow of the hunchback: they remembered
nothing
now, but that the Christian had touched the
body of Malintzin, and was struck down while he
had him in his hands, and that he was the brother
of the king.
It was these acclamations which roused him out
of his sullen mood, so that he could exert his mind
and imagine the object for which he had been
summoned
.
But no sooner did he perceive the priests
near the Temalacatl, than he was seized with
horror
,
and disregarding the command of Guatimozin,
who beckoned to him to ascend the platform to
his side, he turned to fly.
Is not my brother a Mexican, and among the
sons of the king? said the infidel; and then added
with a look of bitter meaning, My brother shall
see the revenge of the daughter of Montezuma!
Struck by these words, yet incapable of
fathoming
their signification, Juan looked up to the young
monarch, and would even have ascended the
scaffold
,
had not the sudden appearance of the captive
engaged his whole attention. A wild and frantic
cry burst from the mob, and looking round, he
beheld
a body of ten or twelve priests, with their
black robes, and long plaited, rope-like hair,
leading
the prisoner towards the platform. His arms
were bound behind him, and his only garment was a
coarse cloth wrapped round the loins.
Juan's heart sickened; he would have sunk to
the earth, or buried his head in his tilmaltli, to
avoid looking upon the spectacle of a Christian and
countryman, thus brought forth to be slaughtered.
But the fiery spirit displayed by the victim, as soon
as he was lifted upon the mound and set upon his
feet, drew another shout from the admiring infidels,
which caused him to steal one look at the scene;
and that look left him without the power of
withdrawing
his eyes. The captive, as soon as he
was on the mound, leaped, of his own accord, upon
the stone, as if to testify not only his knowledge of
the purpose for which he was brought there, but
his willingness to engage in the combat. He then
turned his face towards the king, and, at that
moment
,
Juan Lerma lifting his eyes, beheld the only
man he had ever learned to hateIt was Don
Francisco de Guzman.
Noble, compassionate, and truly unvindictive, as
was Lerma's spirit, he did not make this discovery
without a thrill of fierce exultation. There is a
touch of the wild beast in the hearts of us all; and
so long as man is capable of anger, he will, at some
moment, and for some brief space of time, yield to
thoughts and wishes, that he himself must, a
moment
after, esteem diabolic. Religion and moral
culture make us the masters of our malign
propensities
;
but man is naturally a vengeful animal.
It was but the weakness of a moment with Juan
Lerma; perhaps, too, it was caused by the thrill of
joy at the proof thus rendered, that Guzman, at least,
exercised no control over the fate of the princess of
Mexico; and if he did not instantly commiserate the
condition of an enemy justly abhorred, but now so
fallen, so wretched, and about to expiate his evil
deeds by a punishment so fearfully retributive, he
was able to banish all unworthy elation from his
mind, and look on with feelings more becoming a
man and Christian.
He could not indeed but admire the fearless
intrepidity
,
or rather audacity, with which Guzman
(more oppressed by a sense of humiliation, at being
made a spectacle among a crew so despised and
abhorred, than by any other feeling,) looked around
him upon the pagans, and extended his foot to the
ligature, with which it was to be secured to the
stone. Whatever were his faults, it could not be
denied, that Don Francisco was a man of unflinching
courage, which was indeed a constitutional trait.
His presence on the stone of battle indicated that
he had been captured after a heroic resistance.
His resolution was, in this case, kept up by a
knowledge of the nature of the ordeal through
which he was to pass, and by full confidence in his
ability to win all the privileges it conferred upon
him. He had some little acquaintance with the
Mexican tongue, and was by no means ignorant
of the more remarkable institutions of the country.
A victory over six awkward and half-starved
barbarians
,
was an exploit not to be despaired of by a
well-trained cavalier, even when denied any
advantage
of weapons, and defensive armour. Yet
it was a curious circumstance, that he, who had not
often kept faith himself, when his interest called
upon him to break it, should rest with such perfect
reliance upon the willingness of the Mexicans to
liberate him, in the event of his prevailing over
their champions. But he knew, that never but
once
had a tribe of all the broad regions of
Anahuac
broken its pledged faith to a successful
gladiator
;
and that tribe was, for that reason, ever
after
held infamous. It was the tribe of Huexotzinco;
and Cortes himself placed the circumstance on
record
.
As soon as his foot was properly secured, his
arms were unbound, and a noble, who stood upon
the scaffold in the character of a herald, addressed
him in the following official terms:
This is the law of Mexico, and let the people
hear: `The prisoner who is brave, the gods honour.
If he kill six strong men upon the stone
Temalacatl
,
he shall be set free.' This is the law.
This is the law, then, repeated Guzman, in
imperfect Mexican, turning his eyes upon
Guatimozin
,
as if he disdained to hold converse with
any meaner infidel: Is it a law that will be
remembered
,
when the prisoner is a Spaniard?
He who is a prisoner, has no name and no
country, replied the prince. He is neither
Tlascalan
nor Castilian, but a man who kills or dies.
And if I prevail over six of thy soldiers, again
cried Guzman, as the attendants strapped upon one
arm a light buckler of basket-work, and gave him
also a short macana, dost thou warrant me by
thy gods, that I shall be sent back to Don
Hernan
?
Let the prisoner fight, said the king sternly:
Are the warriors of Mexico blades of grass, that
they should be blown down by a man's breath,
before the sword has struck them?
Thou shalt see, replied Guzman, with a grim
smile. What are six warriors to a man fighting
for liberty? Give me a Spanish sword,a weapon
of iron,and let my adversaries be doubled in
number.
The boldness of this demand greatly excited the
admiration of the warlike spectators, who
rewarded
it with cheers. But they checked their tumult
to hear the words of the king.
The white man talks with the lips of a boaster,
16*
he said. Had he not a Spanish sword in the king's
garden, among the women? How is this? He is
a prisoner!
Ask thy warriors,it was not broken off in
my hand! How else should they have taken me?
replied Guzman, to the words of scorn; and then
added, in Spanish, as if to himself, So much for
striking the accursed hound! I would he and his
master were broiling in purgatory; for they have
ever brought me bad luck.
Juan Lerma heard not these words, but he
remembered
the broken blade in Befo's body, and
again his heart hardened against his foemen. But
matters were now approaching to a crisis. The
monarch, disdaining to hold further discourse with
the prisoner, waved his hand, and a warrior, darting
from the ground at the foot of the scaffold, leaped
with a single bound upon the platform, and uttered
the yell of battle, which was instantly re-echoed by
the shouts of the multitude. He was a tall and
powerful savage, though meager of frame, of great
activity, as was proved by his ready leap, and of a
spirit fully corresponding. His equipments were
but little superior to those of the captive; his
battle-axe
was somewhat longer, his buckler a little
broader, and he had some slight defence for his
head, in a cap of alligator-skin, that crowned his
matted hair.
No sound of trump and tymbal gave the signal
for beginning the fight, as in a Christian tourney.
The yell of the infidel, as he sprang upon the mound,
and brandished his battle-axe, was all that was
allowed
or required, to put the prisoner on his guard;
and Don Francisco seemed to understand enough
of the nature of the ceremony, to look for no further
warning.
The great superiority of the infidel consisted in
his being entirely at liberty, able to begin the attack
by leaping upon the stone at any point he chose,
and to continue it thereon, by changing his position
as often as he thought fit; while the prisoner,
secured
by a thong not above eighteen inches in
length, to the centre of it, enjoyed no such facilities
of motion. He might turn, indeed, and as rapidly
as he pleased, but always with the danger, if he
forgot himself for a moment, of tripping himself, and
falling; in which case, his death was certain, for
no forbearance was practised in the event of such
an accident.
The infidel began the combat with the same
agility he had displayed in leaping up to the
platform
.
He uttered his yell, brandished his axe, and
making a half circuit round the stone, suddenly
darted upon it, and aimed a blow at Guzman. He
was met by the Spaniard with an address and
effect
,
that showed he had not overrated his skill.
Rather meeting than avoiding the blow, he struck
up, with his bucklered hand, not the macana, but
the arm of the assailant, seemingly calculating that
the shock of the rebuff would tumble him from the
stone. It did more: it caused the Mexican to fling
up his arms, in the instinctive effort to preserve his
equilibrium. The next instant, Guzman drove his
glassy axe deep into his uncovered side, and
spurning
him violently with the foot which was at liberty,
the Mexican fell backwards upon the platform,
writhing in the agonies of death. The whole
combat
was scarce the work of a minute. Those who
drew in their breath as the Mexican sprang to
the assault, had not taken a second inspiration,
before their countryman was discomfited and
dying.
The infidels set up a scream, as much of
approbation
as surprise. The spirit of the Roman
amphitheatre
was felt around the Temalacatl of
Mexico
;
and plaudits were bestowed upon a victor,
when pity was denied to the slain.
The vanquished and writhing combatant was
dragged from the mound, and his place
immediately
occupied by a second, who leaped up with the
same alacrity, and attacked with similar violence.
Fool that thou art! muttered Guzman, with
scorn and lofty self-reliance, were there twenty
such grasshoppers at thy back, yet should it be but
boy's play to despatch thee.
He caught the blow of the savage on his buckler,
but greatly to his injury; for the sharp blades of
the iztli severed it nearly in twain, and besides
diminishing its already insufficient defence, inflicted
a severe wound upon his arm. But it was the only
blow struck by the barbarian. Infuriated by the
wound, Guzman smote him over the head with his
weapon, and with such rapidly continued blows as
entirely confounded the Mexican, so that he made
scarce any use of his shield. The first stroke tore
the cayman-scales from his hair, and the next clove
through his skull.
Guzman's victory was as complete as before, but
he found that several of the separate blades, or teeth
of obsidian, that edged his weapon, were broken off
by the blows. He beheld this with alarm, for
having
held up the axe, to show its dilapidated
condition
,
and demand another, he found himself
answered
only by the appearance of a third
antagonist
.
Dogs and jugglers that ye are! he cried,
indignantly
:
ye would cheat me then to death, by
leaving me weaponless! St. Dominic, knaves! but
I will sort your wit with a better wisdom.Now,
what a spectacle might I not make for my brother
Christians on the dikes! Thou art playing quits
with me, Cortes!Hah, dog! art thou so ready?
It was Guzman's determination, after killing the
third assailant, which event he still looked forward
to with unabated confidence, to possess himself of
his weapon, which, though secured in the usual
manner by a thong, he doubted not he could easily
rend from his arm.
But his antagonist was by no means so easily
mastered as the others. Taking caution from the
fate of his predecessors, he changed the mode of
attack
;
and though he rushed upon the block with
as much resolution as either, he betrayed no such
ambition to come to close quarters. On the
contrary
,
taking advantage of the breadth of the
Temalacatl
,
he confined himself to the very edge, now
facing the Spaniard, as if about to make his spring,
now darting behind him, as if to assault him in the
rear, and, all the time, vexing Guzman's ears with
the most terrific screams. Then, perceiving the
Spaniard's wariness, he began to run around the
stone with all his speed, flourishing his axe, as if to
take advantage of the least opening offered by the
weariness or dizziness of his foe. Guzman at once
perceived the danger to which he was reduced by
a system of attack so difficult to be guarded against.
It was almost impossible, tied as he was, to
preserve
his face always against the pagan; twice or
thrice he stumbled over the rope, and already his
brain began to reel with the rapidity of his
gyrations
.
At each stumble, the Mexican struck at him
with his axe, and one blow had taken effect, though
not dangerously, upon his shoulder. This incensed
the Spaniard almost to madness, and he voluntarily
exposed himself to another wound, in order to bring
his opponent within his reach. Thus, as the infidel
was still continuing to run round the stone, he
flung himself round the other way very suddenly,
yet not so quickly as wholly to escape the rapid
attacks of his assailant. The macana inflicted
another
and deeper wound in his back, while his
own broken weapon struck the savage on the hip.
At the same moment he seized him by the throat,
and employing a strength greatly superior to the
Indian's, threw him under his feet, and crushed
him with hand and knee, while despatching him
with blows over the face and head. He then
grasped at the macana; but before he could wrest
it from the grasp of his dying foe, the Indian
was plucked from under him by the attendant
priests.
CHAPTER XVIII.
The
feelings of Juan Lerma were throughout,
strange, bewildering and overwhelming; and he
gazed upon the three combats, each fought and
finished in an inconceivably short space of time, in
a species of trance or stupefaction. Great, and
doubtless just, as was his detestation of
Guzman
,
there was something both noble and afflicting
in the courage with which the unfortunate man
bore himself in the midst of savage foes, who, if
they awarded him a shout of approbation for every
valiant blow, yet screamed with a more cordial
delight
,
at every wound inflicted by an antagonist.
Even while Juan doubted not that Guzman's skill
and fortitude would insure him a full triumph, and
final liberation, he could not but be struck with
horror, at beholding a Christian man bound to a
stone, and baited like a muzzled bear. How much
more overpowering, then, were his feelings, when
he perceived, from the complexion given to events
by the last contest, that it must end, and perhaps
soon, in the destruction of the prisoner.
His emotions became indeed irresistible, when
he looked up at the third shout of the multitude,
for he had closed his eyes with dread, while
Guzman
despatched his third foe,and saw him,
bleeding
at three different wounds, and staggering with
dizziness, extend his macana, now almost reduced
by the fracture of the blades, to a mere bludgeon,
towards the king, and exclaim, bitterly and
despairingly
,
King of Mexico, if thou knowest either honour
or God, give me a fresh sword!
His words ran through Juan's spirit like sharp
knives, and he was seized with a faintiness, so that
he could scarce maintain himself on his feet. But
while his brain whirled and his eyes swam, he
beheld
a fourth warrior spring upon the mound, and,
yelling as he rose, dart, without a moment's pause,
against the captive.
It was now apparent to all, and to none more
than the miserable victim himself, that his situation
was become wholly desperate. His skill could
avail him nothing, while he was so insufficiently
armed; his strength was wasting away with his
blood; his courage could not long maintain itself
against all hope; and even the pride that uplifted
him so far above his barbarous antagonists, only
exasperated him into frenzy, when he perceived,
that, despised as they were, he was in their power,
and must soon expire under their blows. His rage
was like that of the gallant puma, knotted in the
lazo
of a hunter, and torn to pieces by dogs, which,
were he at liberty, would be but as grass and dust
under the might of his talons.
Hopeless of any relief from the king, and
maddened
by the exulting shouts with which the
infidels
hailed every symptom of his defeat, he turned
furiously upon his new opponent; but not until the
Mexican, more skilful or more lucky than his
predecessors
,
had struck him a violent blow upon the
side, which he followed up, at intervals, with others,
while running round the stone, in imitation of his
less fortunate countryman. His success was
rewarded
by the spectators with screams of delight,
which he re-echoed with his own wild outcries.
Yet Guzman was not altogether subdued.
Wretched as was his weapon, he handled it with
some effect, and struck his assailant two or three
such blows as would have ended the combat, had
they been inflicted by a better. With one, he
staggered the pagan; with a second, he struck him
down to his knee; and with a third, he snapped off
the last blade of obsidian, upon the scales of the
Indian helmet, and now brandished a harmless
wooden wand.
At that moment, a Spanish sword, thrown by an
unseen hand, fell at his feet,but fell in vain.
Badly aimed, it struck short upon the stone, and
rolled back to the mound; and the infidel,
recovering
his feet, though still staggering, uttered his
war-cry, and raised his macana, to strike down
the defenceless Christian.
Human nature could withstand the scene of
butchery no longer. Juan Lerma forgot that the
captive was his foe and destroyer, and the
unprincipled
oppressor of all he held dear. He saw a
man of his own country and faith cruelly
assassinated
before his eyes, among thousands of pitiless
and rejoicing barbarians. He thought not of the
impossibility of affording him any real relief, nor of
the fate to himself that must follow an attempt so
full of folly. His brain burned, his eyes flamed as
if in sockets of fire; and obeying an impulse that
converted him for a moment into a madman, he
rushed through the few nobles who separated him
from the mound, and in an instant was at the side
of the victim.
To snatch up the weapon he had so vainly
cast, to spurn the exhausted warrior from his
prey, and to cut the thong that bound Guzman to
the stone, were all the work of a second. Almost
before the idea had entered the mind of the
Mexicans
,
that the combat was interrupted, so
lightning-like
were his motions, he had leaped with Guzman
VOL. II. 17
from the platform, and, grasping his hand, made
his way over the narrow and unoccupied portion of
the square, which led to the garden. Even then,
the Mexicans stood for awhile dumb with surprise
and consternation; for the act was so unexpected,
so entirely inexplicable upon any of their
principles
of action, that they scarce knew if it might not
be their Mexitli himself, who thus snatched a
victim
from the stone of battle.
It has been already mentioned, that the garden
wall had, in this quarter, fallen down, and that its
place was supplied only by a fence of shrubs and
brambles. Its ruins choked the ditch, and gave a
passage, which had been formerly effected by a
wooden bridge, now buried under the heavy
fragments
.
A single plank spanned over the only gap
that was too wide to be passed, except by a bold
leap. It was a knowledge of these circumstances,
that, in the very tempest of his impulses,
determined
the course of Juan Lerma, and decided every
step he now took to secure life to his wretched
companion. He had breathed but a word into
Guzman's
ear, but it was enough to communicate
strength to his heart, and agility to his limbs; and
wonderfully adapting his resolutions and
movements
to those of his guide, he ran with him over
the square and across the canal, with such speed,
that he rather aided than retarded the steps of his
preserver.They had crossed the plank before the
yells of pursuit burst from the astounded assembly,
and Juan, striking it now into the ditch with his
foot, dragged Guzman through the brambles,
exclaiming
,
Quick! quick! If we can but reach the palace,
we are saved.
Is it
thou
, indeed, Juan Lerma? cried Guzman,
with a voice singularly wild and piteous, but
struggling
onward.Now then thou canst kill me
thyself
,
since thou wouldst not be avenged by infidels.
Quick! quick! they are following us! they are
crossing the ditch!But fifty paces more!
Ten will serve meand ten words will make
up my reckoningthat is,
here:
the rest hereafter.
Stop, fool,I am dying.
Courage! courage! exclaimed Juan,
endeavouring
,
but in vain, to drag further the wretch, for
whom his rash humanity seemed to have purchased
only the right of expiring in a Christian's arms.
Courage, and move on,we are close followed.
Hark,listen, and speak not, said Guzman,
sinking to the earth, for his wounds were mortal,
and the exertions of flight caused them to throw
out blood with tenfold violenceHe was indeed
upon the verge of dissolution: Listen, listen!
he cried, gasping for breath, yet struggling to speak
with such extraordinary eagerness, that it seemed
as if he held life and salvation to depend upon his
giving utterance to what was in his mind. Listen,
Juan Lerma, for I am a snake and a devil. I hated
thee forBut, brief, brief, brief! First, Cortes
Hah! they come!Drag me into a bush, that I
may speak and die. NohereThere is no time
Listen. Saints, give me powers of speech! or
devilseither! A little reparationWhy not? I
belied thee to CortesHark! hark! he almost
screamed, in the fear that he might not be
understood
,
for he was conscious of the incoherency of
his expressions; hark! hark!Bleeding to death
ConcerningCorteshis wifeDoa Catalina
jealousy,
jealousy!
Poisoned his ear. Understand
me! understand me!
Wild as were his words and confused as was
the mind of Juan, yet with these broken
expressions
,
the dying cavalier threw a sudden and
terrific
light upon the understanding of the outcast.
Good heaven! he cried, my benefactress!
my noble lady! Oh villain, how couldst thou?
Moremore! murmured Guzman, with
impatient
,
yet vain ardour. I know allThy father
thy sisterCamargakilledAha! Magdalena
the princess
Ay! the princess? echoed Juan, imploringly:
the princess? the princess?
But all he could hear, in reply to his frantic
demand
,
was Garci, Garci and this name was
immediately lost in the roaring shouts of the
infidels
,
who now surrounded the pair.
Had Guzman been able to continue the flight at
half the speed with which he had begun it, it is
certain they would have reached the palace,
considerably
in advance of the pursuers; though it is
not certain, that would have proved a city of refuge.
But his strength failed almost immediately after
entering the garden, of which as soon as he became
sensible, he began to make his disclosures; and
perhaps the haste into which he was driven by the
almost instant appearance of the Mexicans,
thronging
over the broken wall, served as much as the
distractions and agonies of death, to make them
confused and insufficient. The first wordthe
name of the lady Catalina,revealing at once the
dreadful delusion, which had converted his best
friend into his deadliest enemy, so excited and
unsettled
Juan's mind, that, in his eagerness to learn
still more of the fatal secret, he almost forgot the
presence of so many Mexicans, rushing upon him
with yells of fury. It was in vain, when they had
reached him, that he brandished his sword, and
assumed an attitude of defence, calling loudly
upon the king. He was thrown down and
overpowered
,nay,
he was severely wounded, and
handled altogether so roughly, that it seemed as if
the enraged Mexicans were resolved to drag him
to the sacrifice, from which he had rescued
Guzman
,
if not to murder him on the spot; some
calling out to kill him, and others roaring, `The
Temalacatl! the Temalacatl!' Their cries were
not even stilled when the nobles who waited about
the person of the king, drove them away with rods,
and Guatimozin himself stalked up to the prisoner.
The frown which Juan's rash, and, as he esteemed
it, impious act, had brought upon his visage,
darkened
into one still sterner, when having laid his
hand upon the Christian's shoulder, to signify that
his person was sacred, the expression of protection
was answered only by cries of the most mutinous
character.
We will have the blood of the Spaniard, they
screamed. What said Azcamatzin? It is true
this is a bear we have, that embraces us, and tears
open our hearts. He struck the Lord of Deathhe
takes the victim from Mexitli: he shall be a victim
himselfhe shall die on the stone!
It was in vain that Guatimozin employed threats,
menaces, and entreaties to allay their passions.
Sufferings
of a nature and extent so horrible that we
have scarce dared to hint at them, had already
made them sullen and refractory; and misery and
wrath are no observers of allegiance or decorum.
The unhappy monarch, now such less in power
than in name, feigned to yield to their clamour, for
he perceived he could no longer openly save. He
commanded Juan to be bound with cords, and
carried
into a remote corner of the palace, promising,
that, when he had recovered a little of his strength
and spirits, he should be given up to them, to die
on the Temalacatl.
It was perhaps fortunate for Juan, that he was
dragged away too suddenly to behold the fate of his
rival, who was now in the hands of the priests,
apparently
revivinga circumstance hailed with such
17*
shouts of joy, that Juan was himself almost
forgotten
.
The infidels carried Don Francisco again
from the garden, and hurried him towards the little
temple. But before they had passed the square, he
expired in their armshappy only in this, that he
fell not by the knives of the priests.
Before the day was over, the citizens were called
upon again to resist the Spaniards who had now
resumed the offensive, and who continued their
approaches
with such fierce, determined, and
incessant
efforts, that they employed the whole time, as
well as the whole thoughts, of the besieged.
CHAPTER XIX.
The
fate of Mexico approached to its
consummation
.
The great streets leading from the
causeways
,
were in the power of the Spaniards. It
might be said, indeed, that they had gained
possession
of the whole island, except the extreme point
of the neck of Tlatelolco; for though they did not
extend their ravages any great distance from the
streets, into the three quarters to the east and south,
it was because these were occupied only by women
and childrenthe wounded, the sick, and the dying,
and could be, at any moment, taken possession
of. The warriors who yet remained, were
concentrated
upon the little peninsula, around their
monarch
,
who, obstinate to the last, still resisted, even
when resistance was hopeless, refusing the offers
of peace and friendship, which Cortes, rendered
magnanimous by success, and softened by
compassion
,
now daily sent him. His obstinacy was
indeed
surprising; for the point was surrounded by
brigantines and piraguas, prepared to intercept his
flight; and escape, unless by death, seemed
evidently
impossible. The work of carnage therefore
went on, though with mitigated severity; for there
were but few left to suffer. The market-place of
Tlateloco was secured and occupied, and upon the
day of St. Hippolytus, (the 13th of August,) the
Spaniards concluded the labours of the long and
bloody siege, by storming, with all their forces, the
palace of Guatimozinthe last stronghold of the
Mexicans. The garden walls were beaten down
by the artillery, and soon after midday, the
Spaniards
rushed, with tremendous vivas, upon the
palace
,
to which fire had been previously
communicated
by flaming arrows, shot into the windows by
the confederates.
The preparations for the assault, and long before
it began, were surveyed by the Captain-General
from the terrace of the palace of Axajacatl, the
famous
scene of his sufferings, when besieged therein
by the Mexicans, a year before. It was in the
quarter of Tlatelolco, midway between the great
pyramid and the market-place, and commanded,
from its turrets, not only a view of the palace of
Guatimozin, but of the whole surrounding city and
lake.
Deeply as his mind was engaged with the
approaching
climax of his mighty enterprise,for
now he could almost count the minutes that
intervened
betwixt his hopes and his success,he
was not without thoughts and feelings of another
character. The singular disappearance of
Magdalena
,
of which nothing more was known, or even
conjectured, than was disclosed in the midnight
conversation of the hunchback and Bernal Diaz;
the fate of Camarga, over which events not yet
narrated
,
had cast a peculiarly exciting mystery; and
the situation of Juan Lerma, upon whose character
and unhappy history certain events had shed a new
light, as well as what had now become a painful
interest; all, by turns, occupied his mind, and
sometimes even withdrew it from the
contemplation
of the scene before him. The few cavaliers in
attendance, who enjoyed their immunity from
combat
only because they were disabled by severe
wounds, referred his unusual gloom to the same
cause; for he had not yet recovered from the
many injuries, the penalty of his rashness on the
causeway.
Thou knowest, Quinones, said one, in a
whisper
to the captain of his body guard, (for the
conspiracy
of Villafana had been made, as is usual in
such catastrophes of ambition, an excuse for
investing
his dignity with another engine of power;)
Thou knowest, the renegade struck him upon the
head; and it is a marvel of providence he was not
slain; for Lerma strikes with an arm like the wing
of a windmill. These blows on the skull, though
one may seem to recover from them, have a
perilous after-effect on the brain.
Fy! muttered Quinones, with a shake of the
head; there is a new word about Lerma,
especially
since Garci Holguin brought in the princess.
Didst thou not hear that Alvarado, who heads the
assault, called this morning upon all soldiers who
had seen Juan Lerma in the mele, and asked them
a thousand questions? I tell thee, there is a new
thing in the wind. I did myself last night
overhear
Cortes charge Sandoval to watch well for
every piragua and canoe, that might leave
Tlatelolco
,
and see that no one taken be harmed.But
this we will see. Talking of canoes, methought I
beheld one some half hour since paddling from
Tezcuco?
Ay, said another; it landed in the
northeastern
quarter.No more complaints of Guzman
now? He will never harry infidels more. Garci's
sailors say, he was taken alive!
Hist! whispered Quinones, with a warning
gesture. This thing troubles Cortes. It was his
anger, and Guzman's desire to recover favour,
which drove him upon the mad feat, that brought
him to the block of sacrifice. It weighs upon the
general's mind.And besides, as it is now
apparent
that Camarga is alive, there is deeper
cause for remorse: It was perhaps his wrongful
belief in the charge of murder, rather than any
other cause, that made him proceed with such
rigour
against Guzman.
But is this rumour true? demanded the other.
Ay, certain; and I wage ye my life, the very
canoe we were looking after, brings the dead-alive
to Mexico. Methought I could trace the cut of his
sacerdotal maskings, even afar off. They say, after
all, the man is a true brother of St. Dominic, under
some dispensation.Ay, faith! you may see now
Alive and shorn into the bargain! They are
bringing
him up the stairway.By Santiago, it makes
the general's eye flash fire!
The eye of Cortes, up to this moment peculiarly
gloomy and troubled, did indeed flash with lustre,
as soon as it fell upon the figure of Camarga; for it
was he, who now made his appearance on the
terrace
,
led forward by Indians. He was greatly
altered
,
and seemed indeed like the ghost of his
former
self, so wan and emaciated was his
countenance
,
and so broken and feeble his step; he looked
as if in almost the last stage of atrophy. He was
otherwise changed; the hair was shorn from his
crown, on which was a ghastly scar, left by the
macana of the Lord of Death; his feet were bare;
and from the cord that girded on his friar's frock,
was suspended a knotted scourge, crusted over
with blood. His whole appearance was that of
some suicidal ascetic, who mourns with the
severest
maceration of the body, a sin not to be
expiated
by mere penitence of spirit.
Heaven be thanked for thy resurrection! cried
Cortes, grasping him by the hand, and leading him
to the seat he had himself occupied. There is a
wolf in my bosom, and now I know that thou canst
remove it!
Have I come too late? cried Camarga, eagerly,
though with a voice no longer sonorous.
Agnus
Dei, dona nobis pacem!
The victim of our
madness
,
driven among the infidels,the poor wretch
whom misery cast into the same handsWhat of
them, seor? what of them?
Nothing, replied Cortes, unless thou canst
speak it: Nothing, at least, except that both are
still in captivity. Yet know, if it will relieve thee,
that what I could do by embassies and goodly
offers
,
that I have done to recover them; and I have
given such orders, that, if they be not murdered by
the Indians, we may see them living this day.
God be thanked! cried Camarga, dropping on
his knees, and praying with such fervour, though
in inaudible accents, as to excite no little curiosity
among the attendant cavaliers, whom Cortes had
already waved away. He turned upon them again,
and sternly bade them descend from the terrace,
which they did, followed by the Indians.
As soon as they were alone, Cortes, scarce
pausing
until Camarga had ceased his devotions,
exclaimed
,
Speak, and delay not, either to mourn or to
pray: Thou canst do these things hereafter.
Enough evil has already come of thy silence. Speak
me in a wordWhat art thou? and what is thy
interest in these wretches? What is thine? and
whatyes, what is
mine?
The last word was uttered with vehement
emphasis
,
that seemed to recall Camarga to his
self-possession
.
He rolled his eyes upon Cortes with a
ghastly smile, and replied,
Thou shalt know; for thou hast a sin to answer
as well as I; and answer it thou must, both to God
and thy conscience. Moderate thy impatience: what
I have to say, cannot be spoken in a word, but yet
it shall be spoken briefly. In thy boyish days, thou
hast heard of the Counts of Castillejo
The Captain-General bent upon the speaker a
look that seemed designed to slay, it was so
frowningly
fixed and penetrating. He then smote his
hands together upon his breast, as if to beat down
some dreadful thought, and immediately exclaimed,
What thou hast to say, speak in God's name,
and without further preface. Were I but a dog of
the house of Cortes, instead of its son and sole
representative
,
the name of a Castillejo of Merida
would be hateful to my ear. Ay, by heaven! be
thou layman or monk, my friend or the friend of
my enemy, yet know that my rage burns with
undiminished
fire, though the proud scutcheons of
the Castillejos have been turned into funeral
hatchments
,
and the mosses of twenty years have
gathered
on their graves.But it is enough. The first
word of thy story harmonizes with mine own
conceit
.
A strange accident opened my eyes upon a
remembrance of dishonour; which let us rake up
no further.I have heard enough. Keep thine own
secret, too, he continued, with a gleaming eye;
for I would not take the life of one, upon whom
heaven has itself set the seal of vengeance.
Yet must thou listen, and I speak, said
Camarga
,
disregarding the menacing words and
glance; for there is a story to be told, of which
thou and thy kindred have not dreamednay, nor
have others, except oneexcept one! My secret
will not throw thee into the frenzy thou fearest; he
of whom you think, is beyond the reach of human
vengeance. Listen to me, Hernan Cortes, and
forbear
your rage, until I have done.Of the Count
Sebastian's three brothers; the next in age, Julian,
was a slave in Barbary, yet supposed to be dead;
the youngest Gregorio, was a monk of St. Dominic;
and the third, Juan, was a wild and unhappy
profligate
.
Ay, by heaven, said Cortes, with angry
emotion
;
may he remember his deeds in torment
Amen! Had not Gregorio been an inquisitor as
well as a monk, I should have seen him burn at a
stake, as was his due.
Reserve your curses for the true criminal,
said Camarga, drawing the cowl over his visage,
as if no longer able to endure the fierce looks of
Don Hernan: Among others who had inflamed
his wild and fiery affections, was one whom
heaven
had seemingly placed beyond his reach,one
whose name I need not pronounce to Hernan
Cortes.
I will tell thee who she was, said the general,
laying his hand upon Camarga's shoulder, and
speaking with a passionate energy;the daughter
of a family, ancient and noble as his own, though
without its wealth,a novice about to take the
vows, (for to this had the poverty of her house and
her own religious fervour destined her;) and thus
uplifted both by rank and profession above the aims
of a seducer. But what thought the young cub of
Castillejo of these impediments, when he feared not
God, and saw no one left to punish his villany, save
an impoverished old man and a rambling
schoolboy
?
Dwell not on thisSpeak not her name
neither: let it be forgotten. May her soul rest in
peace! for her own act of distraction avenged the
dishonour of her fall.
He paused in strong emotion, and Camarga,
drawing the mantle closer round his head,
continued
:
Know, (and I speak thee a truth never before
divulged to mortal man,) that the sin of this act,
the abduction of a devotee, whose novitiate was
already accomplished,belongs not to Juan, the
debauchee, but to Gregorio, the Dominican.
These are the words of a madman, said
Cortes, sternly; but he was interrupted by
Camarga
hastily exclaiming,
Misunderstand me not. The lover and the
convent-robber was indeed Juan; but it was
Gregorio
who provoked him to the outrage, and gave him
the means of success. The sacrilege had not been
VOL. II. 18
otherwise attempted, and the fickle-minded Juan
would have soon forgotten the object of a passion
both criminal and dangerous.
If you speak the truth, said Cortes, you have
exposed an atrocity, of which, as you said, truly no
man ever dreamed. On what improbable ground
do you make Gregorio a villain so monstrous?
On that of
knowledge
, replied Camarga, with a
voice firmer than he had yet displayed. Dost
thou think ambition lies not as often under a cowl
as a corslet? or that guilt can only be meditated
by a soldier? When the young monk Gregorio
beheld the two sons of his brother, the Count
Sebastian
,
taken up dead from the river, into which
an evil accident had plunged them, and knew that
the Count was dyingsurely dyingof a broken
heart, the fiend of darkness put a thought into his
brain, which had never before dishonoured it. Yet
it slumbered again, until his evil fate showed him
his brother Juan, meditating a crime, which, if
attempted
,
must bring him under the ban of the
church, and into the dungeons of the Inquisition.
Then he said, in his heart, `If Sebastian die of grief,
childless, and if Juan destroy himself by an act of
impiety, where shall men look for the Count of
Castillejo, except in the cell of Gregorio? It was
this thought of darkness that brought the
thunderbolt
upon his house, and upon thine.
Ay! thou sayst it now, said Cortes with a
smothered voice. But this monk, this devil, this
Gregorio! Let me know more of the wretch, whose
flagitious ambition, not satisfied with destroying his
father's house and his brother's soul, must end by
bringing to a dishonourable grave a daughter
I speak it
now
a daughter of Martin Cortes of
Medellin!
It is spoken in a word; but let the iniquitous
details be forgotten. The power of Gregorio,
unknown
even to Juan, (for the connivance was
concealed
and unsuspected,) opened the doors of the
convent, and the lovers fled, were united in
marriage
,
and then parted for ever.
United? married? Now by heavens, thou
mockest
me! Even this had been some mitigation of our
shame. But it is not true. Why dost thou say
it?
Thou wert deceivedall were deceived, said
Camarga; nay, even the scheming Gregorio was
deceived; for before he had dreamed that such a fatal
blow could be given to his ambition, the knot was
tied, and the children of Juan became the heirs of
Sebastian. Behold how treachery overshoots its
mark! Gregorio opened a path, that the lovers
might meet, not that they might escape. This was
reserved until the time when the vows should be
taken; after which the crime of abduction and
flight could not be pardoned. They fled a day too
early, and it was within the power of Sebastian
to obtain both a pardon and dispensation; for
Juan was now his heir, in the place of his
children
.
Good heavens! cried Cortes, was this
indeed
possible? But no; thou deceivest me. Had
the offence been so venial, Juan Castillejo had not
perished among the vaults of the Inquisition.
Canst thou compass thine own vindictive
purposes
,
and attribute no similar power to others!
cried Camarga, with a laugh, that sounded hollow
and unnatural under the mantle. Did a venial
offence, or a malignant and perfidious stratagem,
drive Juan Lerma among the pagans of Mexico?
Listen:Juan Castillejo was dragged from his
hiding-place
,
and that perhaps the earlier, that
Gregorio
knew of their marriage. The crime of
carrying
off a novice was not indeed inexpiable, but it
demanded a deep cell in the office of the
Brotherhood
;
and such Juan obtained. Now, Cortes, ask
not for reasons to explain the acts of Gregorio.
The dying Sebastian exerted his powers to save
his brother, and would have succeeded, had not
Gregorio, visiting the dungeons, in virtue of his
office, subtly attacked the prisoner's mind with the
fear of torture and final condemnation; until, in a fit
of distraction, he laid violent hands upon himself,
and so ended a tragedy, for which Gregorio
designed
another catastrophe. Ay, believe me! Think
not that even Gregorio planned out a climax so
cruel. He desired only to work upon Juan's
terrors
,
in order to banish him from the land for ever;
for it was his purpose to provide him with the
means of escape, when this was accomplished. He
foresaw not the consequences of the desperation he
had produced. Upon the morrow, Sebastian came
with an indulgencealmost a pardon. The shock
of the spectacle of Juan's dead body, broke away
the last feeble cords that bound him to life; and
Gregorio, absolved from his vows by the papal
dispensation, easily obtained, was now the Count
of Castillejo.
And never sat in the castle-hall a fiend more
truculent and diabolic! cried Cortes, with terrific
emphasis. Hark thee, man, demon, or
whatsoever
thou artI did think thee, at first, the very
wretched Juan of whom thou hast spoken, escaped
by some miracle, and finding the fiercest
retribution
for his villany, in the misery of his children. I
remembered thy words at Tezcuco, and was thus
deluded. But I know thee at last, and words
cannot
express how much I abhor thee.
We are alike worthy of detestation, said
Camarga
,
rising and flinging back his cowl, for we
are alike villains,with but this difference between
us, that I have preceded thee in the path of remorse,
and must perhaps tread it more bitterly, because in
all things, self-deluded and baffled. I am what thou
thinkest,the wretched Gregorioand yet less
wretched than when I first discovered the twin
children of my brother in thy house at Tezcuco.
Hearken yet a moment, and I have done. All
supposed
that the unhappy Olivia had cast herself into
the river, and so perished. It was not so. Pity,
remorse, or some other feelingperhaps, policy
induced me to preserve her from her distraction.
She lived in concealment, until she had given birth
to twin childrenthese very wretches whom we
have persecuted. Let me speak their fate in a
word. The boy I sent by a creature whose name
he bears, to Colon's settlement in Espaola; the
girl I devoted from her infancy to the altar; and in
both cases, dreamed that I had provided for their
welfare, as well as against the possibility of
discovery
.
When I had thus arranged everything for
my own security, heaven sent me the first sting of
retribution in the person of my brother Julian,
returned
in safety from the dungeons of Fez, and, in
right of seniority, the heir of the honours I had so
vainly usurped. It was a fitting reward, but it was
not all. Dishonour, other crimes, and awakened
suspicions, followed my downfall; and I became an
exile and outcast. What life I have lived, it needs
not I should speak. A strange accident acquainted
me with the stranger truth, that Magdalena had
followed her unknown brother to the islands. I
had amassed wealth; and an impulse, combining
both pity and foreboding terror, drove me to pursue
them. It was easy to trace out their respective
fates. The wreck of the ship which carried
Magdalena
,
with the supposed loss of all on board, satisfied
me that she was with her mother, in heaven. An
unexpected event had invested Juan with new
interest
.
This was the death of Julian, without heirs.
It was in my power to repair, at least, the wrongs
I had done him, by restoring him to his inheritance;
the knowledge and proofs of his legitimacy were in
my hands, and I resolved to employ them. This I
18*
could not do in mine own person, but I discovered
and know, seor, it filled me with joy,that
thou
hadst befriended him. I came then to Mexico,
to seek the young man, and to enable thee to do
justice to the memory, and to the child of thy sister.
Gregorio, for so we must now call him, paused a
moment, while Cortes strode to and fro, in great
agitation. He then resumed:
The first thing I heard was the supposed death
of Juan,his expedition, and the cause of itthine
own bitter and unrelenting hatred.
It is true, said Cortes, with a vain effort at
composed utterance. I confessed my folly to thee
before. I have persecuted the son of my sister
almost
to death, and for an imaginary crime. There
were villains about meI will tell thee, by and by,
my delusion.
Seor, continued Gregorio, I found in thy
camp a villain, whose subtle and malicious nature
was in harmony with my own. This was Villafana,
whose representations of thy cruelty in the matter
of Juan, stirred up my evil passions; and until the
day when Juan returned, I was very eager to
avenge his wrongs. Upon that day, I discovered
that Magdalena was living. Now, he exclaimed,
with vehemence, thou mayst understand the cause
of my seeming madness: now thou mayst know
that the vengeance of heaven was punishing my old
sin with lashes of horror. Thou knowest the evil
slanders cast by the ribald soldiers upon thee, in
relation
to Magdalena. That dreadful suspicion was
soon at an end; but there remained the other, the
persuasion, supported by strong circumstances and
by the malign averments of Villafana,the dreadful,
damning belief, that a horrible and unnatural sin,
the direct consequence of my own, had plunged the
brother and sister into a never-ending
wretchedness
.
Ask not my feelings, when I made this
supposed
discovery. They caused me to seek the life
of the unhappy brother, to attempt it with my own
hands, and finally through thine; and all in a
distraction
,
that mingled a thirst of vengeance with the
precautions of pity. Thou knowest the rest: he
was snatched out of our hands; and from
Magdalena
I discovered the blessedthe blissful truth,
that heaven had not punished them for
my
sin! A
course of extraordinary calamities, while it covered
them with misery, yet kept them asunder.But
why should I trifle thus? The girl also was taken
from me, and by the pagans, who left me on the
lake-side weltering in blood. When I recovered
speech and sense, I besought Guzman to send for
you; nay, in my distracted impatience, being
myself
incapable of any effort beyond mere speech, I
confided to him the secret of their birth
Villain that he was, a double-dyed villain!
exclaimed Cortes, this then accounts for his
attempt
upon your life, of which I had something
more than mere suspicion to bring against him. I
see it all now: exposure of a long series of
malignant
deceptions, must have followed the revealment,
if it found the young Lermathe young Castillejo,
shall I say?yet living. Is it not true? did he do
you violence?
Not with his own hands, replied Gregorio;
nor can I say he really designed my death, not
being able to communicate with the Indians, who
dragged me by night from Tezcuco, carried me to
the mountains, and finally took me back again,
when Guzman was no longer the governor. But I
doubt not, his intentions were evil.
He has suffered for his crimes, said Cortes.
He strode to and fro for an instant, with hands
clasped together, and a working visage. Then
returning
,
and casting around a glance of suspicion,
he said,
Hark thee, GregorioIf we save these
unhappy
creatures from death, thou shalt be forgiven,
ay, man, and honoured, too. I understand the
motives
that made thee mine ally in wickedness: now
understand mine,the persuasions of belief that
converted me into a persecutorthe base and
devilish
persecutor, for such I wasof my sister's
sonof my own flesh and blood. By heaven! I
loved him dearly; nature spoke in my heart,the
instinct of consanguinity was alive within me; and
even the lies of Guzman could not wholly destroy
it. Velasquez the governor, he went on, has
fought me with all weapons, and with all in vain.
Yet did he at last fall upon one, that was made to
wound me to the quick, though it could not make
me falter in this emprise of conquest. My lady,
Gregorio, my lady! he continued, struggling in
vain against the feelings of humiliation, with which
he confessed a weakness so unworthy;my lady
Catalina is fair and merry, and, God wot,
somewhat
over fond of the gingling galliards that ruffle
it at Santiago; and I,by my conscience, I will be
as honest as thou,I have had the devil of suspicion
sometimes enter my mind; but, I swear to thee, to
mine own dishonour only. Upon this ground,
Velasquez
has thrust at me with hints, innuendos,
sarcasms
,
jests, rumours, accusations, time without
end. There has never a ship arrived, that it has
not brought some petard to be shot off on my
bosom
;
and sometimes, I think, I have been half mad
with my dreams. Know, then, that one of these
damnable devices was made to play in the person
of my adopted son,for such he was,and my
lady's favourite, Juan Lerma. My lady won him
out of prison, and she harboured him during the
sickness that followed. Out of this was
constructed
a story that tormented me. Yet it was naught,
until Guzman penetrated the weakness, and wrought
it, by I know not what means, into a fierce and
fiendish jealousy. The young man was melancholy,
toohe had killed his friend Hilario: but (heaven
save me such madness again!) I deemed it the
workings of his conscience, his sense of ingratitude,
operating upon a temper, which, I knew, was
naturally
noble and virtuous. Thou canst not think
how many little events were turned, by Guzman's
malignant address, into proof and confirmation of
my detestable suspicion. There came for him
certain
horses and arms, sent, as I quickly believed,
by my wife, now bold in infidelity
Alas! said Gregorio; I learned from
Villafana
,
that these were the gifts of Magdalena, who,
poor wretch, would have sent him her life, could
that have been made an acceptable present.
Thou makest my heart still lighter, said
Cortes, for this was the only matter I could not
myself explain away, so soon as certain passages
with Guzman had opened my eyes to his baseness.
His oppressions forced me to withdraw him from
Tezcuco; and, quarrelling with him upon that
subject
,
as well as in regard to thine own fate, he let
fall, in the heat of contention, certain unguarded
expressions, which convinced me that he had made
me his tool,by heaven, Gregorio, his instrument!
Suspicion once awake, my judgment once
informed
how much he had to gain, both of favour
and revenge, by destroying my poor cornet, it
needed but mine own reflections, to show me how
ruthlessly I had been cajoled. And to crown all,
a new light was shot into my soul, by the
recovery
,
from an Indian princess, now a captive in my
hands, of this trinket; which thou mayest know, if
thou hast indeed ever looked upon the face of my
sister.
He drew from his bosom the cross and rosary
which Juan had flung round the neck of the Indian
princess.
I placed it, said Gregorio, with mine own
own hands upon the bosom of the infant
Magdalena
But,
good heaven, how came it on the neck
of a savage, unless they have murdered her?
Fear not, said Cortes: It was given to the
princess by Juan Lermaby Juan of Castillejo;
and was doubtless presented to him by Magdalena,
in the island. From this princess, I learned the first
news of Magdalena, who was kindly treated by the
young king, in his palace, for Juan's sake. Thou
must know how this cross wrought upon my heart
and brain; for I did myself give it to my sister,
when they took me, but a boy, to see her in the
convent. And as for this princess, Gregorio,
continued
Cortes, with an air of pride, know that she
is a daughter of Montezuma, the descendant of a
thousand kings; and the Count of Castillejo will
carry with him to his castle, a bride more noble
than ever entered it before.
These things are vanities, said Gregorio,
gloomily. Let my brother's children be first
plucked from the nest of infidels, if it be not too
late.
Heaven will not
now
forsake them, after
protecting
them through so many and greater perils,
said Cortes, kissing the little cross and restoring it to
his bosom. The best men in the army, cavaliers
and all, have sworn they will fetch them from the
palace, in which they are now surrounded. And
hark thee, Gregorio: The only daughter of the
Count of Castillejo is too noble a prize for a
nunnery
.We
will have another dispensation.
The further disclosures of these two men, both
villains, and both penitents, after their ways, were
arrested by the commencement of the attack upon
the palace; and Cortes calling some of his
attendants
to support his companion's steps, they
descended
from the terrace.
CHAPTER XX.
Juan Lerma
, or Castillejofor such we must
now call himyet lay in confinement. His cell
was in a quarter of the palace remote from the
royal apartments; and without being altogether
exposed to the cannon-shots, with which the attack
was begun, was yet so nigh the garden-wall as to
make its luckless inhabitant an auditor of all the
fearful yells and outcries, with which the besieged
and assailants contended for possession of the
breaches. He was still bound, and some dozen or
more dark-browed pagans kept watch at his doors,
one of which led into a broad passage, and the
other he knew not whither. They were designed
rather to protect him from the fury of the
warriors
,
now concentrated in the garden and palace,
than to guard against escape, which the wounds
he had received in the defence of Guzman, had
but ill fitted him to attempt. All that
Guatimozin
could do to prolong an existence, now
almost
insufferably wretched, he did; and at the
very moment of the assault, while taking measures
to effect his own retreat from an empire now
utterly
demolished, and a post no longer tenable, he
gave hasty instructions to the Ottomi, Techeechee,
to secure the escape of his friend. It will be
presently
seen in what manner fortune defeated this plan,
as well as all others now devised by the fallen
monarch.
It was with a listlessness amounting almost to
apathy, that Juan listened to the first discharges of
the cannon and the roar of hostile voices. Such
sounds had been awakened for several days in
succession, and each day they were nearer and
louder. If they promised him deliverance, they
promised little else; for, having reflected upon the
eventful enterprise of the causeway, and digested
at leisure and in gloom, many of those details
which had almost escaped his notice, in the heat
and hurry of contention, he saw but little reason to
anticipate from his countrymen, any other reception
than such as might be vouchsafed to a condemned
criminal and avowed renegade. He remembered,
that he had been struck down by a Spaniard, while
in the very act of giving life to the Captain-General;
and he had a vague suspicion, that the blow was
struck by the Barba-Roxa. If Gaspar (of whose
death he was entirely ignorant), had met him with
such vindictive ferocity, what else could be
expected
from men who had never looked upon him with
friendship? Yet fear for himself made the lightest
weight in his load of suffering: his thoughts dwelt
upon the captive princess, and not less often, though
with perhaps less gnawing anxiety, upon his equally
captive sister.
Such were the reflections that darkened his
mind during the first hours of conflict, and
made him almost indifferent to his fate. Yet,
notwithstanding
his gloom, there arose a circumstance
at last, which gave such an appalling character to
his confinement, as prevented his remaining any
longer indifferent to his situation. He became
suddenly aware that volleys of smoke were
beginning
to roll into the apartment, and perceived, at the
same time, that his guards, driven away by fear, or
by an uncontrollable desire to mingle in the
conflict
,
as was more probable, had fled from the doors,
after satisfying themselves that he was secured in
such a manner as to prevent his flying in their
absence
.
He was indeed bound, or rather swathed,
hand and foot, with robes of cotton, so as to be
incapable
of rising from the couch on which he lay:
and it was his consciousness of the miserable
helplessness
of his condition, left to perish, as it seemed,
in a burning palace, without the power of ralsing
a finger in self-preservation, that stung him out
of his lethargy.
The smoke was now rolling into the room, in
denser masses than before, accompanied by the
stifling odour of burning feathers, which entered so
largely into the decorations of the palace; and he
began to apprehend lest he should be suffocated
outright, even before the flames had extended to
his prison. He called aloud for relief; but his voice
was unheeded in the din that shook the palace
walls; he struggled to release his limbs, or to rise
to his feet, but in vain; and even the poor
expedient
of rolling over the floor, availed him but little,
so much were his muscles cramped by the
barbarous
bonds. To crown the horror of the scene, a
gush of heated air shook the curtains of the door
opposite to that which communicated with the
passage
,
and was almost instantly followed by another,
whirling smoke and flames.
But even in this extremity, hope was brought to
his ears, in the sound of a voice not heard for many
days, but not yet forgotten. From among the very
flames that came flashing into the chamber,
consuming
the door-curtains, and darting upon the little
canopy that surmounted his couch, he could
distinguish
the eager and clamorous howlings of Befo;
as if this faithful friend were seeking him in his
imprisonment. He answered with a shout, which
was responded to not only by the joyful bark of the
dog, but by the wild cry of a woman; and in the
VOL. II. 19
next instant, Magdalena, preceded by Befo, rushed
through the flames into his dungeon.
I have come to save you, my brother! she
cried, with accents wildly vehement and incoherent.
We will fly where never man shall see us more.
Kiss me, Juan; and then look upon me no more,
for I have made a vow to my soul.Oh, my
brother
!
my brother! And she flung herself upon
his body, and strove, but in vain, to raise him from
the floor.
Had the agitation of his mind permitted, Juan
must have noticed, and been shocked by, the
alteration
in her appearance. Her whole figure was
miserably wasted, and she grasped him with a
strength feebler than a child's. Her countenance
was hollow, ghastly pale, and mottled only by such
touches of colour as indicate a spirit consuming
equally with the body. Add to this, that her
garments
were scorched, and even in parts burned,
by the flames through which she had made her
way; and we may understand how much she
differed
from the beautiful and majestic creature, that
had been deemed at Tezcuco, almost a being of
another world.
Cut my bonds, Magdalena, said Juan, eagerly,
or I must die in thine arms.
Let it be so, JuanWe will die together,
cried Magdalena, with a voice of transport, as if
the prospect of such a climax to an unhappy fate
filled her mind with actual delight. Oh yes, Juan,
so we will die, so we will die! And she flung her
arms about his neck, with tremulous fervour,
smothering his voice of remonstrance and entreaty,
until recalled to her wits by a loud howl from Befo.
This faithful animal, limping yet with pain, but acting
as if he understood the inability of Magdalena to
give his master relief, now lifted up his voice,
whining
for further assistance; and in a few seconds the
cry of another human being was heard,
approaching
with answering shouts, through the passage.
But before they were yet heard, Magdalena sprang
to her feet, and wrung her hands wildly, staring
upon Juan as if upon a basilisk.
Sister! sister! will you see me perish? cried
Juan. Slip me but these knotted robes from my
hands and feet, and I will save thy life. Befo! what
Befo! canst thou not rive them to tatters with thy
fangs?
I will free you, Juan,yes, I will free you,
said Magdalena, flinging herself upon her knees,
and essaying with better zeal than wisdom to loose
the knotted folds; Yes, Juan, I will free you, and
then bid you farewellYes, farewell, farewella
lasting farewell.
But while she was muttering thus, and striving
confusedly with the knots, a better assistance
arrived
in the person of the old Ottomi, who rushed
in, yelling, Fly! fly! The king waits for his
brother
,
and cut the garments asunder with his
macana
.
Juan rose to his feet; but so long had he endured
this benumbing bondage, that he was scarce able
either to stand or move. There was no time,
however, for hesitation. The flames were already
devouring his couch, and darting over the cedar
rafters of the ceiling. Befo whined and ran to the
door, as if inviting his master to follow; and
Techeechee
did not cease to exhort him to hasten.
Besides all this, there were now heard the cries of
men and clashing of arms, as if the battle were
raging even in the palace, and approaching the
place of imprisonment.
Magdalena, dear Magdalena
She flung herself into his arms, and embracing
him, as if never to part from him more, she yet
uttered
,
with wild sobbings,
Farewell, Juan, farewell; farewell, my brother
we will never see each other more!
What meanest thou, my sister? Hold me by
the armTarry not, or we shall perish.
I cannot go, JuanI will remain, JuanI must
die, Juan, I must die. Weep for me, pray for me,
remember meNow go, now go! Go, Juan, go!
It is impossible to express the mingled
tenderness
and vehemence with which she uttered these
words. Poignant grief darkened in her eyes, in
which glimmered the light of the most passionate
love; and all the while she shed floods of tears.
Unable to comprehend an agitation so
extraordinary
,
and valedictions which he thought little short
of insanity, he grasped her by the hand, and
endeavoured
to draw her after him. She resisted
even with screams, until, utterly confounded, and
somewhat incensed by opposition so
unreasonable
and inopportune, he turned again to
remonstrate
,
and perhaps rebuke. But the reproach was
banished from his lips, before they had given it
utterance
.
She again flung her arms around his
neck, and muttered with tones that went to his
heart,
I cannot go with you, JuanOh my brother!
pardon me, my brother, and do not curse me. Bid
me farewell, Juan, bid me farewell for everI love
you Juan, I love you too much!Now I can live
no more, Juan, I can live no moreFarewell!
farewell! farewell! And flinging from his arms,
as if from a serpent that had suddenly stung her
to the heart, she uttered another shriek, and fled
through the burning door by which she had entered.
Juan remained fixed to the spot, as if struck by
a thunderbolt; and before he could banish the words
of the thrice-unhappy victim of passion from his
ears, there rushed into the chamber, with furious
shouts, a rabble of Spanish soldiers, blood-stained,
and begrimed with smoke and cinders, the leader
of whom struck the Ottomi dead with a single
thrust of his spear, while the others rushed upon
Juan, some crying out to kill, and others to spare
him.
Hands off! cried Najara, throwing himself
betwixt
them and Juan. Remember ordersthe
general's orders!The king, seor Juan? Where
is the king?
Unhand me, villains! cried Juan,
endeavouring
to shake off the soldiers who held him fast,
while Befo attempted vainly to give him
assistance
:Kill
me, if you will, but save my sister,
my poor sisterQuick! for the love of heaven,
quick! he cried, observing some dart towards the
door through which she had vanished: Cortes
will reward yousave her! save her!
Follow them, Bernal, man, cried Najara to the
historian, who had just plucked his spear from the
body of TecheecheeWhat dost thou with
slaying
gray-headed Indians? Follow La Monjonaza,
five-hundred crowns,ay, by my troth, and call
them five thousandto him that recovers her
alive! Ah, seor Juan! your dog has more brains
than yourself. But for his howling, you must e'en
have roasted, man. Come along, come alongBe
of good heart; there is no fear now of either axe or
rope.
With such words as these, he drew Juan from
the chamber, and supporting his tottering steps
between
himself and another, and bidding the rest of
the party to surround them, so as to guard against
any outbursting of rage from their excited
companions
,
he bore him from the scene of bloodshed
and conflagration.
19*
CHAPTER XXI.
The
assault upon the garden and palace of
Guatimozin
,
though the last blow given to his power,
it has not been thought needful to describe in any
of its details. It is well known, that the occasion
was used by the few nobles of the empire who yet
survived, to withdraw their monarch with his
family
from the island, in the vain hope of reaching the
main land, through a line of brigantines and armed
piraguas. It is also well known, that,
notwithstanding
the stratagem with which these faithful
barbarians essayed to protect the last of their native
lords, by exposing their own defenceless gondolas
to destruction, he was captured, in consequence of
his magnanimous self-devotion, and transferred with
his trembling family, from his royal piragua to the
galley of Garci Holguin.
Drums, trumpets, falconets, fire-arms, and human
voices at once proclaimed the importance of the
capture, and the triumph of the victors; and with
all the speed of sails and oars, the fortunate cavalier
bore his prize towards the nearest landing in
possession
of the Spaniards, deriding and even defying
the claim set up by Sandoval, as the superior officer,
to the honour of presenting the prisoner to the
Captain-General
.
Long before he had reached the
palace
of Axajacatl, it was known throughout the
whole city that Guatimozin was in the hands of the
besiegers. The warriors who still fought in the
garden, beheld the surrender on the lake, instantly
threw down their arms, and submitted with sullen
indifference to the fate they had long anticipated.
With the interview betwixt the king and the
conqueror
all readers are familiar. The
Captain-General
,
sumptuously dressed, and in the midst of such
state as could be prepared for an occasion so
imposing
,
received the prisoner, (in whose wasted
figure and dejected countenance it was not
possible
to recognize the half-forgotten Olin,) in the hall
of the palace of Axajacatl, where his ancestors had
been kings and princes, but into which he now
entered
a captive and vassal. The Captain-General
received him not only with respect, but with an
appearance of sympathy and kindness. In truth,
he could not but admire the fortitude of his
youthful
foe; and he reflected, not without exultation,
that if his desperate resistance had increased the
pains and perils of conquest, and frequently dashed
all hopes of success, it had made his own triumph a
thousand times more glorious. He descended from
his chair of state, and raising the dejected captive
from the floor, upon which he had flung himself in
token of submission, he embraced him with many
expressions of respect and encouragement.
Fear notneither for thy life nor crown, he
said. Thou perceivest, the king of Spain, my
master, is invincible. Reign still in Mexico; but
reign as his vassal.
He would have replaced on the captive's head
the copilli of gold, which had been brought from the
gondola and put into his hand; but Guatimozin
rejected
it with a melancholy gesture, saying,
It is the Teuctli'sI am no more the king.
Malintzin! be merciful to the people of Mexico:
they are now slaves. Have pity also on the women
and children, that come from the palace; for they
are of the household of Montezuma. As for myself,
Malintzin, hearken to what I say. The kings of
Mexico have all died; when they gave their breath
to heaven, the crown was on their front, and the
sceptres on their bosom. Why then should I live,
who am no longer a king? Malintzin, I have fought
for Mexico, I have shed blood for my country, and
now I shed tears; I can do no more for my people
It is fitting, therefore, that I should dieBut I
should die like a king.He extended his hand,
and touched the jewelled dagger that glittered in
the baldric of his foe. The action was without any
sign of hostility, and his countenance, now uplifted
upon Cortes, was bathed with tears. Let
Malintzin
do the workPlunge this dagger into my
bosom
,
and let me depart.
There was something affecting even to the
iron-hearted
conqueror in the situation and demeanour
of the poor infidel, thus beseeching, and evidently
with as much sincerity as simplicity, a death of
honour
after a life of patriotism; and Cortes would
have renewed his caresses and assurances of
friendship
,
had not his ears been that moment struck by
voices without, pronouncing the name of Juan
Lerma, with brutal execrations. He signed to those
cavaliers who had conducted the monarch to his
presence, to lead him away; and a moment after,
Juan Lerma was conducted up to his footstool.
Dejected, spiritless, overcome perhaps by the
ferocious
calls for vengeance which had heralded his
steps to the palace, as well as by the exhaustion of
long bodily suffering, he did not raise his eyes from
the floor, until he heard the voice of Cortes
pronounce
the faltering words,
Juan of Castillejo, I have done you a great
wrong.Yes, he continued, with a louder voice,
when Juan looked up, surprised not more by his
altered tones than by a name so unexpected and
unknown, Yes, and let all bear witness to my
confession;I have done thee, not one wrong only,
but many; for which I heartily repent me, and,
before
all this assemblage, do beseech thy
forgiveness
.
My forgiveness, seor! stammered Juan, while
all the rest looked on in amazement.
Thy forgiveness, repeated the conqueror, with
double emphasis. Thou hast been belied to me,
bitterly maligned; but heaven has punished the
slanderer, who slew mine own peace of mind, that
he might compass thy death.
Alas, seor, said Juan; in his death-gasp,
Guzman confessed to me
Speak not of Guzmanforget him.Have ye
heard, my masters! and well taken note of what
is spoken? Now begone, all, and leave me alone
with my recovered prodigal.JuanJuan Lerma,
Juan of Castillejo, he cried, as soon as the
wondering
audience had vanished; if Guzman have
confessed to you, you must know why I have been
maddened into wrath and injustice.But thy sister,
Juan, where is thy sister? my poor Magdalena?
Ah, Juan! it was but a fiendish aberration, that set
me against the child of my sister!
With these words, he threw himself upon Juan's
neck, and embraced him with a fervour that
indicated
the return of all his old affections, uttering a
thousand exclamations, in which he mingled
recurrences
to the past with many a reference to the
present and future. This will be a glad day to
Catalina, for she ever loved theeDolt that I was,
to think that her love could be aught but a mother's!
My father, Juan, my father, too! his gray hairs
will yet be laid in a grave of joy; for he shall
behold
the son of his daughter seated in the
inheritance
of a noble father. And thy sistershe shall
shine with the proudest and noblest.I knew thee
upon the causeway, too, though I was left in a
coma, and half expiring. We have full proof of thy
claims.And thy princess, toodost thou
remember
the silver cross? taking it from his bosom
Were there a duke's son demanded her, she
should be thine.What ho! some one bring me
But, nayThy sister, Juan! does she not live?
Juan was stunned, stupified, bewildered, by a
transformation in his own character and in the
feelings
of the general, so sudden and so marvellous.
Yet he strove to reply to the last question, and was
in the act of uttering a broken and hasty
explanation
,
when a loud cry came from the passage, and
rushing out, they beheld a party of soldiers bearing,
in a litter of robes torn from the burning palace, the
body, or the living frame, they knew not which, of
the unhappy nun, over whom the penitent
Gregorio
was bitterly lamenting.
It was indeed Magdalena, her garments scorched,
her face like the face of the dying. Yet she did
not seem to have suffered from the flames. The
soldiers had found her in a part of the palace not
touched by the fire, and scarce invaded by the
smoke; and perhaps a subtle physician would have
traced her dreadful condition rather to some
overpowering
convulsion of spirit than to any physical
injury. She was indeed dying, the victim of
contending
passions, with which the education of a
cloister had so ill fitted her to contend.
We will not speak of the meeting of Juan and his
dark-eyed proselyte. It took place beside the couch
of the dying, girl, who, for love of him, had given up
the vows of religion and the fame of woman, and
perished with frenzy, when she discovered that that
love was more than the love of a sister.
At nightfall, and while she still lay insensible, save
that a faint moan occasionally trembled from her lips,
there arose a tempest of lightning, thunder, and
rain, far exceeding in violence any that had before
burst over the heads of the Spaniards, and which
Bernal Diaz has recorded in his history, as having
been the most dreadful that ever confounded his mind
and senses. It seemed as if the warlike divinities
of Mexico were now taking leave of their broken
altars and subjugated people, with a display of
strength and fury, never more to be exercised. It
ceased not until midnight, and then only when it
had discharged a bolt that shook the island to its
foundation, and tumbled many a ruined cabin and
dilapidated palace, upon the heads of their unhappy
inmates.
It was in the midst of this conflict of the
elements
,
that the broken spirit passed from its weary
prison; and what had been beauty and affection,
genius and passion, became a clod, to claim kindred
with its fellow of the valley. It was better indeed
that she should thus perish; for her nature was
above that of earth, and even the passion that
destroyed
her, pure, enthusiastic, and devoted as it
was, was unworthy the spirit it had subdued. It
was such as is the molewarp to the rose-bush, or the
myrtle-tree, which he can destroy by burrowing at
their roots, even when the winter's blast can scarce
rive away a branch.
The remains of this ill-fated being were interred
upon a sequestered hill, west of Mexico, where
Gregorio Castillejo built a hermitage, and mourned
over her for the few years he survived her. He
left the odour of sanctity behind him, and the
hermitage
is now forgotten in the chapel built upon its
site, and dedicated to Our Lady de los Remedios.
To this place Cortes withdrew, with his whole army,
in order that the ruined city might be purified of
corses and rubbish, that rendered it horrible even
to a soldier, no longer inflamed by the fire of battle.
He soon, however, removed to Xochimilco, the
Field of Flowers, where the time of the purification
was devoted to solemn rejoicings and profane
festivities
.
To all those who may yet be disposed to
consider
our account of the strength and splendour of
the empire of Montezuma as fabulous, we
recommend
no better study than the honest, worthy, and
single-minded historian, Bernal Diaz del Castillo,
who lived to complete his
Historia Verdadera
, fifty
years afterwards, in the loyal city of Guatimala, in
which he held the honourable post of Regidor, the
venerable, and, at that period, almost the sole
survivor
of the followers of Cortes. He has recorded
one striking proof of the vast multitudes of pagans
that had been concentrated within the island of
Mexico. After averring, with a solemn oath, that,
after the fall of the city, the streets, houses, squares,
courts, and canals, were so covered with dead bodies,
that it was impossible to move without treading upon
them, he relates, that, Cortes having ordered all who
survived, principally women and children, and the
wounded, to evacuate the city, preparatory to its
purification, `for
three days and three nights
, all
the causeways were full of the wretched fugitives,
who were so weak and sickly, so squalid and
pestilential
,
that it was misery to behold them.' Three
broad highways, covered, for the space of three days
and nights, by a moving mass of widows and
orphans
,
the trophies of a gallant achievement! the
first fruits of the ambition of a single individual!
As Bernal Diaz retained, to the last, a jealous
regard
for the honour of his leader, this friendly
weakness
,
taken into consideration along with the
infirmities
of memory incident to his advanced age,
may perhaps account for his failure to complete the
story of Juan Lerma. He may have recollected, as
is often the case with an old man, the earliest facts
of the story, while the later ones slipped entirely
from his mind.
Of Cortes himself, it is scarce necessary to
apprize
the reader, that he lived to subdue other
empires
,
and experience the ingratitude of a monarch,
whose favour he had so amply merited. He fought
for renown, for his king, and for heaven. Heaven
alone can judge the merit of his acts, for men
are yet unwilling to sit in judgment upon the brave;
his king requited him with insults and positive
oppression
;
and fame has placed him among those
who have trodden out the wine-press of human
desolation
,
and live in marble.
As for the young Count of Castillejo, his claims
to the inheritance of his father were too well
substantiated
to be resisted; and the crimes of
Gregorio
had left none to oppose. As a subordinate in
the work of conquest, there was nothing in him to
be feared; and when he bore from a land he could
only remember with sorrow, a bride whose father
had borne the witching name of king, he was
received
with as much favour, and distinguished by
as many honours, as any other
Conquistador
, who
transplanted among the dames of Castile, a wife
wooed within the palaces of Montezuma.
The fate of Guatimozin is well known. The
crown he was still enforced to wear, did not
protect
him from the torture of fire; nor could his noble
character and unhappy fall secure him from a death
of degradation. Four years after the fall of his
empire, and at a distance of several hundred
leagues from his native valley, he expiated upon a
gibbet, a crime that existed only in the gloomy
and remorseful imagination of the Conqueror. And
thus, with two royal kinsmen, kings and feudatories
of Anahuac, he was left to swing in the winds, and
feed the vultures, of a distant and desert land. He
merited a higher distinction, a loftier respect, and a
profounder compassion, than men will willingly
accord
to a barbarian and INFIDEL.
THE END.